,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Machine Learning Engineer,$92k-$161k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you enjoy extracting value from our data? Does the prospect of leading the processes from data collection, cleaning, and preprocessing, to training models and deploying them to production excite you? If you answered “yes” to any of those questions, then we would love to talk with you about joining our Data Platform team as a Machine Learning Engineer.

Our purpose at The Motley Fool is to help people become Smarter, Happier, and Richer. We educate people on everything from how to choose the best credit card to how to make the most of their 401(k). We are looking for our next great Fool to lead our ML initiatives.

The ideal candidate will be a confident, experienced machine learning engineer who is passionate about machine learning and will stay up-to-date with the latest developments in the field.

Responsibilities:
Properly use statistical techniques
Use data exploratory techniques using visualization tools
Requirements gathering working with Business Owners and ability to explain insights.
Ability to use choose between a higher score versus explain
Understanding of time-series
Verifying data quality, and/or ensuring it via data cleaning
Analysis of data drift
Defining validation strategies
Defining the preprocessing or feature engineering to be done on a given dataset
Observing the best practices on training models
Automatically tuning hyperparameters using tools like Grid Search
Analyzing the errors of the model and designing strategies to overcome them
Deploying models to production
Skills:
A minimum of 2 years of experience required
Proficiency with a deep learning framework preferred
Proficiency with Python and basic libraries for machine learning (PANDAS and Scikit-Learn)
Expertise in visualizing and manipulating big datasets
Proficiency with auto-ML and data modeling frameworks using AWS, Azure, and/or Google
Ability to select hardware to run an ML model
Communication skills and ability to collaborate with Data Engineers and Business Analysts
Adept with Data Wrangling techniques",4.6,"The Motley Fool
4.6","Alexandria, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
1,"Software Engineer, Machine Learning",$105k-$177k (Glassdoor Est.),"Facebook's mission is to give people the power to build community and bring the world closer together. Through our family of apps and services, we're building a different kind of company that connects billions of people around the world, gives them ways to share what matters most to them, and helps bring people closer together. Whether we're creating new products or helping a small business expand its reach, people at Facebook are builders at heart. Our global teams are constantly iterating, solving problems, and working together to empower people around the world to build community and connect in meaningful ways. Together, we can help people build stronger communities - we're just getting started.

Facebook is seeking Software Engineers in Machine Learning Engineers to join our engineering team. The ideal candidate will have industry experience working on a range of classification and optimization problems, e.g. payment fraud, click-through rate prediction, click-fraud detection, search ranking, text/sentiment classification, collaborative filtering/recommendation, or spam detection. The position will involve taking these skills and applying them to some of the most exciting and massive social data and prediction problems that exist on the web.
Develop highly scalable classifiers and tools leveraging machine learning, data regression, and rules based models
Suggest, collect and synthesize requirements and create effective feature roadmap
Code deliverables in tandem with the engineering team
Adapt standard machine learning methods to best exploit modern parallel environments (e.g. distributed clusters, multicore SMP, and GPU)
5+ years experience in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, computer vision, natural language processing, recommendation systems, pattern recognition, data mining or artificial intelligence
Proven experience translating insights into business recommendations
Experience with Hadoop/Hbase/Pig or Mapreduce/Sawzall/Bigtable
Knowledge developing and debugging in C/C++ and Java
Experience with scripting languages such as Perl, Python, PHP, and shell scripts
Bachelors in Computer Science or related quantitative field
Experience with filesystems, server architectures, and distributed systems
Facebook is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religion, color, national origin, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions), sexual orientation, gender, gender identity, gender expression, transgender status, sexual stereotypes, age, status as a protected veteran, status as an individual with a disability, or other applicable legally protected characteristics. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.Facebook is committed to providing reasonable accommodations for candidates with disabilities in our recruiting process. If you need any assistance or accommodations due to a disability, please let us know at accommodations-ext@fb.com.",4.5,"Facebook
4.5","Menlo Park, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
2,Data Acquisition Engineer (SCADA/Web Backend),-1,"GameChange Solar is one of the fastest growing, most dynamic companies in the rapidly growing solar industry. We have top quality solar racking and tracker products that generate the most amount of energy, are the fastest to install, and the most cost effective.

The Data Acquisition Engineer will work in development to improve our framework for data acquisition and control of our fleet of 100's of MW of solar trackers. They will also develop tools for data processing and visualization to provide for new features for our products. This is an exciting opportunity for an engineer with experience in web design and SCADA who has solid communication skills.We offer a solid base with significant bonus upside for exceptional performance.

Roles and responsibilities include but will not be limited to:

· Develop a system for local SCADA interfacing

· Configure software suites to meet our system needs

· Develop custom applications to perform data acquisition and reporting

· Create user-friendly HMIs

· Work with engineering team to design and develop our back end for data acquisition and control

· Use machine learning techniques to improve system performance

Skills and Education:

· Experience with networks and SCADA

· Experience with backend web design

· Python, Google VM, Linux, Javascript/css/html Node, React, LabView

· Experience with Modbus, TCP, SSH, SFTP

· Knowledge of NEC, NERC, CIP, industry protocols (IEC-61850, DNP, Modbus, OPC), Ethernet systems, protocol analyzers, and industry SCADA practices

· Experience with SCADA integration software such as Kepware, Aggregate, Zenon

· Bachelor's Degree in Electrical Engineering with preferred emphasis in software, integration and automation, and industrial controls

· 2+ years experience in SCADA, industrial controls, or backend web design

· Strong Communication skills: Mastery of written and spoken English required

Salary DOE

Business Casual attire when in office setting.

PPE and GCS attire for onsite visits.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
SCADA: 2 years (Preferred)
Networks: 2 years (Required)
Backend Web Design: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
List a brief description of what we make
Company's website:
gamechangesolar.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.7,"GameChange Solar
2.7","Norwalk, CT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
3,Senior Big Data Engineer,$62k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to be part of the transformation that's pushing forward a truly data-driven company? Are you ready to collaborate and innovate with a team responsible for changing the customer experience using the latest technologies? As a Senior Big Data Engineer on the GEICO IT squad, you’ll thrive in a fast-paced innovative culture that turns data into information and uses that information to drive action. One focus is our Single View of the Customer (SVOC) initiative. As part of this team you will be designing, creating, and populating customer centric data stores necessary for deriving valuable insights in real time to provide tailored customer experiences. As a senior engineer you will have the opportunity to mentor more junior associates and help grow our team.
When you first join our SVOC team, you will have opportunity to come up to speed on the innovative technologies we use to develop SVOC!

Basic Qualifications:

o At least 2 years as a Big Data Engineer/Developer on the Hadoop Ecosystem, with experience in data profiling and transformations
o At least 2 years of experience using Spark core, or Spark SQL,
o Experience with core Java (and/or Scala, Python)
o Experience with NoSQL databases such as HBase, Cassandra, or MongoDB
o Proficient in designing efficient and robust ETL/ELT workflows, schedulers, and event-based triggers
o Strong critical thinking, decision making, and problem-solving skills
o Excellent verbal/written communication skills, including communicating technical issues to non-technical audiences
o A Bachelor's degree in a computer related field or equivalent professional experience is required

Preferred Skills:

o Exposure to Spark Streaming and Machine Learning
o Exposure to Data Mining, Data Engineering, and Data Modeling
o Exposure to Graph Databases

Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.

Qualifications

About GEICO
For more than 75 years, GEICO has stood out from the rest of the insurance industry! We are one of the nation's largest and fastest-growing auto insurers thanks to our low rates, outstanding service and clever marketing. We're an industry leader employing thousands of dedicated and hard-working associates. As a wholly owned subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway, we offer associates training and career advancement in a financially stable and rewarding workplace.

As a full-time Senior Big Data Engineer, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program* to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:

• Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period**
• Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave
• 401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
• Tuition Reimbursement
• Paid Training and Licensures
Benefits may be different by location. Benefit eligibility requirements vary and may include length of service.
*Coverage begins with the pay period after hire date. Must enroll in New Hire Benefits within 30 days of the date of hire for coverage to take effect.",3.4,"GEICO
3.4","Chevy Chase, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1936,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
4,Senior C++ Software Engineer,-1,"*Senior C++ Software Engineer*

*You move the world. We move you.*

Motional is making driverless vehicles a safe, reliable, and accessible reality. We’re developing world-class solutions people can trust and transforming the way the world moves and connects.

We’ve been moving the automotive industry forward for over a decade — now we’re looking for Senior C++ Engineers to accelerate our journey. With competitive sign-on bonuses for applicable candidates, there’s no better time to start the journey with us.

Working remotely at first, you’ll then be based in either our Boston, MA or our Pittsburgh, PA office, forming part of a global technology network, working with talented people across the world to develop solutions that make travel more convenient, more connected – and 100% safe.

If you’re a Senior C++ professional, have at least 5 or more years of software development experience, plus the drive to be part of something that’s really going places, we’d like to talk to you.

We have opportunities in:

*Planning & Controls*

*Principal & Senior Positions*

Modern C++ 11, 14, 17, 20 / Motion Controls & Path Planning / Machine Learning / Autonomy / Robotics

*Perception & Localization*

*Principal & Senior Positions*

Modern C++ 11, 14, 17, 20 / Python / LIDAR / RADAR / Robotics

*Infrastructure Software*

*Senior Positions*

Modern C++ 11, 14, 17, 20 / Multi-threaded C++ / Python / Linux / Unix / Robotics / Machine Learning / Test Automation / Simulation / Middleware / Autonomy Integration / Cyber Security

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
* Dental insurance
* Employee assistance program
* Employee discount
* Flexible schedule
* Health insurance
* Paid time off
* Parental leave
* Professional development assistance
* Relocation assistance
* Retirement plan
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* Monday to Friday

Experience:
* C++: 1 year (Required)

Application Question:
* Are you open to relocation in order to work in either our Boston, MA or Pittsburgh, PA office?

Work Remotely:
* Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.0,"Motional
4.0","Detroit, MI",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2020,Company - Private,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
5,Data Scientist,$91k-$149k (Glassdoor Est.),"OUR AGENCY

Making a Difference

SWIB is a trusted and skilled global investment organization managing the assets of the Wisconsin Retirement System (WRS) and other separately managed funds. With about $129 billion in total assets under management, SWIB has been recognized by the investment industry for its teamwork and innovation that helps make it a premier asset manager. Sophisticated investment management strategies, forward-looking technologies, and strong internal asset management make SWIB a leading investment organization.

For public employees in Wisconsin, SWIB is a unique and valuable partner. Investing for the financial security of more than 635,000 individuals and for the 1,500 Wisconsin employers who contribute on behalf of their employees SWIBs strong management of the WRS has helped fuel one of only a few fully funded public pension funds in the country. SWIBs long-term investment returns meet the challenges of a constantly evolving investment landscape while helping grow and protect the assets of the WRS, the 8th largest public pension fund in the U.S. and 25th largest public or private pension fund in the world.

We are a mission driven organization and the participants we serve are our mission. By bringing a disciplined, prudent and innovative approach to market opportunities, SWIB has been successful in generating respectable returns and maintaining the trust of the beneficiaries and stakeholders of the funds we oversee.

Join HIGHER PERFORMERS

Home to Top Talent

SWIB has long been recognized as an investment leader because of its success in maintaining the WRS and for the highly-qualified staff overseeing the retirement trust funds. SWIBs internal team invests a majority of its assets under management. This means SWIB is committed to investing in professionals that will keep the organization at the forefront of the investment industry. As an innovative organization, SWIB offers professional development opportunities that enable staff to grow and develop. Approximately 61 percent of SWIBs investment professionals are Chartered Financial Analyst (CFA) charterholders.

About the Team

Partner with, build, maintain, enhance and manage the data and technology for the Asset and Risk Allocation (ARA) division which is responsible for the overall investment structure of the Core and Variable Trust Funds. ARA recommends and implements the asset allocation for the policy portfolio, recommends and implements the active risk budget, and is responsible for overall risk monitoring and management. The Analytics, Data Science, & Development department primarily partners with the Asset & Risk Allocation team as well as work with other internal divisions. There will be opportunities to apply skills in both technology and finance.

This role offers a unique opportunity to learn and contribute to the technology and the business through technology.

Essential activities:
Creating reporting, decisioning systems or outputs, performing rapid analysis on data issues, and instrumenting the system with data quality rules to proactively catch and prevent issues, creating enriched and enhanced datasets with advanced data manipulation and modeling skills, use of primarily Oracle, SQL Server, Snowflake, Python, delivering risk, return, cost metrics and partner with various internal departments to improve the overall state of technology and operations, architecting, developing, testing, documenting and supporting software and technical solutions for the SWIB ARA team as well as other teams, assess and revisit inventory business logic, calculations and reporting, leveraging SQL, Python and communication skills in various avenues, instrument data quality rules and metrics in the system.

Technical Skills:
Oracle SQL, SQL Server
Snowflake (or some equivalent datastore tool)
Python experience
JIRA and Confluence
Alteryx (or some equivalent ETL tool such as Informatica)
PowerBI (or some equivalent BI tool such as Tableau)
Data Skills:
SQL development
ETL (Extract Transform load) exposure
Python experience
Financial Knowledge recommended but candidates in other industries highly recommended to apply:
Understanding of multi-asset products is desirable
Comprehensions of risk, return and cost metrics in industry is desirable
Exposure to the investment management lifecycle is desirable
The ideal candidate:
5-10 years experience in data analytics, data science, or related fields
Bachelor's degree or advanced degree in finance, quantitative finance, or another related field
Ability to take various questions gathered from the business leveraging existing data as well as improving upon that data to deliver complete, consistent and precise answers
Experience in working with/understanding the various lifecycles of data management, extraction, loading, transformation to its applications in analysis, research and solving problems
Extensive knowledge in composing Oracle SQL, SQL Server queries, data modeling, and having a SQL and analytics background
Experience in identifying use cases for the business, contributing to analysis and understanding of existing data models with iterative recommendations on improvement resulting in some improvement in risk, return or cost for the organization
Extensive knowledge of data extraction, transformation and loading
Experience refactoring SQL queries, use of Python
Experience working with large structured and financial data sets
Ability to follow rigor in creating/updating documentation, maintain process (i.e. JIRA tickets) and following technology and business best practices
Ability to present and communicate well and connect business and technology
Ability to tactically understand results in context (i.e. when does something look wrong), and strategically how to resolve those issues via data quality and rule-based instrumentation
Interest in newer data technologies, Snowflake programming, i.e. Python
Interest or experience in investment management, quantitative finance and technology
Background in Agile methodologies and their applications
SWIB Offers:
Competitive McLagan-base salary
Meaningful performance-based incentive compensation
A comprehensive benefit package
Educational and training opportunities
Tuition reimbursement
Challenging work in a professional environment
The position requires U.S. work authorization and residency in, or willingness to relocate to the Madison, Wisconsin area. SWIB is prepared to offer relocation assistance as needed.",3.0,"State of Wisconsin Investment Board
3.0","Madison, WI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1951,Government,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
6,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Machine Learning Engineer*
Are you obsessed with software and machine learning? Looking to work with an awesome team in a modern, successful software company? Geisel Software, based in Worcester, Massachusetts, is a premier software developer that is working with and creating today's hottest software technologies. We are looking for a motivated individual to join our team, learn new technology, and help us build some great software!

Geisel Software develops web, mobile and embedded software, with a focus on robotics, medical devices, and machine learning. We seek a talented individual who is not afraid to work hard, learn something new and get lots of stuff done. We have a helpful staff, but it is also important that you can work independently and solve problems with little outside direction. Your problem-solving skills will be put to the test, whether that means tracking down the answer on Google, or building your own new solution.
Here's what we work with regularly*
TensorFlow and OpenCV
Robotic Simulation with ROS, RVIZ, and Unreal Engine
LAMP - Linux, Apache, MySQL and PHP
iPhone/Android application development
Embedded Development in C/C++ (Arm or x86)
Web Frontend (AngularJS, JavaScript, jQuery, Bootstrap, etc.)
Scripting Languages (Python, BASH, or other)
Web Technologies - HTML5, CSS3, XML, JSON
Linux - As a user at least, but also administration and kernel development
Web Frameworks - Django, Codeigniter
Agile and Waterfall design methodologies
Embedded platforms (Raspberry Pi, BeagleBone, OMAP, etc.)
Here’s what we require*
You're passionate about software development -- it's what you do even in your free time.
1 - ∞ years of experience with C, C++ and/or Python.
Master’s degree in Computer Science or related field (PHD highly preferred).
Willingness and ability to write software as part of a team as well as work on ground-breaking machine learning IP. This role will be a mix of both!
Good software foundational skills: CS theory; clean, well-documented code; collaborative style; solid algorithms understanding; mastery of more than one language.
An aptitude for learning new platforms and technologies on the fly. We’re constantly working on new projects that will push you and keep you always learning new technologies.
Able to take ownership of a project and independently architect, execute and troubleshoot it through completion and customer delivery.
Actively pursuing new knowledge and technologies. If you’re a web frontend guru, are you building your backend skills? If you’re an embedded developer, are you developing apps for Android or iOS?
Already comfortable on Linux. You can be a Windows/Mac pro, but you'll be doing at least 50% of your development on Linux. You should be comfortable with that.
Willing to commute to Worcester, MA (Note: Ability to temporarily work remotely during this trying time of COVID-19).
Looking for full-time employment.
Must be a US Person.
Here’s what we would prefer*
ROS or other robot operating system experience.
An educational focus in Machine Learning and Data Science.
Published work in the field of machine learning.
Robotic simulation and 3D game engine knowledge (Godot, Unreal, Unity, RVIZ, Drake).
Any experience with physical modeling would be a plus.
What you’ll get*
An opportunity to work with the latest technologies across a variety of platforms.
A fun, exciting work environment focused on the results, not the politics.
An experienced team and mentor who can help you grow in your craft and career.
A position with a growing company, offering competitive benefits and salary.
Apply now*
E-mail us at *jobs*@*geisel.software* and *include your resume and a brief cover letter* explaining why you think you'd be a great fit at Geisel Software. We'd love to hear about what you've done with technologies we're using, or other projects you've worked on. What do you think you’re really good at and why? What have you done outside your current job to improve your craft? Why do you think you’d be a great fit?

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.geisel-software.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,"Geisel Software
5.0","Worcester, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
7,Senior Full-Stack Engineer,$66k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are

WillowTree is an award-winning digital product agency driven by innovation and grounded in strategy and user-centered design. We create long-term partnerships with the world's leading brands to design and build digital flagship products crucial to their core business. We are one of the largest independent digital firms in the US. Some of our clients include HBO, National Geographic, Anheuser-Busch, and PepsiCo.

The Opportunity

As a Senior Full-Stack Engineer at WillowTree, you'll have the opportunity to impact teammates throughout various stages of their careers. You'll have clear oversight of how engineering runs day-to-day and will influence project outcomes.

We understand our responsibility to create a diverse, equitable, and inclusive place within the tech industry, while pushing to make our industry more representative. Because of this responsibility, we need candidates who value diversity and inclusion through their work, team collaboration, or mentorship. So in your cover letter, we encourage you to reflect on diversity, equity, and inclusion.
This is not a remote position and may require some travel. Currently, all team members are working from home until our offices reopen.
Responsibilities
Lead the delivery of large and complex software projects from beginning to end in a team-based environment
Confidently deliver high-quality software by applying critical thinking to products, requirements, and processes
Work closely with clients to influence technical product decisions and business goals
You'll stay up to date with the landscape of software engineering best practices, tools, and frameworks
Understanding of various software architectures and can adapt and compose solutions to unique problems with sustainable and reusable solutions
Mentor a larger team towards shared goals and outcomes
Navigate difficult conversations by providing constructive feedback to teams and clients
You'll identify obstacles to ensure quality, improve our user experience and how we build software
Self-aware of limitations, yet curious to learn new solutions and receptive to constructive feedback from teammates
You'll guide your team to understand and work through changing priorities by bringing positive energy
Communicate and simplify complex problems in order to foster understanding across multidisciplinary teams
Apply your knowledge and findings at an organizational scale
You'll travel onsite to meet with our clients about one week per month
Qualifications
Able to evaluate and articulate which framework to use for a particular project
Can articulate how users perceive performance and how to optimize their needs
Understanding of the pros and cons of server-side and client-side rendering
Experience as a technical leader to a team of web developers that have built and delivered a large web application
Built and deployed complex software at scale involving at least one of our core technologies (iOS, Android, Web Apps, API Engineering)
Owned and led the delivery of major features and components
Worked with clients and stakeholders (consulting experience, ability to have difficult conversations or solve and advocate for best practices)
Empathetic to client needs and desire to contribute sound recommendations on technical architecture and design
Leadership or mentorship experience
Can present complex ideas to clients and team members in a compelling and energetic way
Proficiency using, modifying, and creating development tools that foster efficiency and improve process
You consider 'big picture' perspectives and can successfully balance business goals and technical constraints
Bonus Points
You've conducted interviews and have hired for your team
Expertise with advanced automation tools (e.g. virtualization, machine learning-based testing, massive parallelization)
Basic understanding of how to design RESTful APIs that are optimized for responsive, interactive mobile experiences
Appreciation of pixel-perfect UI implementations
A list of emerging technologies we're interested in: Big Data, Machine Learning, Voice, AR/VR, Security Background, and IoT
You have code samples or a GitHub account to share and while you're there, check us out!

Even if you don't have expertise in all of the qualifications listed, we value new perspectives and backgrounds and encourage you to apply. We're committed to building a diverse company that reflects the diversity of our users. We're committed to growth-mindset.

Why WillowTree?

We offer a place to be yourself.

Our differences, both visible and invisible, benefit our teams, our communities, and the products we craft. That's why WillowTree strives to build a team with diverse backgrounds, skills, and perspectives. You'll work hard here; however, we'll balance that with a culture that supports your growth and cares about your well-being. We're committed to creating an environment of inclusion — a place where every Tree can thrive.

We want you to reach your fullest potential and part of your professional development at WillowTree will include dedicated time to innovate on passion projects and an annual stipend to fund your professional pursuits.

WillowTree celebrates our differences and provides equal employment opportunities to all team members and applicants without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws. Diverse teams build better products. We acknowledge that the tech industry especially lacks opportunity for those who are of non-traditional backgrounds and in underrepresented groups. In order to create the best products for everyone, we know that it's important for our team to reflect the diversity of our users, and we are committed to being the change we want to see.",4.9,"WillowTree
4.9","Columbus, OH",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
8,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Hi - we’re Topaz Labs. We create AI-powered software that solves photographers’ biggest problems like one-click noise reduction, super-simple masking, and pixel-perfect image upscaling. Tens of thousands of paid customers use our technology every day, ranging from amateur photographers to major Hollywood movie studios. Our AI image enhancement technology has been recognized in Fast Company, The Verge, Engadget, Ars Technica, and more.

We’re looking for a mid to senior-level Deep Learning Researcher to help us accelerate our technology development. Although your scope will later expand, you’ll start with owning R&D for one of our primary products Sharpen AI:
Develop and integrate better deep-learning models in three areas: shake reduction, focus correction, and general sharpening
Lead development on supplemental AI features like auto-masking or model selection
Explore new model research and development for sharpening images
We’re looking for a pretty specific person for this role - someone with a high work ethic, intellectual humility, and a shipping mentality. We’re a small company with a high-visibility and high-performance culture, so you will work with a high degree of impact and autonomy. This is an ideal role for an excellent ML researcher whose primary motivation is to see their work in the hands of thousands of real users.
Technical requirements
Prior key contributor to significant deep learning projects for image manipulation or enhancement
Significant prior experience with CNNs and other common computer vision network architectures
2 years of intensive hands-on experience with TensorFlow or other ML frameworks
Good understanding of common image processing algorithms
Proficient in C/C++, OpenCV.
Well-read on major recent research papers in deep learning for image or video enhancement
PhD preferred, but may consider MS or BS in Computer Science / Engineering
Our technology advantage has already driven 10% month-over-month active user growth for our company. This is a great opportunity for the perfect person to accelerate our technology and growth even further. Your compensation will be tied directly to the performance of the company. We’re also proud to offer 100% covered platinum-level medical/dental/vision for employees, 15 days annual PTO plus holidays, and 401k matching.",3.9,"Topaz Labs
3.9","Dallas, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
9,VMware Engineer,$59k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"VMware Engineer
Job Description
Apartments.com Infrastructure Engineer

OVERVIEW

CoStar Group is the parent of Apartments.com and is the #1 commercial real estate technology company. CoStar Group placed #15 in the Forbes World's Most Innovative Growth Companies list for 2017. CoStar Group, Inc placed #52 in the Fortune 100 Fastest Growing Companies list in 2018. Its leading brands includes Apartments.com, ApartmentFinder.com, ForRent.com, CoStar, LoopNet, LandsofAmerica and BizBuySell.

As an Infrastructure Engineer on the CoStar Group Infrastructure Team you will manage and improve all VMware, SAN and compute (UCS) solutions in a large scale hybrid data center operation.

The CoStar Group IT Infrastructure team oversees the design, delivery & upkeep of rapid solutions supporting a world-wide IT infrastructure.
Directly responsible for managing all the infrastructure that supports 7,000+ virtual machines (customer facing and internal), 10PB of storage spanning a variety of vendor arrays and storage protocols, and all server compute infrastructure for VMware and SQL servers.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Works on a team solely responsible for the design, delivery & upkeep of the virtual infrastructure, storage, compute and disaster prevention at CoStar Group.
Work to optimize and scale a large converged and hyperconverged infrastructure to meet the growing demands of the company.
Enhance and create scripts that automate and provision large numbers of VMs, ESXi modifications, UCS hosts and SAN LUNs.
Use monitoring tools & scripts to identify performance bottlenecks and implement fixes accordingly.
Streamline the server build, firmware patching, storage provisioning processes and All-Flash storage migrations.

BASIC QUALIFICATIONS

Outline B.S. in Computer Science or a Related Field is required
3+ years experience working with infrastructure systems as they relate to virtualization, compute, storage and backups.
Required to have 1+ years of experience automating complex tasks using tools such as PowerShell, PowerCLI, UCS PowerTools, Posh-SSH, Git, Python, Chef, or Puppet. Experience working with REST APIs is a plus.
At least 2 of the following required:
Experience with large-scale virtualization (1000+ VM) environments using technologies such as VMware vCenter, vSAN, vROps, vRealize Orchestrator, vLog Insight and PowerCli.
Storage area network (SAN) experience supporting multiple arrays (Pure Storage, HP 3PAR, EMC VNX, Netapp E-Series, EMC Isilon, EMC DataDomain, Compellent). Fibre Channel and iSCSI. Automates SAN operations such as LUN (de)provisioning and snapshot management.
Manages multiple Cisco UCS domains via UCS Central with global service profiles and UCS PowerTools. Design and create new domains as needed, monitor capacity on LAN and storage fabric.
Strong Windows Server experience as it relates to storage provisioning and Microsoft Clustering.
Familiarity with an enterprise backup solution such as Commvault, Netbackup, Veeam, etc
One or more related certifications such as VMware VCDX, VMware VCAP, VMware VCP, VMware VCIX, EMC EMCISA, EMCSA, Pure Storage Certified Architect Professional, HPE ATP – Storage Solutions V2, Cisco DCUCS, Cisco DCUCI, Cisco CCNP Data Center.

PREFERRED QUALIFCATIONS AND SKILLS

Experience working at a Managed Service Provider is a plus.

Working Hours

Normal working hours are standard Monday through Friday business hours. However, this position also requires participation in a periodic 24x7 on-call rotation and off hour's maintenance windows

OVERVIEW OF COMPANY:

Founded in 1987, CoStar Group is the leading provider of commercial real estate information, analytics, and online marketplaces. Our suite of online services enables clients to analyze, interpret and gain unmatched insight on commercial property values, market conditions and current availability. Behind some of the most well-known brands in the industry, CoStar Group includes CoStar, the largest provider of CRE research and real-time data; LoopNet, the most heavily trafficked mobile and online real estate marketplace; Apartments.com, the premier rental home resource for renters, property managers and owners; STR, the leading provider of performance benchmarking and comparative analytics to the hotel industry; BizBuySell, the largest online marketplace for businesses-for-sales; and Lands of America, the leading operator of online marketplaces for rural real estate.

Headquartered in Washington, DC, CoStar Group maintains offices throughout the U.S. and in Europe, Canada, and Asia with a staff of over 4,300 worldwide.

WHATS IN IT FOR YOU:

Working at CoStar Group means you'll enjoy a culture of collaboration and innovation that attracts the best and brightest across a broad range of disciplines. In addition to generous compensation and performance-based incentives, you'll be supported in both your professional and academic growth with internal training, tuition reimbursement, and an inter-office exchange program.

Our benefits package includes (but is not limited to):

Comprehensive healthcare coverage: Medical / Vision / Dental / Prescription Drug
Life, legal, and supplementary insurance
Commuter and parking benefits
401(K) retirement plan with matching contributions
Employee stock purchase plan
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
On-site fitness center and/or reimbursed fitness center membership costs (location dependent), with yoga studio, Pelotons, personal training, group exercise classes, as well as Segways and bikes available for use during the day
Complimentary gourmet coffee, tea, hot chocolate, prepared foods, fresh fruit, and other healthy snacks

Be part of a team of professionals enjoying the opportunity to learn, do, and grow in a rewarding atmosphere. But don't just take our word for it - see why our team chose to work at and stay at CoStar Group:",3.1,"CoStar Group
3.1","Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1987,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
10,"Senior Data Scientist, Zoro",-1,"Company Summary:
Zoro.com is an eCommerce company that sells business supplies, equipment, and tools—but we’re much more than just a website. We’re a team of people who win and lose together (we prefer winning!). Since 2011, Zoro has been working hard to make it easy for our customers to purchase everything they need to make their businesses go. Zoro currently offers 3 million products, fast and free shipping, no-hassle returns, and exceptional customer service. We’ve grown quickly in a short time, recently surpassing 400 team members and reaching annual revenue of over $500 million. Add to that our award-winning culture—we were named a Great Place to Work for 2019-20, among other accolades—and we think Zoro is a pretty amazing place to work and grow.

Primary Function:
Our Sr. Data Scientists are key contributors to the development of Zoro’s customer, product, eCommerce, and pricing plans. The Data Science team covers a broad scope of projects including customer segmentation, A/B testing, marketing investment optimization, predictive modeling, promotion forecasting, and pricing analysis. We are closely integrated with our business leaders and support their ability to make critical decisions. At Zoro, you will be challenged by new questions every day.

Duties and Responsibilities:

Lead data science projects from beginning to end: develop and refine the idea, create a project plan and methodology, collaborate with business partners, execute, and provide recommendations for the company
Collaborate with other data scientists to develop and implement algorithms, write code, evaluate relevant academic research, and deliver outputs
Advise the company about tools, data sources, and best practices to facilitate digital marketing, pricing, and web analytics
Build predictive and inference models using Python and R to support business initiatives in the areas of customer acquisition, activation, engagement, retention, or channel investment optimization
Document code and data science processes that are critical to the company, and develop strategies to ensure those processes are robust and fault-tolerant
Communicate findings to business leaders and colleagues using data visualizations, presentations, and written means

Qualifications:

Experience leading data science projects that have a direct impact on company objectives
Demonstrated ability to assist business decision-making through data mining and machine learning
Strong communication skills to collaborate effectively with business stakeholders. Must be able to interact cross-functionally and drive both business and technical discussions
5+ years’ progressive business experience in areas including marketing analytics, database marketing, data mining, or statistical modeling. Experience using data science or advanced analytics in an Internet retailer or a top-tier consumer-focused company is required
Ability to translate complex business problems into project plans and solve them by analyzing large amounts of data
Familiarity with Python or R for statistical modeling, clustering, classification, machine learning, and data mining
Demonstrated proficiency in SQL and cloud-hosted data platforms (Google Cloud Platform, AWS, etc)
Familiarity with BI tools such as Tableau or Looker, and ability to communicate results to business partners
Master’s degree preferred in quantitative fields such as Statistics, Engineering, Operational Research, or Economics
Knowledge of web tracking technology and web analytics tools (Google Analytics, Adobe Analytics, etc.) a definite plus

Final note: We share a commitment to our Zoro values – Win & Lose Together (We prefer winning!), Take Ownership, We Are Transparent, and Aspire to be Customer-Obsessed. Everything we do at Zoro is centered around delighting our customers. It's a natural extension of our company culture and how we care for each other. We believe when we act in ways that are consistent with these values, we can solve any technical challenge that lies ahead of us. As a Zoro employee, you can expect to work with smart, energetic people, learn something every day, and be valued for your perspective.

Zoro is an Equal Opportunity Workplace and an Affirmative Action Employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.",2.0,"Zoro Tools
2.0","Chicago, IL",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
11,Software Engineer with background in ML/NLP: Full-Time Position,-1,"Who We Are: *
We are turning contract execution on its head through AI-powered technology that delivers an automated contract mark-up process that instantaneously reviews and revises contracts. Powered by proprietary machine learning and natural language processing, our technology greatly speeds up a company’s high-volume contract drafting and negotiation processes, saving precious time and money. BlackBoiler is a must-have for in-house legal teams, service providers, and law firms. We are growing quickly and looking for team members to help us scale.

Description:

We are looking for a smart, inquisitive person to join our team working on our core product. This is an exciting position that will contribute significantly to BlackBoiler’s proprietary automated document editing functionality, and we encourage applicants with a demonstrated understanding of the process required to take projects from research and development to production ready environments. You should have 4-6 years of post-undergraduate work experience (excluding internship and school projects) in developing Machine Learning and Natural Language Processing applications in Python. Additionally, someone with an appreciation for rigor in development processes and automation would fit right in. It is still early days for us, and we are a small team. This means that you would need to be interested in wearing multiple hats: developer, operations engineer, quality assurance, and whatever new hats need to be worn. We can promise you that you will get exposed to multiple aspects of Software Development and have fun doing it.
*
Minimum requirements: *
*
Experience writing Python applications for production environments
*
Experience or background in Machine Learning and Natural Language Processing
*
Experience with deploying applications on cloud infrastructures
*
Experience deploying ML and NLP models to cloud-based environments
*
Well-rounded computer science background
Additional experience: *
*
Experience with writing unit, functional and regression tests for developed code
*
Understanding of secure development practices
*
Understanding of the legal industry desirable, but not required
*
Experience integrating with 3rd party vendor platforms
*
Managing small-to-medium sized projects for production systems
Salary, Benefits, and other Details: *
*
Location: D.C./Maryland/Virginia
*
Employment: Full-time, flexible schedule, and mostly remote work
*
Salary Range: $110K to $125K, commensurate with experience
*
Benefits: Good health, dental, and vision insurance as well as a 401(k) plan
*
Equity: 0.20% to 0.50%
*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $110,000.00 - $125,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Parental Leave
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
This job is temporarily remote until at least Q1 2021. After that, the successful should expect to report to our office in the Arlington, VA at least twice a week.

Experience:
Natural Language Processing: 3 years (Preferred)
Python: 4 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Arlington, VA 22205 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
Do you have 3 or more years of full-time work experience in software engineering (excluding graduate education, internships, and class projects) after receiving your bachelor's degree in computer science?
This Job Is:
A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply
Company's website:
www.blackboiler.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"BlackBoiler, Inc.","Arlington, VA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
12,Electrical Engineer II,-1,"Who Are We?

QinetiQ Inc. is a leading innovator with over 25 years of experience rapidly developing advanced C5ISR sensor solutions and is a renowned world leader in robotics and autonomy.

The combined QinetiQ U.S. business unit brings capabilities across the full lifecycle of technology development from applied research and development to rapid prototyping, testing, fielding, and sustainment. Our expertise with unmanned platforms, broad sensing modalities, and cross-domain interoperability ensures that we deliver integrated solutions for Warfighter dominance in all phases of combat.

We are a world-class team of professionals who deliver next generation technology and products in robotic and autonomous platforms and systems, ground systems, soldier systems, maritime systems, airborne sensors and payloads, processing and exploitation capabilities, and integrated C2 solutions. Much of our work contributes to innovative research in ﬁelds such as sensor science, signal processing, data fusion, artiﬁcial intelligence (AI), machine learning (ML), and augmented reality (AR).

Our customers are always our number one priority and we consistently deliver Mission-Led Innovation to empower and protect our Defense and Security forces in the U.S. and abroad.

Your Contribution to Our Mission:

Support our experienced engineering staff in the design and development of EO/IR Sensor Systems and Embedded Electronics/Computing Systems for military applications.

Work with a dynamic team of Electrical, Electronic and Firmware Engineers in the prototype development and transition/fielding of leading edge technologies supporting MTEQ’s military customer base.

Participate in the design, development and testing of these systems, alongside leading experts in their field as part of a multi-disciplinary development team.

To Land This Job, You Need:

BS or MS degree in Electrical Engineering or equivalent discipline.
Minimum of 3 years related experience.
Intimately familiar with BETSS-C, BSS, PSSG and GBOSS systems and any other PM FPS QRC programs.
Ability to work through electrical, network, & configuration with components of all systems.
Familiar with and experience in participating in the CM/CCB process to evaluate baseline programs and ECP/ECRs.
Ability to identify issues with these systems to develop field bulletins and solutions for deployed systems worldwide.
Ability to interpret and understand engineering drawings, documents, and procedures.
Experience creating preliminary concepts and schematics for custom electronics designs.
Experience selecting electronic components for new and existing designs.
Experience collaborating with other engineering disciplines to develop new and retrofit hardware designs.
Familiarity with equipment and methodology for testing, troubleshooting, and diagnostics of electrical and electronic equipment and systems

Clearance Level Must Be Able to Obtain:

DOD Secret

Why QinetiQ Inc.?

Your work will contribute to the protection of American Warfighters and Security Forces.
Opportunity to work with cutting edge technology.
Extensive opportunities for continuous learning, professional growth and advancement.
We only hire the best! No matter if you are entry or senior level, you will have the opportunity learn from some of the best in the industry.
We have fun! We regularly have company events, from luncheons and costume contests to golf tournaments.
We care about YOU and YOUR FAMILY. We offer competitive benefits and health insurance options.

No One Has Time for Long Job Applications!

We completely understand. That is why we have made the application process easy. We promise. This will be simple.

Accessibility/Accommodation:

If because of a medical condition or disability, you need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to staffing@us.qinetiq.com or call (540) 658-2720 Opt 4 and let us know the nature of your request and your contact information.

QinetiQ Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.5,"QinetiQ Inc.
3.5","Lorton, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2001,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
13,Senior Digital Signal Processing Engineer,-1,"Digital Signal Processing Engineer

US Citizenship is required due to security clearance requirements,

At Expedition Technology, we push the boundaries of what is possible every day. Our engineers excel in tackling traditional signal processing problems and creating novel solutions using machine learning/deep learning algorithms. We are one of a very few companies that has been successful in employing deep learning to traditional signal processing. Our collaborative culture is conducive to researching and developing the cutting-edge solutions our DOD and IC customers seek.

We are currently seeking like-minded engineers and developers to join our growing team. A successful candidate will have the privilege of driving research and development activities to enable automated machine learning techniques to detect, demodulate and exploit signals in complicated environments. Emphasis includes software defined radio design and development, spectrum analysis and channelization, adaptive beamforming, channel equalization, waveform analysis, signal coding and decoding.

Primary Responsibilities:

Develop, modify, and maintain digital signal processing algorithms
Create machine learning models/neural networks designed to glean intelligence from signal processing data
Maintain robust existing code and develop new code
Work on small teams on various machine-learning oriented R&D programs

Position Requirements:

Minimum 5 years related experience- preferably within Research & Development focused positions
Interest in extending state-of-the-art machine learning and deep learning research to traditional signal processing problems
Experience with some or all of the following: C, C++, Python, MatLab (Python preferred)
Experience and understanding of Detection & Estimation Theory
In depth understanding of spectral estimation, digital communication theory and/or information theory (need not have all three)
Prior experience with adaptive filtering and interference mitigation in challenging environments
Bachelor’s degree or higher in Electrical Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Computer Engineering, Mechanical Engineering or similar
Candidates holding active US Government clearances are highly desired- must at least be eligible to obtain a TS/SCI or higher
US Citizenship is required

Interested in joining our team? Let’s explore together!

Expedition Technology is an IBA company that offers self-directed, company-paid, comprehensive medical, dental and vision insurance, PTO, 401k with up to 12% company match, equity shares (SARs), student loan repayment options and a generous tuition reimbursement program. Most importantly, we offer an environment where we are encouraged to push boundaries, take risks and enjoy the rewards.

EXP is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer that believes a diverse range of talent creates an environment that fuels creativity and innovation. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, national origin, genetic information or protected veteran status.

Powered by JazzHR

M90ruzNxxD",5.0,"Expedition Technology, Inc.
5.0","Herndon, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
14,Electrical Service Engineer Career Opening,-1,"About*
_KVAL Inc. is a rapidly growing manufacturer of heavy industrial equipment for the door industry and we are looking to expand our support team. In particular, Kval designs and manufactures CNC machinery for the residential, commercial, and architectural door industries. We have been in Petaluma, CA since our founding in 1947 and are an exceptionally stable, conservative company currently in our fourth generation of private family ownership. As a family owned company, family values are deeply instilled within the company’s corporate culture. This means our new hires will not only be joining our team, but will be joining the Kval Machinery Family. As a family we learn to work well with one another, support each other, and build friendships in and outside of the workplace._
Electrical Service Engineer Job Description*
As an Electrical Service Engineer for Kval, Inc. you will be immersed in a fast-paced, technology-laden environment working closely with customers in order to research and resolve a wide array of electrical and CNC program issues remotely via telephone and, in cases where there is an internet connection, via Remote Access software.

Kval manufactures a wide range of equipment, utilizing several different types of machine control. Primarily, this includes Beckhoff PLC’s written in structured text, Idec PLC’s written using ladder logic, and Galil motion controllers written using Galil code. Kval’s more complex machines use multi-axis servo systems for positioning and for material routing. The Electrical Service Engineer is responsible for working with customers to identify and resolve issues with any of these types of systems. This will involve navigating machine programs, reading electrical schematics, and asking questions in order to diagnose issues on a machine. Additional work will involve loading programs on to PLC’s, servo drives, and variable frequency drives, performing remote software updates or bug fixes to machinery in the field, and developing upgrades for legacy machines. Creating and updating documentation that is used internally and by Kval’s customers. Creating BOMs for previously mentioned legacy machine upgrades.
Job Requirements*
· 4-Year Degree in an Engineering or Physical Science field

· Ability to research and resolve complex problems

· Excellent written and verbal communication skills

· Strong desire to learn new disciplines and ask questions as needed

· 1 year of customer service experience a plus

· Some travel will be required

· Programming skills/knowledge a plus
Skills and Experience*
· Experience with PLC programming and electrical

· Experience with motion controllers, Galil and/or Beckhoff motion controllers a huge plus.

· Experience with any programming language, coursework a plus.

· Electrical troubleshooting experience, with understanding of basic electrical principles

· Strong computer skills, e.g., using Microsoft products and troubleshooting networking issues.

· Ability to troubleshoot, test, repair and service technical equipment such as electrical, mechanical, pneumatic, hydraulic, and CNC-controlled components. Mechanical, pneumatic and hydraulic systems are important to know, but the emphasis will be on electrical and CNC-controlled components.
Understanding of air and electrical schematics as well as hand tools
Familiarity with hand tools and electrical testing
Problem solving/decision making skills
Advanced Time Management skills
Experience using AutoCAD, SolidWorks a plus
Ability to take leadership of a project
Generous Benefit Package: *
· 90% Employer Paid Health Coverage; Kaiser, Blue Shield

· 80% Employer Paid: Dental

· Vision Coverage

· FSA

· 25K Life Insurance policy, LTD, AD& D employer paid

· Holiday paid time off

· Vacation Pay

· PTO/Sick Time paid

· Christmas Bonus

· 401(k) with Employer Match

· Birthday's celebrated monthly with Bagels and Donuts!!!

· Employee Barbecues and Special company paid events

· Family oriented Employer

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $52,000.00 - $65,000.00 per year

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",3.5,"KVAL Inc.
3.5","Petaluma, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
15,Vision Algorithm Programmer/Engineer,-1,"Are you passionate about writing software to analyze images?

Do you enjoy playing with Arduino boards, or Raspberry PI?

Are you fascinated by neural networks, deep learning, and all things AI?

Are you seeking a challenging job that is never boring?

We challenge you to apply to join our team today!

Responsibilities:
Design and develop system software for automated control of processes.
Design and develop system software for automated inspection of product quality using machine vision and image processing.
Program PCs and/or PLCs for automation.
Support and improve existing customer automation systems.
Support deployment at customers
On-going support and gradual improvement over the life-cycle of an automation system.
Requirements:
BS in Electrical Engineering, Automation Engineering, Computer Engineering or Computer Science.
MUST HAVE-Solid understanding of computer programming and software development.
MUST HAVE-Ability to program algorithms using C++, C# or C.
Ability to create basic graphical user interfaces (GUI, HMI or MMI) for operator control.
Knowledge of image processing concepts and algorithms.
Good Project Management skills.
Ability to work independently.
Job Highlights:
Highly competitive compensation
Work for a small and highly mobile engineering firm
Very flexible schedule
Perfect situation for an individual motivated to succeed and grow
Software running on multiple platforms, from embedded to PLCs, PCs using Windows or Linux
Ability to wear multiple hats, learn multiple systems/strategies, develop own ideas
Skills/Qualifications/Keywords:

Automation, engineer, algorithms, vision, image processing, systems, project management, GUI, programming

Job Type: Full-time",1.5,"Solvis, INC
1.5","Knoxville, TN",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
16,Digital Transformation Engineer,-1,"Digital Transformation Engineer

Job Details
Job Location
Caltrol Territory - NV-AZ-HI, CA
Position Type
Full Time
Description
Caltrol is Hiring a Digital Transformation Engineer for Caltrol’s Territory!

Caltrol, Inc is looking for a full-time Digital Transformation Engineer to support both the sales and services teams in the Industrial Digital Transformation (IIOT) space. The primary focus of this role is Digital Transformation, including hardware and software necessary to implement our clients’ push into IIOT, but also includes learning to be a product/subject matter expert for Emerson’s Online and Wireless Vibration Monitoring Solutions.

The ideal candidate would have a background in Automation, Process Control Engineering or IT Network Management that worked in an industrial environment and be self-motivated with the ability to work safely without direct supervision in a stressful environment.

Caltrol is an employee-owned company offering a competitive salary, employee stock ownership opportunities, Medical, Vision and Dental within 60 days of hire, 401K with employer stock match, and many more benefits!

Primary Responsibilities:
Work as part of an engineering team to develop, install, and commission technologies to complete the scope of Digital Transformation projects.
Assist in troubleshooting and tuning of field devices and networks to allow increased reliability to our customers.
Travel to site to assist in sales efforts regarding quotation of work and creation of Bill of Materials for a project.
Participate in continued learning to grow both technical and non-technical skillsets.
Travel to site to assist in support of commissioning and technical troubleshooting
Support and lead activities for project engineers including the following:
System architecture and design
Knowledgeable about Industrial Networking
Lead Factory Acceptance Testing
System/Mechanical Installations
Commissioning
Customer training
Support Emerson’s Reliability Digital Transformation Systems sales as a junior Subject Matter Expert in the following Emerson products.
Asset Performance Platform (Plantweb Optics)
Principle Analytics (Plantweb Advisor)
Rotating Equipment and Instrument & Valve Analysis/Diagnostic software (AMS – Machine Works and Device Manager)
Rotating Equipment Monitoring Hardware (AMS 6500 and AMS 9420 systems)
Skills:
Effective verbal and written communication skills
Must be computer literate (MS Office and other PC platforms)
Ability to perform field tasks under pressure
Required:
3 years PLC and/or DCS experience
IT and/or OT experience
Safety Conscious – Adherence to all industry related Safety and Health Regulations
Physical requirements include the ability to climb ladders, work in confined spaces, work on elevated platforms, and able to lift 50 lbs
Live near a major airport to enable 50% travel within Caltrol’s territory, including AZ, CA, HI, and NV
Preferred:
Familiar with industrial environment
Cisco Wireless Plant Networks
OSi Pi experience
Emerson Machinery Health Platforms including the Plantweb Optics Platform
Advanced Analytics Software
IT Networking Certifications a plus
Knowledge of Cloud and Edge based technology and deployment
Qualifications",3.2,"Caltrol
3.2",Nevada,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1934,Company - Private,Other Retail Stores,Retail,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
17,Software Engineer 3,$55k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"Opportunity - Experienced Software Engineer - Lots of DATA!

The award-winning Choice Hotels Technology Center is revolutionizing hospitality with cloud computing, AWS, big data, machine learning/artificial intelligence, and mobile application development.

At Choice, we pioneer the exciting intersection of hospitality and technology in support of our successful franchise model. Our culture fosters innovation and encourages disruptive thinking. We welcome and respect your voice, empowering you to learn, grow, and make your impact.

When you #MakeItYourChoice, you will have the environment, the tools, and momentum to drive your career and organizational success.

This role is part of the Data Domain “where all our data flows”. This team leverages new technologies to ingest large amounts of data from difference sources and provides meaningful information for business decisions . Do you have Java or an OO language, Relational Database, and AWS Redshift experience ?

As a Team Lead, you will guide the team to:

Write correct and clean code with guidance; consistently follows stated best practices and guidelines
Participate in technical design of features with guidance from enterprise and application architects, senior and principal software engineers
Sets up the programming environment, ensuring appropriate directory structures are present, the source code control utilities are configured properly, the associated LDAP settings have been made, and the necessary access permissions have been granted.
Document and program the specified coding changes outlined by the technical requirements. Ensures the source code and the associated comments conform to the standards set forth by the senior development staff. Participates in source code reviews throughout the development process. Initiates, monitors, and documents development status updates during the software release cycle.
Attainis expertise in one or more areas (e.g., Java/Spark/Redshift/Kafka) of development, performance best practices, efficient use of data stores, messaging, etc
Lead a team of software engineers in the process of software development by applying best practices and following design guidelines.
Authors and analyzes business use cases and functional requirements for software system implementations. Assists with the customer communication and business analysis necessary to create functional requirements.
Able to own small-to-medium features from technical design through completion
Be self-sufficient in at least one large area of the codebase (multiple services in a pillar, all frontend code related to a main funnel flow) with a high-level understanding of other components
Provide on-call support for your area including systems that you may not be familiar with
Identifies and defines reusable software components. Assists with the software component architectures, component interface specifications, and system designs necessitated by the functional requirements.
Can be called upon to give technical interviews to candidates

The Team

A tightknit team where you can enhance your skills in an environment that emphasizes creativity, sharing, teamwork, professionalism, and outstanding quality software.
Work alongside some of the most talented and dynamic professionals as they work to provide exceptional solutions to the many challenges our business and franchises face.
This team is serious, laser focused, and is able to deliver on projects on short deadlines.
Enjoys working with the latest technologies, possesses business acumen, technically savvy, and has customer-facing skills.
On this team, you will work hard, learn and grow.

Required:

Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, or related STEM field, from a four-year college or university, or one to two years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Relevant industry certification, such as Oracle Java Developer, is preferred.
7+ years relevant experience in software development, information systems, or equivalent technical environment, including previous experience in the development of highly transactional, mission critical applications in heterogeneous environments/architectures for multi-user systems.
E xceptional analytical skills
Experience debugging distributed systems with high data loads
Excellent written and verbal communication skills with the ability to interface with internal/external people at all levels
Exceptional interpersonal skills and demeanor
Capable of prioritizing tasks
Learns quickly and makes steady progress without the need for constant significant feedback from more senior engineers; knows when to ask for help to get unblocked

Proficiency with the following technologies:

Java Strongly proficient (version 1.6 and beyond preferred)
Relational databases (Oracle, SQL Server, etc.) required
AWS Redshift required
Unix/Linux and one of the many shells
Spring, SpringBoot or similar MVC framework preferred
Object Oriented architecture preferred
Spark, AWS EMR, HDFS, Kafka, Hive, Impala preferred
AWS (S3, SQS, SNS, EC2) preferred
NoSQL preferred

Ability to model Choice’s Cultural Values: Welcome and Respect Everyone, Be Bold, Be Quick, Listen, Be Curious and Show Integrity.",3.7,"Choice Hotels
3.7","Phoenix, AZ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1939,Company - Public,"Hotels, Motels, & Resorts",Travel & Tourism,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
18,"Software Support Engineer (Application, SQL, Windows)",-1,"Our Mission*
Thousands of life sciences laboratories worldwide depend on Artel technology to ensure the integrity of their test results. By providing powerful instrument-based systems and specifically targeted services, we are making it possible for laboratories in drug discovery & development, clinical diagnostics, forensics, genomics & proteomics, and other laboratories running critical test procedures to have total confidence in their results - while maintaining compliance and optimizing productivity.
The Company*
Artel is the global technology leader in ultra-low volume liquid measurement and liquid handling quality assurance. Artel calibration and verification systems are unsurpassed for accuracy, precision, and ease of use. These products utilize Artel proprietary technology to ensure and optimize the performance of laboratory instrumentation such as automated liquid handlers and handheld pipettes. Artel value-added services, based on Artel technology and the most rigorous in the industry, are key ingredients for our customers in their quest to optimize laboratory productivity, compliance, and quality.

Artel’s people – through their innovation in technology and their focus on helping our customers tackle their most critical challenges – are making significant contributions to the speed of development of new pharmaceutical products, the dependability of clinical diagnostic results, the accuracy of forensic tests, and the containment of health care costs. We are fortunate to be involved in an exciting, growing, and challenging field – and are gratified that our world-class efforts have put us in a leadership position.
Your Opportunity*
To support the expanded application of Artel technology and continued growth of our customer base throughout the country, we are adding a Software Support Engineer. This is an opportunity to be part of a team that is pre-eminent in the life science lab industry – in providing and supporting innovative technology to leading laboratory customers who insist on the integrity of all their laboratory test results. You will learn and apply the technologies critical to high accuracy and precision laboratory liquid handling, exercise your ability to develop and communicate solutions to problems under challenging conditions, gain exposure to a wide variety of laboratories, and earn the satisfaction of helping customers who are running critical assays gain confidence in the quality and efficiency of their assays, methods, instrumentation and techniques. In addition, you will play a large contributing role in launching a new hardware and software product to our customers and new prospects by the end of this year.

As part of the Artel family, you will see how Artel strives to create a work environment that motivates and inspires all our employees to be the best they can be, and to achieve personally meaningful goals which make a difference to the world and of which they can be proud. Employees rate the company culture, team spirit and support of career opportunities as key ingredients in their professional growth and personal job satisfaction.
Job Description

The new addition to our Technical Services team will be challenged with a multi-faceted set of activities, and must be organized, flexible, energetic, motivated, and insightful. An understanding, familiarity, and proven facility with SQL Server and Windows based applications support are the foundation for this position; exceptional communications and relationship building skills – the quality which sets the Artel team apart from our peers in this industry – are the hallmarks of an Artel Software Support Engineer.

You will be depended upon to provide advanced remote technical support for our n-tier on-premise software platform backed by Microsoft SQL Server, both directly with customers via phone, email, and remote meetings. You will also be acting as field support for our team performing on-site Installation Qualification and Operational Qualification of our instruments and liquid handling software applications. Technical support and issue resolution calls will be escalated to you from end-users, customer IT departments, and other Technical Services team members. Typical escalated calls may include supporting DB server migration, communication issues either with SQL Server or an instrument, and field team members experiencing permissions related issues while installing the application or database.

You will also need to build expertise in the operation of our next generation software to answer advanced usage questions for the application’s scheduling, reporting, and calibration capabilities.

The successful candidate will be acting as a bridge between our Technical Services team and the Product Development team. The development team will be relying on you to provide escalated case updates, trends, and Design for Supportability requirements for future revisions of the platform and new product development.

Frequent travel is not expected for this position (0-10%). Support after and before normal work hours is occasionally needed to triage and assist international customers and distributors.
Qualifications*
· A high degree of personal accountability and integrity.

· Superior work ethic, self-motivation, ability to prioritize, multi-task and work independently.

· Ability to support SQL Server installation, configuration, maintenance, and administration issues remotely including guiding customers through using SSMS.

· Ability to handle Windows environment related issues for installation, permissions, application services, and driver installation.

· Understanding of and experience with Active Directory, SMTP, Windows and 3rd party firewalls, antivirus exception rules, and Windows security policy management.

· Experience with configuring serial devices for communication and troubleshooting USB device drivers (printers, barcode scanners, etc).

· Comfort parsing highly detailed log and trace files to find root cause.

· Familiarity with bug tracking and ticketing tools, ideally JIRA.

· Experience writing technical instructions for and training other support team members, customer IT resources, and end users.

· Comfort and capability with information technology (MS Office, SalesForce, or other CRM, Cloudsuite or other ERP); laboratory informatics skills a plus.

· Familiarity with regulations and standards including GMP, GLP, ISO; capability to operate in a regulated customer environment.

· Skills and speed in problem solving, troubleshooting, and replicating customer reported issues, including building virtual machines to replicate customer environments.

· Exceptional interpersonal and communication skills in speech and writing.

· A high degree of professionalism, comportment appropriate to being an Artel ambassador to our customers.

· Authorization to work in the U.S. without the need for employer sponsorship.
Education and Experience*
· Undergraduate degree in the sciences, completed with superior academic results. (Consideration will be applied to a candidate having a strong record of previous SQL Server and Windows based application technical support experience, in lieu of degree.)

· 5+ years of supporting a commercially available on-premise software platform through multiple releases.

· 3+ years of experience in supporting SQL Server issues such as establishing database connectivity in complex network topography, backup, restoration, and custom queries for diagnosing issues.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
To keep our employees safe, we are maintaining work from home opportunities for those that are able, requiring daily temperature checks for anyone entering the building, providing face masks, and hard surface cleaning throughout at least 1x per day.

Ability to Commute/Relocate:
Westbrook, ME (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
SQL: 3 years (Preferred)
Java: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Relocation Assistance Provided:
No
Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:
No: Not providing sponsorship for this job
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://www.artel.co/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",2.7,"Artel
2.7","Westbrook, ME",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
19,Machine Learning Services Engineer (MLE),$104k-$163k (Glassdoor Est.),"· 2+ years of non-internship professional software development experience
· Programming experience with at least one modern language such as Java, C++, or C# including object-oriented design
· 1+ years of experience contributing to the architecture and design (architecture, design patterns, reliability and scaling) of new and current systems.
· Masters degree or equivalent work experience in Machine Learning.
· Solid communication skills and ability to work well in a team are critical.
· Advance the design and architecture of our existing systems to make them more maintainable, easy to use, and operationally sound
· Ability to work in a fast paced and agile development environment.
· Work Hard, Have Fun, Make History

Amazon is looking for a passionate, talented, and inventive ML Engineers (Software Development Engineers with a strong ML background) to help invent new machine learning-powered features for Amazon QuickSight. We want to work with you to revolutionize the way people manage, visualize and interact with large amounts of data.
Amazon QuickSight is revolutionizing Business Intelligence by empowering anyone to use the power of machine learning and Amazon AI to enhance their understanding of data. QuickSight can already help discover hidden insights using Anomaly Detection, enable ML-powered forecasting, and use automatic text generation generate business narratives directly from the data. But we're not stopping here, we remain with helping our customers harness the power of artificial intelligence to help them understand and visualize their data.
Amazon is an Equal Opportunity Employer – Minority / Women / Disability / Veteran / Gender Identity / Sexual Orientation / Age

· Masters or PhD in Computer Science or Engineering with 2+ years of relevant software services development
· Experience and interest in databases, structured records, distributed systems, and Machine Learning on in a structured data context.
· Leadership experience in a team delivering remarkable user experiences in industry leading products
· Work experience delivering one or more version one products",3.9,"Amazon.com Services LLC
3.9","Seattle, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
20,Machine Learning Engineer,$68k-$123k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Group Highlights

Perspecta Labs

Perspecta Labs generates transformative applied research to fuel solutions for our customers’ unique challenges. We are a self-sustaining research center within Perspecta that provides applied research and engineering to enable government agencies, utilities and commercial enterprises to fully exploit the future of communications, analytics and cyber security.

Responsibilities

Perspecta has an exciting opportunity for a Machine Learning Software Engineer to aid on the development of machine learning models and the software that is needed for the training and deployment of these machine learning model. In addition, the qualified candidate will engineer both structure and unstructured data that will be fed to and taken from the machine learning models. Because the qualified candidate will be working closely with the Data Scientist, the candidate must have general understanding of machine learning. This position is located onsite at Picatinny Arsenal, NJ.

Qualifications

Bachelor's Degree in Physics, Mathematics, Electrical, Computer, or Software Engineering
3 -5 years experience developing machine learning models in areas such as classification from video, object detection and classification, and reinforcement learning.
Experience with machine learning algorithms such as Neural Networks, Boosting algorithms, Decision Trees, etc.
Software development experience in Python and/or C++ Experience in software design and development Experience with TensorFlow and other machine learning libraries
Broad knowledge in current machine learning techniques and ability to adapt novel techniques to research questions

Preferred Skills:

Familiarity with reinforcement learning and computer vision techniques would be a plus
Good Communication and Presentation skills are a plus. E
xperience with Linux is highly desirable.

The successful candidate must be a U.S. Citizen and possess and be able to maintain a DOD Secret Security Clearance, as a qualification and condition for employment.

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Wharton, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
21,Machine Learning Engineer,$76k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Machine Learning Engineer

US Citizenship is required due to security clearance requirements.

Are you a motivated engineer who is passionate about embracing new challenges and solving the hardest technical problems in a team-oriented environment? Every day, the engineers at Expedition Technology work together to solve our Nations defense and intelligence challenges by using Machine Learning and Deep Learning to demystify data obtained from signals and images.

Our applied research and development mindset afford our people the opportunity to work on the most cutting-edge methods of optimizing deep learning networks, developing state-of-the-art algorithms and ultimately producing software products that are critical to our nations defense infrastructure.

The success we have already achieved has made Expedition Technology one of the top Machine Learning/Deep Learning research organizations in the Defense and Intelligence communities and we need additional intelligent, passionate, creative people to join our team.

When you join our team, youll have the opportunity to:
Dive directly into the latest computer vision and signal processing research to replicate new techniques published in academia and find ways to make those ideas work on a larger scale
Use your strong Python coding skills to research, design, develop and expand upon algorithms that will train neural networks to deliver actionable intelligence faster and more effectively
Develop deep-learning software prototypes that demonstrate potential usefulness to our customers
Analyze data from disparate sources including images, video, radar, signals and more
Brainstorm solutions to the toughest problems alongside a team of smart, creative, passionate engineers
Participate in machine learning brownbag sessions and other forms of collaborative learning to keep abreast of the constant changes in Machine and Deep Learning
Required skills:
Strong problem-solving skills combined with deep intellectual curiosity and the desire to push technical boundaries
Strong coding skills- preferably in Python, C/C++, Julia or other object-oriented language in a Linux environment
Software development skills and the desire to work on cutting edge development in a Cloud environment
Deep understanding of data structures and algorithms
Knowledge of computer vision and/or signal processing including techniques for classification and feature extraction
Excellent oral, written, presentation and communication skills
Bachelors degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering or related field. Advance degrees welcome
US Citizenship- Must be a US Citizen eligible to maintain a US Government security clearance
Desired skills:
Experience with deep learning frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Caffe or Keras
About Expedition Technology

At Expedition Technology, we push the boundaries of what is possible every day. Our engineers work on the most challenging problems in Computer Vision, Digital Signal Processing and Software Engineering from a Machine Learning/Deep Learning perspective and collaborate to find the answers. We are a research-focused company whose mission it is to solve our customers most pressing needs in a creative, novel manner.

Expedition Technology offers self-directed, company-paid Medical, Dental and Vision benefits and the freedom to allow you to select which benefits matter most. We offer a 401k with a generous company match, a student loan repayment program, equity shares, paid holidays, paid time off and an education reimbursement allowance. Most importantly, we offer an environment where we are encouraged to push boundaries, take risks and enjoy the rewards.

Interested in joining our team? Lets explore together.

EXP is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer that believes a diverse range of talent creates an environment that fuels creativity and innovation. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, national origin, genetic information or protected veteran status.

Powered by JazzHR",5.0,"Expedition Technology, Inc.
5.0","Herndon, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
22,Data Scientist,$80k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

MMIT is growing from the leading drug coverage data business into a comprehensive, integrated market access company serving pharmaceutical manufacturers, health insurers, PBMs and healthcare IT companies. Their suite of applications is designed to manage an ever-changing proprietary set of pharmacy and medical benefit information and to provide a structured view of complex market access information. By embedding their data and SaaS applications across healthcare, they help ensure transparency, consistency and informed prescription decisions across the MMIT Network. They partner with hundreds of payers and pharma manufacturers ensuring that their products continually capture and analyze coverage and restriction criteria for more than 98% covered lives.

Team Overview

The MMIT Product Management Team is charged with developing, growing and maintaining the MMIT product portfolio that smooth access to lifechanging therapies. This entails managing products through all phases of the product lifecycle, from concept to sunset. The product management team embraces a market-backed perspective, champions unmet client needs, and is committed to a highly accountable and collaborative Product Management approach.

Job Description

MMIT is seeking experienced Data Scientists to meaningful contributes to the growth and development of the MMIT product portfolio. Ideal candidates are comfortable working with large, complex data sets to help inform, simplify and actualize key product capabilities. They will have comfort collaborating with various stakeholders and navigating ambiguity with limited direction. They will dedicate themselves to understanding the MMIT product portfolio (both current capabilities and future product roadmaps) and key data dependencies to inform data models, architecture, and new product development.

To succeed in this role, you will apply your skillset to

· Inform, create and/or maintain master data hierarchy, attributes and structure.

· Bridge claims data and coverage data – Refine existing rules and create and continually improve new methods for accurately assigning pharmacy and medical claims volumes to MMIT controller entities

· Apply data science to the creation of short and long form geographic market and controller entity descriptive narratives (NLP / NLG)

· Translate product management strategy into actionable data science deliverables, guiding development of data models, business rules and other advanced analytical capabilities

· Excel at communicating across a broad set of cross-functional stakeholders.

· Work collaboratively with MMIT product and data teams to develop and/or commercialize analytics use cases that may include market access, coverage / lives, and RWE data

· Effectively partner with external organizations including clients and vendors to develop meaning and projectable analytics about trends in market access dynamics across payers, geographies, indications, drugs, etc.

· Identify and evaluate additional data sources that could be integrated in value enhancing ways.

· Build reports, dashboards and/or other analyses as needed and/or as specific initiatives arise.

· Support various commercial or commercialization efforts as needed.

· Take a leading role in developing data science as a discipline across product management, development and data operations.

Qualifications

Relevant Skills and Experiences

· Postgraduate degree or higher involving machine learning, statistics, or computer science

· Experience of statistical / machine learning projects in academia or commercial sector end to end with proven delivery capability including capturing requirements, designing analysis plans, interfacing with clients and report / manuscript writing

· Experience in applying Natural Language Processing and related AI capabilities.

· Experience working with large and complex healthcare datasets, preferably patient-level longitudinal data and experience with studies of treatment effectiveness/outcomes, disease progression, adherence, healthcare utilization, patient journey, sales targeting, prescription/procedure volumes/shares, provider networks and prescribing/treatment patterns, etc

· Strong related programming skills including experience with good coding practices and a thorough understanding of the data science package landscape. Familiarity with Tableau and PowerBI a plus.

· Familiarity with agile software development practices

· Excellent written and spoken communication skills, including ability to present technical concepts to lay audiences, write analysis plans for projects, contribute to proposals / grant applications, pitch ideas effectively and persuasively to clients / internal stakeholders, etc.

· Demonstrated ability to work both collaboratively to solve complex problems and individually to research/advance areas of interest and exploration

· Proven ability to develop meaningful/valuable analytic insights from multiple data sources and support value through commercialization

Preferred candidates may also have

· Experience supporting or launching Data and Analytics or SaaS-based enterprise product

· Experience in managed markets and pharma market access ecosystem

· Experience in the commercial health insurance industry

· Knowledge of payer marketing, drug development lifecycle and drug launch process

Additional Information

All your information will be kept confidential according to EEO guidelines.

Position will be based in Livingston NJ or Yardley PA

(highly qualified remote applicants will be considered)

Travel Requirements:

Approximately <10>",3.8,"MMIT
3.8","Yardley, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
23,Data Scientist,$83k-$135k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist

Language: English

Location: Memphis, TN

Travel: <10>

Buckman is a privately held, global specialty chemical company with headquarters in Memphis, TN, USA, committed to safeguarding the environment, maintaining safety in the workplace, and promoting sustainable development. Buckman delivers exceptional service and innovative solutions to our customers globally in the pulp and paper, leather, and water treatment sectors to help boost productivity, reduce risk, improve product quality, and provide a measurable return on investment. Buckman is in the middle of a digital transformation of its businesses and focused on building the capabilities and tools in support of this.

Position Summary
Buckman is seeking an experienced Data Scientist to lead the development of a Data Science program at our Memphis facility. You will work closely with Buckman stakeholders to derive deep industry knowledge across paper, water, leather, and performance chemical industries. You will help develop a data strategy for the company including collection of the right data, creation of the data science project portfolio, partnering with external providers, and augmenting capabilities with additional internal hires. A large part of the job is communicating and developing relationship with key stakeholders and subject matter experts to tee up proofs of concept projects to demonstrate how data science can be used to solve old problems in unique and novel ways. You will not have a large internal team to rely on, at least initially, so individual expertise, breadth of data science knowledge, and ability to partner with external companies will be essential for success. In addition to the pure data science problems, you will be working closely with a multi-disciplinary team consisting of sensor scientists, software engineers, network engineers, mechanical/electrical engineers, and chemical engineers in the development, and deployment of IoT solutions. If you like working for an entrepreneurial company with a Sustainability mission and digital ambitions at the core of its strategy, Buckman is the place for you.

Competencies Needed for Success
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative field such as Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics, Engineering, or Computer Science
5+ years of relevant working experience in an analytical role involving data extraction, analysis, and visualization
Expertise in one or more programming languages R, Python, MATLAB, JMP, Minitab, Java, C++, Scala
Key libraries such as Sklearn, XgBoost, GLMNet, Dplyr, ggplot, Rshiny
Experience and knowledge of data mining algorithms including supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques areas such as Gradient Boosting, Decision Trees, Multivariate Regressions, Logistic regressions, Neural Network, Random Forest, Support Vector Machine, Naive Bayes, Time Series, Optimization
Microsoft IoT/data science toolkit: Azure Machine Learning, Datalake, Datalake analytics, Workbench, IoT Hub, Stream Analytics, CosmosDB, Time Series Insights, PowerBI
Data querying languages (e.g. SQL, Hadoop/Hive) and Preferred Qualifications
A demonstrated record of success with a verifiable portfolio of problems tackled
Preferred Qualifications
Master’s or PhD degree in a quantitative field such as Data Science, Statistics, Applied Mathematics, Physics, Engineering, or Computer Science
Experience in the specialty chemicals sector or similar industry
Background in engineering, especially Chemical Engineering
Experience starting up a data science program
Experience working with global stakeholders
Experience working in a start-up environment, preferably in an IoT company
Knowledge in quantitative modeling tools and statistical analysis",3.6,"Buckman
3.6","Memphis, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1945,Company - Private,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
24,Software Engineer in Machine Learning / Deep Learning,$101k-$174k (Glassdoor Est.),"Software Engineer in Machine Learning / Deep Learning

Baidu USA, located in Silicon Valley, is looking for a Senior Software Engineer in machine learning / deep learning to work on Baidu's autonomous driving technology. You will be responsible for obstacle detection and prediction, as well as motion policy decision making.

Here's what you will do:
You will work closely with a group of engineers and scientists to tackle challenges in autonomous driving technology by utilizing your knowledge in machine learning and deep learning
You will work on traffic participant detection and behavior prediction, as well as motion policy decision making in medium to high volume traffic
You will have the opportunity to play with a large data set, design algorithms, build models, and verify them through simulation
You will be responsible for integrating, deploying, testing, and verifying your algorithms and models in real-time computing system on vehicles
Here's what we'd like to see in you:
Solid background and knowledge in machine learning and deep learning
Proficiency in various deep neural networks including CNN, RNN, Deep Reinforcement Learning and etc.
Solid familiarity with one of the deep learning frameworks: Pytorch, Tensorflow or Paddle Paddle
Strong programming in C++ and Python
Advanced degree in computer science, mathematics, optimization, or other related disciplines
Prior experience in autonomous driving is preferred
Culture Fit:
Mission alignment: If you want to be part of a team to accomplish this great mission, we will provide you the best possible platform to do that.
Self­-directed: We work best with people that are driven, motivated, and aspire to greatness. Are you the sort of person that, if you had time on your hands, will independently find interesting and useful things to do?
Hungry to learn: We are eager to see you learn new skills and grow. But learning is hard work and this is something we hope you want to do.
Team orientation: We work in small, fast­-moving teams. We don't believe in lone wolves. We watch out for each other and go after big goals together as a team.",4.2,"Baidu USA
4.2","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
25,Software Engineer - Machine Learning,$89k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"O'Reilly Media is looking for a machine learning engineer to inform the direction and execution of our internal personalization and user tracking system built to support our learning platform.

About the Team

O’Reilly Media’s Search and Personalization Platform Engineering team supports O’Reilly’s premier learning service by building out personalization systems built on data and machine learning to provide a unique and dynamic experience for all of our users. The O'Reilly Learning Platform is used by technologists, managers, and designers around the world to hone their skills and improve their craft. O'Reilly's personalization team is one of many small teams that are broadly distributed across the US, featuring diverse, tightly collaborative groups of developers, designers, and product managers constantly encouraging each other to deliver work that instills pride and fulfillment. We encourage learning, knowledge sharing, growth and collaboration in all aspects.

About the Job

At O’Reilly our engineers focus on building a diverse set of features designed in collaboration with product managers, UX and other teammates. Engineers work with product managers to refine direction and solve user problems, exchange code reviews with other team members, provide mentorship to junior engineers, and assist QA and Ops in troubleshooting product issues.

In this role you will be primarily building data processing systems and developing machine learning models to provide intelligent predictions that are used within the search and personalization team or other internal teams to drive improved learning outcomes across the platform. In addition to building models, you will also be responsible for building and maintaining web services that provide search and personalization services to our users. This can include building apis, managing search engines, as well as building any other systems required to meet our goals.

About You

We are interested in people who have experience building and supporting web applications with a diverse and engaged user base. We desire candidates who work comfortably in an agile environment and with collaborators who are distributed across multiple time zones. We value colleagues who are helpful, respectful, humble, and always willing to do what’s best for our users. We desire developers who treat automated tests as essential, and believe that code reviews are a crucial path of learning and of sharing knowledge. The women and men of our platform team have taken many traditional and nontraditional paths to the developer profession, and we welcome diverse teams that are bound together by a mutual love of learning.

Requirements
A bachelor's degree in a math focused discipline, or equivalent real world experience
Experience working with a modern data science / statistics platform such as scikit, R, SAS, matlab or similar.
Experience with how to design features for use in a linear model and/or a neural network to achieve specific predictive outcomes.
Previous experience working with an object oriented programming language such as Java or Scala.
The extreme desire to learn and solve problems you have never encountered before.
Preferred skills
Experience with big data systems like Hadoop, Spark, Beam, HBase, etc.
Strong data structure and algorithm knowledge
TensorFlow / DNNs and Language Models
Bonus skills
Finagle, GCP, Apache Beam
Docker + Kubernetes
About the Company

O’Reilly Media has been inspiring the future for more than 40 years!

We share the knowledge and teach the skills people need to change their world. For more than 40 years, O’Reilly has imparted the world-shaping ideas of innovators through books, articles, conferences, and our online learning platform.

When individuals, teams, and entire enterprises connect with the world's leading experts and content providers, anything is possible. Whether you're working to advance your career, be a better manager, or achieve the next breakthrough in technology or business, learning new skills is at the heart of it all.

With a range of formats including live online training courses, interactive tutorials, books, videos, and case studies, we equip all members of the workforce with the insight they need to stay ahead in an ever-changing economy.

Learning should not be measured in terms of usage, course completion, or certifications. Learning should be measured in terms of outcomes. We want to prepare people to solve challenging problems and inspire them with what’s possible for the future.

Something we’ve been doing for over 40 years.",3.5,"O'Reilly Media
3.5","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Education Training Services,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
26,"CNC Programmer/Manufacturing Engineer - Machining, Mastercam, 5 axis",-1,"Job Description*
Fairlane was established over 50 years ago and manufactures a comprehensive line of workholding and machine components in Fraser, MI. Our machine shop consists of late model CNC production bar lathes, swiss lathes, mills, a 5-axis mill, assembly servo and hydraulic presses and other manual equipment.

We are currently seeking an applications expert to join company leadership in the position of CNC programming and machine process engineering. This position will be involved and lead various growth focused projects with new new products and new manufacturing capabilities.

The successful candidate will be an expert machinist able to program 3D and multi-axis tool paths in Mastercam. They will be able to conceptualize advanced concepts for program organization and develop strategies to accomplish company goals. A strong background in workholding and fixturing for machining centers will be critical. Proficiency with Solidworks CAD software is a big bonus.

While this individual will support CNC programming and machine setup/fixturing strategies throughout the shop floor, they will be the primary person responsible for all aspects of 5-axis milling on a new Doosan DVF-5000 w/ pallet changer.

This mill is supporting a new area of business dedicated to designing and manufacturing robot gripper fingers and other robotic end of arm tooling. Visit GripShape.com to learn more. Join a stable and growing business as we continue to serve customers in the market of industrial components and automation.

Full time is preferred, but we are open to a contract position for the right individual.

Full time employee benefits package including medical, dental, life, paid vacation, 401K with company match and bonus program. If you would like to learn more about this position, please respond with your resume. Thank you!

jgordon@ fairlaneproducts.com

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $80,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
10 hour shift
Experience:
CNC Programming: 8 years (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Fairlane Products,"Fraser, MI",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
27,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"At Sisu, we're building a software platform that empowers people to make better decisions using data. Based on years of cutting-edge research at Stanford, Sisu enables users to quickly and comprehensively understand what’s driving their key metrics, so they never miss a window of opportunity to act.

Sisu leverages the massive amounts of data available within private, first-party data warehouses, which capture a real-time, structured view of organizational behavior. By monitoring the performance of key metrics like revenue, retention, and churn, and their relationships to interactions between key factors like user demographics, campaigns, and acquisition channels, we can help users make better decisions. The key problem Sisu solves is to help identify what’s driving change among this enormous feature and hypothesis space. To do so, we combine statistical analysis and machine learning at scale to provide users personalized, real-time diagnoses of changes in their metrics via an explainable, interpretable user interface.

As a machine learning engineer, you’ll have the opportunity to shape the future of machine learning on massive, structured data. Much like public search engines rely on sophisticated models for ranking and relevance over unstructured text, machine learning is integral to Sisu’s value proposition of ranking and highlighting key drivers behind metrics derived from structured data. These results inform our users on how to take action as their businesses are changing.

You will be responsible for investigating and developing state-of-the-art algorithms in Sisu’s large-scale streaming structured data context. ML engineers at Sisu deliver their features end-to-end, from Jupyter notebook prototypes to production in Rust.
Responsibilities
Deliver state-of-the-art, scalable algorithms to production for forecasting time series, personalized ranking, robust statistical analysis of key customer business metrics
Build and maintain the infrastructure for data and model management
Work closely with the Sisu design and engineering teams for ML-adjacent components, such as viz and data processing
Give talks, write blog posts, and produce peer-reviewed publications
Preferred Qualifications
Either 4+ years of professional experience with ML or quantitative analysis, or Ph.D. in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, Mathematics, or Physics
Proficiency with Python and experience with data processing tools (e.g., scipy, numpy, pandas, Pytorch, and Spark)
Competency with forecasting deadlines, modular design, testing, code review, and working with new codebases
Strong technical communication skills
Please note that this is a full-time, non-remote role based in San Francisco.

Sisu is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status.",4.1,"Sisu Data
4.1","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
28,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Machine Learning Engineer Northern, VA

Machine Learning Engineer

NuWave Solutions is seeking Machine Learning (ML) Engineers to produce automated anomaly/object detection and characterization, forecasting, optimization, and recommendation solutions to national security challenges using modular, cloud-native, API-centric approaches. These solutions will support next-generation defense and intelligence operations with a focus on incorporating machine learning insights to automate and scale analysis and improve decision support. Teams will be working in a highly collaborative environment and expected to identify opportunities to apply and improve data-driven insights and support related design and development within big data environments. Other responsibilities include:
Engage with mission owners/operators to discover applications for ML, set project expectations, define requirements, and review results
Design and develop reusable workflows for data integration, transformation, and feature engineering required to train models
Train and validate models, often in big data, distributed environments
Perform exploratory data analysis to understand data and model-derived insights
Perform model introspection to understand model behaviors and explain predictions
Visualize data and model-derived insights to communicate internally and externally
Integrate models into operational systems
Lead trade studies, analyses of alternatives, and assessments of existing systems
Develops or provides input to engineering artifacts
Requirements
Active Top-Secret clearance required
Minimum (positions are available at multiple levels of seniority) of a bachelor’s degree and 5 years of experience in a science or engineering field
Ability to describe the data assumptions and processing steps of common machine learning methods, and which methods are appropriate for a variety of use cases
Expertise with ML libraries, like Scikit-learn, Pandas, Numpy, PySpark, MXNet, MLib, and Weka
Experience with ML platforms, like KNIME, Spark, SageMaker, H2O, and TensorFlow
Familiarity with Java, Python, and SQL including related ecosystems and frameworks, like Eclipse and Jupyter Notebook
Familiarity with visualization tools, preferably Qlik, Tableau, Plotly, Kibana, Matplotlib, and QGis
Strong problem-solving skills
Strong written and oral communications skills
Able to work independently and self-identify tasks
Ability to review and maintain existing code and applications
Ability to research and evaluate new concepts and processes to improve performance
Preferred Skills
Familiarity with time series forecasting
Familiarity with distributed platforms (i.e. HBase, Kafka, Spark, NiFi) and the cloud (i.e. AWS, GCP, Azure), preferably Amazon Web Services
Familiarity with no-SQL databases like Neo4j, ElasticSearch, or Cassandra
About NuWave Solutions

NuWave Solutions is a recognized leader in providing anticipatory intelligence and advanced data analytics to the defense, intelligence, and private sectors for over 20 years. Leveraging artificial intelligence and machine learning methodologies, NuWave Solutions streamlines the Data-to-Decision lifecycle faster than traditional practices allowing clients to take action with confidence.

For more information on how NuWave Solutions supports its clients and builds upon success, please visit https://www.nuwavesolutions.com

Position Details

Locations of Positions: Reston, McLean, or Herndon, VA; Joint Base Andrews-Bolling, DC; Suitland, MD

Travel Required (CONUS/OCONUS): CONUS

If Travel is required, how much? 5%

Work Schedule: Day Shift

Authorization to work in US is required

8570 Requirements: N/A

NuWave Solutions is an Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

Tagged as: Machine Learning Engineer",4.5,"NuWave Solutions
4.5",Virginia,-1,51 to 200 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
29,Machine Learning Apps Engineer,$113k-$176k (Glassdoor Est.),"· Strong software development skills
· Good web platform/Cloud development skills
· Good knowledge of frameworks like MxNet or Tensorflow

This position is for a Senior Software Engineer in the AWS Inferentia cloud-scale accelerator team. This engineer will help to define, identify and create key solutions. This engineer will ensure that AWS Inferentia will meet our customer needs and satisfy the evolving directions of solutions and will be deeply involved in Tensorflow, MXNet and other frameworks and layers.
This role requires good knowledge of and the methods by which it is used, knowledge of application development and a strong software development background. The ideal candidate will have the academic depth sufficient to understand the implications of new solutions and directions.

· Strong mathematical/analytical background
· Strong C or coding
· Good web platform/Cloud development skills
· Application development from web service API through backend
· hardware/software development in driver and kernel
· Meets/exceeds Amazon’s leadership principles requirements for this role
· Meets/exceeds Amazon’s functional/technical depth and complexity for this role
Amazon is an Equal Opportunity Employer – Minority / Women / Disability / Veteran / Gender Identity / Sexual Orientation / Age

Meets/exceeds Amazon’s leadership principles requirements for this role Meets/exceeds Amazon’s functional/technical depth and complexity for this role Amazon is an Equal Opportunity Employer – Minority / Women / Disability / Veteran / Gender Identity / Sexual Orientation / Age",3.9,"Annapurna Labs (U.S.) Inc.
3.9","Seattle, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
30,Machine Learning Ops Engineer,$77k-$137k (Glassdoor Est.),"Numerator is looking for Machine Learning Ops Engineer to join our growing Research and Development team. This is a unique opportunity where you will get a chance to work with an established and rapidly evolving platform that handles millions of requests and massive amounts of events, and other data. In this position, you will be responsible for taking on new initiatives to design, build, and deploy high-performance deep learning models in a rapidly-scaling environment.

As a member of our team, you will make an immediate impact as you help build out and expand our technology platforms across several software products. This is a fast-paced role with high growth, visibility, impact, and ownership. Many of the decisions for new projects will be driven by you and your team from inception through production.

What you will get to do

Train machine learning and deep learning models on computing clusters to perform visual recognition tasks, such as segmentation and detection.
Build distributed, scalable, and reliable data pipelines that ingest and process data at scale and in real-time to feed machine learning algorithms.
Incorporate real-time data streams to produce highly predictive features in our models.
Work closely with data scientists, engineers, product managers, other teams, both internal and external stakeholders, owning a large part of the process from problem understanding to shipping the solution.
Support new models, systems & tools to help provide answers that allow Numerator to continue to build out the world's largest single-source set of purchase data across brands and retailers.
Create and maintain end-to-end data pipelines and APIs according to business needs.
Have the freedom to suggest and drive organization-wide initiatives while being part of providing the technical vision and strategy at Numerator.
Identify new opportunities to apply ML and other AI technologies across our products.

What we are looking for

You have a blend of data engineering, machine learning, and product innovation skills that let you jump into a fast-paced environment and contribute on day one.
You have at least 3 years of experience designing and implementing software solutions for complex problems. Must have industry experience with building and deploying ML-based solutions.
You have a strong understanding of software engineering practices and fundamentals (including data structures, algorithms, and software design concepts) and you are very comfortable with OOP principles (Python (preferred), Java, Go and an eagerness to learn more).
You are familiar with monitoring and deployment tools and platforms, such as Docker, Kubernetes, Terraform, AWS Services.
You have experience in building real-world systems at an internet-scale for solving problems in recommendation systems, search, computer vision, or content understanding.
You have experience with designing, building, and maintaining production-grade machine learning pipelines and models.
You have working experience of classical ML and DL models, and libraries like Scikit-learn, Pytorch, Tensorflow.
You are a self-starter who is capable of learning on the job, take initiatives, and can pivot from blockers and develop new approaches.
You love building great products - You know how to engineer solutions that balance, robustness, scalability, and performance.

Extra, Nice to haves

Demonstrated ability to drive selection of machine learning approaches to solve specific problems coupled with the ability to clearly communicate tradeoffs.
Experience working with a MPP data warehouse (aka Redshift, Snowflake).
Experience configuring and optimizing data pipelines.
Experience in Marketing Analytics field.
Experience on AWS Sagemaker stack & pattern.
General software design patterns (REST, MVC, Auto-scaling, etc.).

What We Offer

An inclusive and collaborative company culture - we work in an open environment while working together to get things done and adapt to the changing needs as they come.
An opportunity to have an impact in a technologically data-driven company.
Ownership over data and environments in an industry-leading product.
Market competitive total compensation package.Volunteer time off and charitable donation matching.
Strong support for career growth, including mentorship programs, leadership training, access to conferences, and employee resources groups.Regular hackathons to build your own projects and Engineering Lunch and Learns.
Great benefits package including health/vision/dental, unlimited PTO, flexible schedule, 401K matching, travel reimbursement, and more.

If this sounds like something you would like to be part of, we'd love for you to apply! Don't worry if you think that you don't meet all the qualifications here. The tools, technology and methodologies we use are constantly changing and we value talent and interest over specific experience.

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.1,"Numerator
4.1","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
31,Senior Sensor Design Engineer,$93k-$149k (Glassdoor Est.),"CEC Vibration, Covina CA

CEC is a designer and manufacturer of vibration, force, pressure, and torque sensors and condition monitoring equipment for harsh environment applications. We have been in business since 1937 and serve various industries, including Aerospace & Defense, Healthcare, Heavy Industrial, and Transportation.

Qualifications

·
BS, MS, or equivalent knowledge in Mechanical Engineering, Materials Science, or related fields.

·
Experience with sensors and instrumentation.

·
Experience with and desire to take full ownership of product design and development.

·
Experience performing detailed mechanical analysis to simulate the effects of applies stress, vibration, shock, and temperature.

·
Hands-on familiarity with basic machining processes and capable of operating equipment for fabrication of tooling and modification of production parts for design consideration.

·
Good communication skills. This position will need to work with suppliers, customers, and internal management.

·
Must be proficient in SolidWorks, AutoCAD, MS Office. Catia is a plus.

Responsibilities will Include

·
Designing sensor products, including technology selection, conceptual design, detail design, prototype, and tooling.

·
Performing root cause analysis and generating failure analysis reports as required.

·
Supporting engineering compliance with ISO / AS quality requirements.

·
Working with Technicians.

·
Supporting production activities and occasionally troubleshooting existing products to determine failure mode analysis.

·
Writing engineering reports and technical proposals.

·
Development testing, engineering analysis, qualification testing, production launch.

·
Learning about in-house and supplier manufacturing technologies.

·
Learning about customer systems where our parts are used.

·
Supporting supplier and material selection activities including material testing and studies.

·
Presenting mechanical design and analysis in meetings as required.

Additional Requirements

·
Willing to work extended hours or weekends as needed.

·
Working with other departments of CEC (marketing, quality, purchasing, production)",-1,"CEC Vibration Products, LLC","Covina, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
32,Machine Learning Engineer,$45k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"This Contract Position is with one of our Direct Clients. Please submit resumes to mremya(at)divihn(dot)com or call (630) 847 7118 with any questions.*
Job Title: **Machine Learning Engineer*
Job Duration: 10 Months*
Scope: *
The client is seeking to expand the capabilities of the new Center in BIS with advanced machine learning (ML) and data science experience. We require an additional resource to support ML model development, deployment, and post-production monitoring. The goal is to expedite growth in internal expertise in ML and more efficiently drive the AI for Operations projects in FY21. Common tasks to be performed include preparing datasets for ML modeling, design and optimize ML algorithms to accomplish business goals, run ML validations, tests, and experiments, analyze ML results, and deploy models to production application environments. This engagement will augment current technical resources in the AIOps Center to enable sufficient effort to deliver advanced AI/ML projects that will enhance existing and create new data-driven operations across the laboratory.

The ML Engineer will:
Understand business objectives and develop models that help to achieve them, along with metrics to track their progress.
Research and implement appropriate machine learning algorithms and tools.
Supervise the data acquisition process and define data augmentation pipelines.
Study and transform data science prototypes into deployable solutions.
Design machine learning algorithms and systems.
Define validation strategies and run ML tests, analyses, and experiments that are statistically rigorous.
Develop and deploy machine learning applications that interface with models according to requirements.
Analyze errors in model output and design strategies to overcome them.
Monitor and evaluate the performance of deployed systems to ensure the accuracy of results.
Document deployed processes and ML models, as well as the results of these models.
Participate in code reviews to ensure code quality and share best practices and experiences with the team.
Follow the latest developments in the field to be prepared to apply new techniques.
Time Frame
Work would begin 11/9/2020 through 9/30/2021 with possible extension.
Qualifications: *
Comprehensive knowledge of Python.
Comprehensive knowledge of data structures, data modeling, and model evaluation.
Advanced knowledge of mathematics and data analytical skills.
Comprehensive knowledge of standard ML algorithms covering supervised learning, unsupervised learning, reinforcement learning, and deep learning.
Comprehensive knowledge of a broad range of data science and ML libraries (e.g., pandas and scikit-learn).
Proficiency in deep learning frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, and Keras).
Working knowledge of git for distributed version control and CI/CD pipelines, as well as standard DevOps and MLOps processes.
Working knowledge of deploying solutions with Docker containers.
Familiarity with AutoML processes and ML platforms, such as Microsoft Azure and DataRobot a plus.
Comprehensive knowledge of SQL Server a plus.
Previous experience with Agile Scrum methodology a plus.
Considerable skill in defining and aligning team members to the common mission.
Able to work both independently and as a contributing member of a technical team.
Able to effectively interact with the organization to derive requirements and design solutions.
Able to disseminate knowledge to current staff.
Contract length: 10 months

Job Type: Contract

Pay: $85.00 - $90.00 per hour

Experience:
Machine Learning: 1 year (Required)
Python: 1 year (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",4.4,"DivIHN Integration, Inc
4.4","Lemont, IL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
33,Machine Learning Engineer,$68k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Crowe Data Science

Everything we do is about making the future of human work more purposeful. We do this by leveraging state-of-the-art machine learning, modern architectures, and industry experts, to create AI-powered software-as-a-service.

Our world-class Data Science professionals give Crowe the ability to capture and harness the power of data. A combination of data scientists and machine learning engineers create and deploy AI functionality into software to solve complex problems. This type of group, rarely seen anywhere except large tech companies, focuses on building scalable AI products, not just one-time insights. You will learn and build on a wide range of technologies – distinguishing Crowe in the market and driving the firm’s technology and innovation strategy.

The future is powered by AI, come build it with us!

About the Team

We believe machine learning is software. While our Data Scientists experiment in Jupyter notebooks, they are not the end of our machine learning pipelines. Our team uses modern frameworks and tools (git, Docker, Kubernetes) to engineer machine learning solutions.
We foster great Software Engineering. You are given the time and resources you need to shepherd software best practices in your project, and you will guide fellow machine learning engineers, data scientists and other Crowe staff through your work.
We want to make good engineers better. Engineers have plenty of options on the job market. We want to be one of the best ones. We have regular opportunities for team members to teach each other, support for conferences, and recurring reading groups. Moreover, our team offers generous PTO, a flexible work from home policy, and a strong commitment to work-life balance. Company-wide, Crowe routinely wins awards for our support of our staff, including our Fortune 100 Best Companies to Work for in 2019.

About the Role

We work on medium-term machine learning projects (4-8 months) with a high degree of autonomy.
We are not external facing. We harness the subject matter expertise of other Crowe teams to build machine learning products.
We architect and build complex distributed computing systems utilizing High Performance Computing (HPC) computing resources on-premise and in the cloud.
We design and implement efficient and scalable machine learning systems from data collection and training to deployment and real-time serving using Python
We write and review code for productionizing machine learning models from the RESTful API specification to deployment automation.

Docker practitioner. Demonstrable familiarity with containerized orchestration and virtualization frameworks. Experience with a Kubernetes package manager such as Helm a plus.
Linux experience. Configuring and troubleshooting Linux-based systems. You will be performing daily work with a Linux laptop.
Continuous Integration and Deployment. Implementing multi-stage CI/CD pipelines preferably in GitLab with automated deployments.
Cloud Computing familiarity. Experience with at least one Cloud Computing platform, experience with Microsoft Azure a plus.
Distributed Systems Know-How. Designing, deploying, and troubleshooting distributed systems
Networking chops. Strong networking knowledge (OSI network layers, working with proxies, API management)
Interface Savvy. Creating and interacting with RESTful HTTPS API's, websockets, and webhooks
Programming experience. Your job will require you to code - we write Python and Go, so experience in these languages is preferred. Python web framework experience is a plus.
DevOps experience. You enjoy DevOps. You've had some experience monitoring and maintaining mission critical systems and services with uptime requirements.
Qualifications

Scrappiness. You like to code and have interest in learning new technologies without significant outside direction. You aren't afraid to take a stab at firing up a proof-of-concept of an experimental piece of technology before it becomes widely used and documented. Using Docker and Kubernetes as regular parts of your workflow sounds exciting.
Lifelong Engineering. You want to stay fresh with regards to practicing engineering. Continuous improvement is a mantra for you as any system you work with gradually improves over time.
Strong communication skills. You can both dive deep in DevOps, software engineering and infrastructure related topics and explain concepts to a non-technical audience.
Capacity for autonomy. You won't have to hit the ground running on day one, but you will have to manage your time between staying on the cutting edge, debugging issues with existing deployments and current sprint deliverables.

Our Benefits:

At Crowe, we know that great people is what makes a great firm. We value our people and offer employees a comprehensive benefits package.

Learn more about what working at Crowe can mean for you.

How You Can Grow:

We will nurture your talent in an inclusive culture that values diversity. You will have the chance to meet on a consistent basis with your Career Coach that will guide you in your career goals and aspirations. Learn more about where talent can prosper.

More about Crowe:

Crowe (www.crowe.com) is one of the largest public accounting, consulting and technology firms in the United States. Crowe uses its deep industry expertise to provide audit services to public and private entities while also helping clients reach their goals with tax, advisory, risk and performance services. Crowe is recognized by many organizations as one of the country's best places to work. Crowe serves clients worldwide as an independent member of Crowe Global, one of the largest global accounting networks in the world. The network consists of more than 200 independent accounting and advisory services firms in more than 130 countries around the world.",3.8,"Crowe
3.8","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1942,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
34,Data Scientist,$93k-$152k (Glassdoor Est.),"AIS has a workshare opportunity for a Data Scientist (TS/FSPOLY required) on a large, newly awarded contract. In this role you will develop machine learning, data mining, statistical and graph-based algorithms to analyze and make sense of datasets; prototype or consider several algorithms and decide upon final model based on suitable performance metrics.
Roles and Responsibilities:
Produce data visualizations that provide insight into dataset structure and meaning
Work with subject matters experts (SMEs) to identify important information in raw data and
develop scripts that extract this information from a variety of data formats (e.g., SQL tables, structured metadata, network logs)
Incorporate SME input into feature vectors suitable for analytic development and testing
Translate customer qualitative analysis process and goals into quantitative formulations that are coded into software prototypes
Develop and implement statistical, machine learning, and heuristic techniques to create descriptive,
predictive, and prescriptive analytics
Develop statistical tests to make data-driven recommendations and decisions
Develop experiments to collect data or models to simulate data when required data are unavailable
Develop feature vectors for input into machine learning algorithms
Identify the most appropriate algorithm for a given dataset and tune input and model parameters
Evaluate and validate the performance of analytics using standard techniques and metrics (e.g.cross-validation, ROC curves, confusion matrices)
Required Education, Experience and Skills
Master's degree in a quantitative discipline(e.g., statistics, mathematics, operations research, engineering, or computer science).
A Ph.D. in a quantitative discipline can be substituted for three years of experience
Five years of experience analyzing datasets and developing analytics.
Five years of experience programming with data analysis software such as R, Python, SAS, or MATLAB.
An additional two years of experience in software development, cloud development, analyzing datasets or developing descriptive, predictive, and prescriptive analytics can be substituted for a Master's degree.
U.S. Citizenship Required
Must possess a TS/FSPOLY clearance
EOE/AA Disability/Veteran",4.3,"Assured Information Security, Inc. (AIS)
4.3","Fort Meade, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
35,Computer Vision Engineer,$55k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"Computer Vision Engineer
City


Chambersburg

State/Territory


Pennsylvania

Work Schedule


M - F, 8 am - 5 pm

Job Brief


Join our Team as a Computer Vision Engineer today!

Job Title: Computer Vision Engineer

Department: Engineering

Summary: The Computer Vision Engineer will be responsible for developing and optimizing image processing pipelines for multiple internal projects. This individual must have the ability to effectively productionize existing prototypes and service models at all stages of development. This employee is expected to have backgrounds in computer vision/deep learning, and is passionate about developing production-ready, high-quality software.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities: include the following. Other duties may be assigned.
Perform statistical modeling, data extraction, analysis, construct, evaluate, and tune neural networks
Test and develop your own creative solutions with ample computational resources and ensure required performance and usability is met
Collaborate with various departments and fellow team members to design, develop, and implement novel computer vision algorithms to solve relevant manufacturing/logistics problems
Evaluate accuracy and quality of the designed models as well as data sources
Stay up to date with the latest models and changes in the technology
Research and prototype techniques and algorithms for object detection and recognition
Design and develop production ready code
Communicate results and implications to colleagues and business partners
Coordinate with application development teams to integrate developed models with existing applications
Train and retrain systems when necessary
Positively impact teams by enhancing applications across our company
Lead projects, report metrics, and improve systems
Develop prototypes fast, and quickly iterate based on feedback
Qualifications: To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Education and/or Experience:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Mathematics, or Statistics
3+ years of related experience
Master’s Degree or above Computer Science, Engineering, Applied Mathematics, or Statistics is a plus
Language Skills:

Ability to read and interpret documents such as safety rules, operating and maintenance instructions, and procedure manuals. Ability to write routine reports and correspondence. Ability to speak effectively before groups of customers or employees of organization.

Mathematical Skills:

Ability to calculate figures and amounts such as discounts, interest, commissions, proportions, percentages, area, circumference, and volume. Ability to apply concepts of basic algebra, geometry, trigonometry, and calculus.

Reasoning Ability:

Ability to apply common sense understanding to carry out instructions furnished in written, oral, or diagram form. Ability to deal with problems involving several concrete variables in standardized situations.

Computer Skills:
Knowledge of and experience working with Microsoft Office, MS-DOS, Windows 7 and Windows 10
Experience in Linux
IP Networks
Familiarity with Python and C++
Experience in coding machine learning systems
Certificates, Licenses, Registrations:

Other Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
Professional, hands-on experience working on Computer Vision problems in the following subjects:
Image Enhancement
Image Filtering
Object Tracking
Object Detection
3D Estimation
3D Reconstruction
SfM
SLAM
Experience with cameras, and/ or mobile robotics
Other Qualifications:
Must be able to accommodate hours outside of regular shift when necessary.
Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is frequently required to walk; sit; use hands to finger, handle, or feel; reach with hands and arms and talk or hear. The employee is occasionally required to stand. The employee must frequently lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, depth perception and ability to adjust focus.

Work Environment:

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

While performing the duties of this Job, the employee may be frequently exposed to moving mechanical parts and risk of electrical shock. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer.",3.8,"Martin's Famous Pastry Shoppe
3.8","Chambersburg, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1955,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
36,Senior Maintenance Engineer,-1,"Who We Are

Ocado is a UK based company admitted to trading on the London Stock Exchange (Ticker OCDO). It comprises one of the world's largest dedicated online grocery retailers, operating its own grocery and general merchandise retail businesses under Ocado.com and other specialist shop banners, together with its Ocado Solutions division.

The Ocado Solutions division is responsible for providing Ocado's innovative advanced robotics technology, known as the Ocado Smart Platform (""OSP""), to our major retailer clients around the world. OSP comprises access to Ocado's physical infrastructure solutions, running highly efficient warehouse operations for the single pick of products, together with the entire end-to-end proprietary software applications and advanced robotics required to operate a world-class online grocery business.

Our unique, proprietary and industry-leading technology is set to transform the shopping experience of consumers around the world. We have partnered with Kroger to help it redefine the grocery customer experience in the United States through the adoption of the centralized, automated model of online retailing provided by the Ocado Smart Platform.

Come join us as we build our North American team, bringing world-class innovation and technologies to one of the most exciting global markets for e-commerce.

What You Will Do

The Senior Maintenance Engineer will report directly to the respective shift assigned Engineering Team Manager. This position will undertake reactive and planned engineering maintenance activities and improvement works at the Customer Fulfillment Center (CFC) on material handling equipment (MHE) such as conveyor networks, lifts, cranes, belts, etc.

The Senior Maintenance Engineer's day-to-day responsibilities include:

Reacting to MHE breakdowns (both mechanical and electrical), locating the fault, analyzing the issue and completing the fix in a timely manner to keep operation downtime to a minimum.
Keeping accurate records such as work activities, tasks carried out, parts used through stores, etc.
Align, priorities and monitor KPI's that support the Customer's optimized service for its end customer/clients.
Working closely with Customers Inbound, Pick, Dispatch areas, and other support teams on a daily basis to ensure direction of labor, and planned engineering activities to fully support Ocado's assets and the Customer's daily operational goals.
Maintenance priorities and mentoring for the assigned Maintenance Engineers.
Performing assembly and sub-assembly repairs by following written work instructions, blueprints and schematics.
Working closely with other departments to find ways to increase machine reliability on existing and new equipment, diagnose equipment breakdowns and action repairs ensuring direction of labor and planned engineering activities fully support the operation.
Attending meetings as required, analyze data and find solutions to improve equipment performance whilst ensuring safe working practice and full communications are maintained at all times.
In addition, the position will be involved in projects within the business to develop an effective engineering install and commissioning.
Completing quality inspections to ensure work is completed to a safe standard.

The Senior Maintenance Engineer may be asked to perform tasks as required by management deemed as a reasonable request. This job description is a summary of the typical functions of the role, not an exhaustive or comprehensive list of possible role responsibilities, tasks and duties and is subject to review. The responsibilities, tasks and duties of the job holder might differ from those outlined in the job description and other duties, as assigned, might form part of the job.

The initial 6 to 9 months will involve training and most likely require some travel in order to obtain the training from another site in the US and/or UK. In the event the operations is undergoing its initial startup, the daily responsibilities for this role may be different while supporting the needs of a facility in its initial stages of starting its operations. Once the facility is commissioned, the roles defined in this job description will become the daily responsibilities for the Senior Maintenance Engineer.

Who You Are

To qualify for this position, you must meet the following requirements:

A minimum of five years of direct experience in the mechanical or electrical field.
A degree from a vocational school or college with a focus in the mechanical or electrical field.
Strong electrical experience preferable within a FMCG environment.
Knowledge / experience working with controls, analyzing faults and providing solutions.
Experience with both reactive and preventative maintenance.
Good technical ability relating to automation hardware and software.
Strong organization and communication skills and the ability to work in a multi-disciplined team of varying levels of technical experience.
This role involves working at height using a variety of access equipment, so you need to be comfortable working at heights.
Good technical ability relating to automation hardware and software.
Sound analytical skills with an eye for detail; good problem solving ability and a practical approach.
Experience of working with computerized maintenance management systems. Numerate and PC literate including Word, Excel etc.

This role will require flexibility due to us being a 24/7 operation and a shift pattern will be put in place that will require working days, nights and weekends.

Location

You will be based at the customer fulfillment center near Monroe, Ohio.

For a sense of who we are and what we deliver we invite you to explore online to learn more about Ocado Technology and Ocado Engineering, which directly support the Ocado Solutions division, and take the next step in what will be an amazing career with us.

What We Offer

401k Plan; 100% match up to 5% of earnings
Paid Vacation and Sick Days
10 Paid Public Holidays
Medical, Dental, and Vision Insurance
Medical and Dependent Care Flexible Spending Accounts
Health Reimbursement Account; Company Contribution of 50% of Annual Deductible
Company Paid Life Insurance
Short Term Disability Insurance
Long Term Disability Insurance
Employee Assistance Program

Learn about our partnership with Kroger:

Kroger Bets on Robots With Ocado Deal
Meet Ocado, Kroger's Newest Weapon in Its Grocery Delivery War with Amazon and Walmart
Check out this video about our advanced robotics technology

Ocado is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, gender, religion, age, disability, veteran's status, or any other classification as required by applicable law.",4.0,"Ocado Group
4.0","Cincinnati, OH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
37,"Software Engineer, Machine Learning",$91k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"Engineering at Postmates

We’re building groundbreaking tech solutions that power our revolutionary logistics platform to help connect millions of customers with their favorite merchants every day. We’re tackling some of the most complex technical challenges in the modern logistics space to unlock opportunities that positively impact the local businesses and communities we serve.

WHAT WE DO

Postmates relies heavily on our engineering team to realize this vision. Building a software platform that is reliable, scales, and stays agile under demanding product needs is a serious technical challenge. Postmates is a three-part balancing act connecting customers, merchants, and couriers in real-time. If any piece is out of whack, the whole system suffers. Working with the Postmates engineering team offers an opportunity with explosive growth, cutting-edge technology, a highly visible charter, and a cool user-focused product vision.

In this role, you’ll have the opportunity to work on various challenging machine learning and optimization problems in real-time and in scale, including:

Modeling and forecasting demand and supply to enable more intelligent matching, optimize the overall marketplace efficiency, and provide valuable insights to our merchants and Postmates
Large scale Machine Learning algorithms and infrastructure that powers our Search Ranking models and Personalized Recommendation Engine
Predicting the Postmates Delivery Time (PDT) and improving the efficiency (batching, chaining, etc) and reliability of the dispatching algorithm
Determining the optimal pricing strategies to help our Postmates maximize their revenue
Identifying suspicious transactions and malicious users for risk control
Natural Language Processing to understand text content on Postmates platform, including named entity resolution and recognization of reviews, descriptions and interactions between users on our marketplace
YOUR RESPONSIBILITIES
Build end-to-end ML systems of designing, training, testing and deploying Machine Learning models
Write production-level codes to train your ML models into working pipelines and services to serve production online traffic
Have the ability to apply machine learning to solve complex business problems and optimize critical business metrics, and work closely with Product Managers and Data analysts to frame Machine Learning problems within the business context
Analyze experimental and observational data, communicate findings, and facilitate launch decisions
Participate in code reviews to ensure code quality and distribute knowledge
OUR REQUIREMENTS
A Bachelor’s/Master’s degree (or higher) in a technical field (Computer Science, Statistics, Economics, Operations Research, Math, Physics, Engineering, etc.) or equivalent work experience required.
Minimum of 3+ years of professional experience in Data Science or Applied Machine Learning required
Solid engineering and coding skills with the ability to write high-performance production quality code
Good understanding of common families of machine learning models, feature engineering, feature selection and other practical machine learning issues, such as overfitting
Strong communication skills. Explaining complex technical concepts to product managers, data analysts, and other engineers shouldn’t be a problem for you.
OUR PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Industry experience building and productionizing innovative end-to-end Machine Learning systems
Experience in Java, C++, Go, Python, Scala and other equivalent languages
Experience with MapReduce, Spark, Hive, HBase, Airflow, Google BigQuery, BigTable, and Dataflow
Experience with ML frameworks like Tensorflow, PyTorch, Spark MLlib, XGBoost, and Scikit-Learn

A bit about us
Postmates is changing delivery for good. While you may know us as the clever brand loved by celebrities and millennials, we are so much more. We are industry-first leaders in the modern logistics space, creating groundbreaking tech products that positively impact millions of customers, merchants and gig-economy workers as well as the underserved in the communities where we work. How will you help us change delivery for good?

Benefits
Postmates has your back. In our impact-first work environment, we value huge company vision. As you strive to build the future with us, we’ll support you with a competitive rates and equity plan, along with access to our 401k plan and robust benefits including: health benefits, flexible paid time off, parental benefits, and food perks.

Postmates is proud to be an equal employment opportunity and affirmative action employer. Qualified applicants at Postmates are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, or sexual orientation.",3.4,"Postmates
3.4","Bellevue, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Express Delivery Services,Transportation & Logistics,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
38,Data Scientist,$70k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Position at Homes.com

Homes.com is looking for a Data Scientist in Norfolk, VA to join our team of IT professionals. You'll be working with our Business Intelligence Team to support and grow our premier real estate portal. You'll participate in technical research, developing models, data analysis, machine learning and be expected to bring your own ideas to the table to help keep us innovating.

Responsibilities:
Forecast site traffic for use in inventory calculations
Analyze and report on trends such as home valuations
Develop suggestion models
Help develop image classification models
Requirements:
BS or MS in computer science, data science, mathematics or other related field
2+ Years working as a Data Scientist
1+ Years Experience working with Time Series modeling
Experience working with Jupyter Notebooks
Experience working in R and Python
Experience providing Statistical Analysis
Nice to Haves:
Experience working in a cloud environment
Experience working with a relational database

About Homes.com

Homes.com offers today's demanding home buyers, renters and those somewhere in between a simply smarter home search. With features like Homes.com Match, HomeShare and Snap & Search, homeshoppers now have a more personalized way to search for their next home. Since its launch over 25 years ago, Homes.com offers real estate professionals brand and property advertising, search engine marketing and instant response lead generation to help them succeed online. For more information, visit Homes.com.

About DE

Dominion Enterprises (DE) is a leading digital marketing and software services company offering client solutions across multiple business verticals. Our customers rely on our B2B cloud SaaS solutions to establish their online and mobile brands, generate leads, and manage customer relationships through our Homes.com, Dominion Dealer Solutions, Dominion Business Solutions / DX1, Travel Media and Franchise and Business Opportunity divisions. Our B2C web and mobile applications include Homes.com, HotelCoupons.com, FranchiseOpportunities.com, FranchiseGator.com, Franchise.com, and BusinessBroker.net.
About 2,000 employees reside and work in our Norfolk, VA home office and in offices across the U.S. Our employees will tell you about our collaborative, innovative, team-oriented work environment, excellent career enrichment opportunities, community service opportunities, competitive earnings, and a comprehensive benefits package that includes a generous 401(k). DE is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse workforce. DE is a drug-testing employer.",4.3,"Homes.com
4.3","Norfolk, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1998,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
39,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Opportunity overview

Cohere Health is simplifying healthcare for patients, their doctors, and all those who are important in a patient's healthcare experience. Our focus is to enable an efficient, transparent patient journey where patient goals are central to decision-making.

We are a mission-driven and fast-growing company obsessed with eliminating the wasteful friction patients and doctors experience, particularly for diagnoses that require expensive procedures or medications. To that end, we build products and services that ensure the appropriate plan of care is understood and expeditiously approved, so that patients and doctors can focus on health, rather than payment or administrative hassles.

In this role, you'll join our growing team of world-class engineers, statisticians, and clinical experts to deploy machine learning algorithms that help automate burdensome administrative clinical practices. You will be tasked with finding the most promising opportunities for impact and then delivering on them.

What you will do:
Find the signal in incoherent clinical data
Build reliable and scalable production machine learning systems
Work on feature engineering, statistical analysis, developing novel ML techniques, understanding classifier performance, and ensuring fit-for-purpose.
Work cross-functionally across diverse stakeholders, including product managers, statisticians, EHR data specialists and physicians.
What you will have:
You have at 3 years experience in applied ML in the industry with a degree or higher (MS/PhD) in computer science, machine learning, mathematics or similar field
Clear understanding of model building, model maintenance and the measures that optimize models for product use
Understand experimental design and can independently perform collection, measurement, and interpretation of results
Expert in R, SQL,Python or other common analytical data tools
Expert in linear regression and classification approaches
Bonus points if:


Have experience with healthcare data such as claims and EMR data
Have hands on experience building NLP models using Spacy from clinical narratives
Experience with TensorFlow is also a plus.
We can't wait to learn more about you and meet you at Cohere Health!",5.0,"Cohere Health
5.0","Boston, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
40,Data Scientist,$94k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"When you’re the best, we’re the best. We instill an environment where employees feel engaged, satisfied and able to contribute their unique skills and talents. We provide extensive opportunities for personal and professional development, building both employee competence and organizational capability to fuel exceptional performance now and in the future.

Summary:

In this role, you will conduct sophisticated data analysis to help address critical business and member questions, the outputs of which enable members to drive improvements in clinical, operational, and economic outcomes.

Responsibilities:

Provide analysis to identify critical issues/questions around member performance.

Conduct exploratory data analysis from complex, disparate data sources to recognize patterns, and identify member performance improvement opportunities.

Generate hypotheses and analyze data to test and interpret results.

Design and develop data models to predict member outcomes or future impact of key member decisions.

Communicate findings from exploratory and predictive data analysis broadly to team and leaders.

Identify improvement opportunities in reporting and BI tools and collaborate with Products Technology to implement enhancements.

Serve as the resident data expert and share best practices/approaches for statistics, machine learning techniques, data modeling, simulation and advanced mathematics.

Collaborate with key leaders and clinicians to build analytical acumen across all analytic roles in the organization.

Qualifications:

Relevant degree preferred. Advanced degree a plus.

5 or more years of relevant work experience.

Proficient programming experience using SAS/Python/R.

Demonstrated ability to manage large disparate data sets and using quantitative and qualitative analysis.

Experience effectively communicating and presenting data to a variety of audiences required.

Experience working with health care administrative claims data (ICD-10, MS-DRG, CPT/HCPCS) or electronic medical record data tools (Epic Clarity/Caboodle, Cerner CCL-Discern/PowerInsight) strongly preferred.

#LI-DM

#IDS

Equal Opportunity Employer: Females/Minorities/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The Company is committed to equal employment opportunity to all employees and applicants without regard to race, religion, color, gender identity, ethnicity, age, national origin, sexual orientation, disability status, veteran status or any other category protected by applicable law.",4.0,"Vizient, Inc.
4.0","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
41,Computer Science Machine Learning Engineer,$85k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

If you are a talented and motivated early career computer scientist (or equivalent) looking to put your skills to use in a challenging environment that includes supporting military tactical operations and military intelligence, then this is the opportunity for you! MITRE’s Army Division has openings for recent graduates in computer science, machine learning, software engineering or similar degree programs to work a variety of cutting edge projects in information warfare, command and control, fire support (artillery), smart munitions, intelligence, signal processing and much more. The technical work areas include applying machine learning for real-time signal processing, data modeling/management, sensor integration, and UML for software designs. Modern technologies such as React, Node.js, Angular, Protobuf, git, NOSQL, Atlassian, Slack, and more are utilized. Opportunities in research and development exist in such areas as Machine Learning, Artificial Intelligence, Natural Language Processing, and Distributed Computing to support the Army command, control, communications and intelligence capabilities of the future!

MITRE’s Army division has locations in Aberdeen, MD; McLean, VA and other locations.

Responsibilities include:
Develop and hone machine learning algorithms and techniques for real-time operations
Develop software using agile processes and tools (JIRA, git, Jenkins/gradle, and more)
Deliver machine learning based designs and prototypes to Army R&D and Acquisition, Logistics and Technology sponsors
Develop methods and algorithms to represent complex data into usable formats and presentation for decision making
Evaluate technologies and commercial products for potential military applicability
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor degree in Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a similar degree
Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances.
Required Qualifications:
Programming Language experience with either
Java or similar object-oriented language
Python
Understanding of current machine learning techniques, methods and best-practices
Understanding of software design patterns and best practices
Enthusiasm and a desire to learn and grow
Candidate must be able to obtain and maintain a DoD Secret Clearance which requires US citizenship
Preferred Qualifications:
Advance degree Computer Science, Software Engineering, or a similar degree
Two years of relevant experience
Proven experience with machine learning
Building software with languages/frameworks such as Maven
Understanding of databases (relational or NOSQL)
Familiarity with serialization formats including JSON, XML, and Google Protobuf
Technical writing skills such as drafting software designs and technical guidance
Strong interpersonal, briefing, and communication skills
Ability to obtain and maintain a DoD Top Secret/SCI Clearance.
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","Aberdeen, MD",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
42,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"About Triplebyte

Triplebyte is transforming the way software engineers are hired. Our mission is to build an open, valuable and skills-based credential for all engineers and data scientists. This is important because millions of people have skills (and deserve good jobs), but don't fit the profile that recruiters seek. We aim to cut out that noise by matching opportunities to people who have the skills to succeed in them - regardless of their background.

Companies like Apple, Dropbox and American Express trust Triplebyte's technical assessment to identify the best engineers for their open roles and reduce the time and effort it takes to hire them.

We raised a $35 million Series B and our team of 64 is growing! We're building out the leadership of our team to help us scale to the next phase.

Press Links:

You can read more about our company and hear from our founders in the press here:

Triplebyte raises $35M for its online coding test and credentialing service for hiring engineers

Triplebyte incubates ColorStack to increase Black and Latinx representation in CS programs

CNBC (Your Next Job Interview Could be with a Robot)

Building an Engineering Team - Harj Taggar and Ammon Bartram

Role Description

Triplebyte screens and evaluates thousands of engineers per month to find the best candidates for our partner companies. Human decision making doesn't work at our scale; our marketplace is powered by automated assessment and decision making. Triplebyte has three cornerstone ML products: our quiz, our interview, and our matchmaking. As a machine learning engineer, you'll be responsible for the end-to-end process of designing and running experiments to serving production models at scale. Some of our pipelines use off the shelf components, but we're also implementing custom models and techniques from the latest research papers. We're also building forecasting tools for internal teams to measure and predict outcomes. This is an ideal role for an engineer or data scientist who wants the scope and responsibility to own features/products from the inception and research phase through to measuring real-world results.Fields your work will touch on
Psychometrics
Recommender systems
Time series analysis
Survival analysis
Bayesian inference
Probabilistic programming
Requirements
Robust exploratory/experimental skills. We have a novel dataset of candidate profiles and interview outcomes from our candidate screening process and our hiring marketplace. You'll be responsible for designing and evaluating experiments to predict downstream outcomes.
Ability to implement models from research. Some of our best improvements in both speed and predictiveness has come from doing literature surveys and implementing novel techniques from research papers.
Engineering skills. This is a hybrid research/engineering role. You'll be responsible for productionizing your pipelines/models and integrating against our back-end services.

Compensation and Benefits

Competitive salary and stock options package

Open vacation policy

Employer paid health, vision and dental insurance

401(k) plan with matching

Pre-tax commuter benefits

Daily catered lunches

The Company is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions on the basis of merit and business needs. The Company does not discriminate against employees or applicants (in any aspect of employment, including, but not limited to recruiting and hiring, job assignment, compensation, opportunities for advancement, promotion, transfers, evaluation, benefits, training, discipline, and termination), on the basis of any characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local laws.",3.2,"Triplebyte
3.2",California,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
43,Dev Ops Engineer,$46k-$86k (Glassdoor Est.),"Essential Functions:

Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Work closely with development and technical teams in deploying their applications and automating resource provisioning.
Provide operational support for new and existing sites/software, and debugging production issues.
Perform functions required for the deployment, configuration, support, and troubleshooting of issues within the Credit Union’s complicated technical environment while building and maintaining a suite of automation scripts and packages to support his function.
Enable and assist teams with Application Performance Monitoring.
Perform other job-related duties as assigned by Manager(s).

Other Duties:

Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

Competencies:

Achieve goals beyond job requirements and take prompt action to accomplish objectives.
Clearly convey and receive information and ideas through a variety of media to individuals or groups in a manner that engages the listener, helps them understand and retain the message, and invites response and feedback. Keep others informed as appropriate. Demonstrate good written, oral, and listening skills.
Consistently maintain high levels of activity or productivity; sustain long hours when necessary, work with vigor, effectivenss and determination over a sustained period
Break down problems into component and recognize the interrelationships; make sound, well-informed, and objective decisions. Compare data, information, and input from a variety of sources to draw conclusions; take action that is consistent with available facts, constraints, and probable consequences.
Organize work, set priorities, and determine reources requirements; determines necessary sequence of activities needed to achieve goals.
Build constructive working relationships with clients/customers, other work units, community organizations and others to meet mutual goals and objectives. Behave professionally and supportively when working with individuals from a variety of ethnic, social and educational backgrounds.
Commitment to developing professionally by attending professional conferences and taking advantage of a variety of learning activities.
Introduce newly gained knowledge, focus on best practices, and value cutting-edge practices and approaches.

Education and Experience Requirements:

4-year degree in Information Systems or equivalent work experience.
2+ years of experience with Information/Business Systems.
2+ years of experience with AWS
2+ year scripting experience in Python, Powershell, Javascript, etc
2+ years of experience in the Financial Industry, preferably in the banking space.
1+ years of experience maintaining Chef, Ansible or Puppet (Ansible preferred)
1+ years of experience with network/server configuration for automated software deployment
1+ years of experience programming in C#, Java, etc.

Additional Eligibility Requirements:

Ability to use a wide variety of licensed and open source technologies and tools.
Ability to code and script for both physical and virtualized environments, such as AWS and Azure.
Experience with systems, IT operations, process improvement and best practices of the same.
Comfort with frequent, incremental code testing and deployment.
Strong grasp of automation tools, such as Ansible, Chef or Puppet.
Proven work in Continuous Integration using Jenkins or equivalent.
Ability to build and maintain proper source code repositories in SVN and GIT.
Comfort with collaboration, open communication and reaching across functional borders.
Adherence to policies, procedures and documentation standards.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills

Work Environment:

This job operates in a professional office environment. This role routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopier/scanner, filing cabinets, and fax machines.

Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. This is a largely sedentary role. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to stand, talk, hear, and use hands and fingers to handle, feel or operate objects, tools or controls and to reach with hands and arms. Ability to operate a computer is required.

Travel:
Minimal, as required by the business or professional development.

Service Excellence: The DCU Way:
All employees are expected to provide service excellence the “DCU Way” through teamwork and by providing quality service to internal and external members, incorporating the Guiding Principles of DCU’s culture:

People come first
Do the right thing
Make a difference

Bank Secrecy Act (BSA):

All Credit Union employees are required to complete all BSA related training annually and maintain knowledge of current BSA policies, specifically those related to functions performed within the department and identify and report possible suspicious activity.

We are proud to be an EEO/AA employer M/F/D/V

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.9,"Digital Federal Credit Union
3.9","Marlborough, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1979,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
44,Data Scientist,$80k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


JM&A Group is one of the largest independent providers of finance and insurance (F&I) products in the automotive industry. For nearly 40 years, the company has helped automobile dealers achieve unsurpassed levels of performance. JM&A Group provides more than 3,800 dealerships with a variety of products and services, such as new and used vehicle protection plans, pre-paid maintenance plans and GAP protection programs. Among JM&A Group’s competitive advantages is its robust training and consulting services for F&I professionals, and the company is actively evolving to meet consumer preferences to remain a market leader and a partner of choice.

Job Description


JM&A, a division of JM Family Enterprises, Inc., is looking for an experienced Data Scientist to join its Customer Services Admin team. The Data Scientist will partner with stakeholders from various business functions to identify data science opportunities, have the knowledge, experience and technical skills to leverage internal and external data, and apply the right machine learning/big data technologies to turn such data into valuable insights and solutions for the company. The candidate will be tasked with gathering and integrating large volumes of data to develop complex predictive / machine learning models to drive actionable results and insights especially in the areas of fraud / anomaly detection, claims automation / self service and general efficiency opportunities. This is a highly visible and impactful role where the Data Scientist will interact with the senior and executive level management and have the opportunity to influence what we do and how we do it through data science.

Responsibilities:
Create a collaborative and effective working relationship with functional leaders to understand business problems, identify opportunities / use cases to improve the performance of our businesses
Lead / Contribute to the development of actionable solutions. This includes all aspects of the solution development including problem and goal definition, defining a plan for:
Sampling of the data and conducting experiments
Data extraction
Ingestion and processing (outlier and missing data handling)
Exploratory data analysis
Feature engineering (weight of evidence, label encoding, label count encoding, target encoding, time-series, polynomial interactions, binning, outlier handling)
Feature selection (forward, backwards, information value)
Hyperparameter optimization of machine learning models
Experiment tracking for A/B testing and reproducibility, model evaluation, model interpretability, results communication and deployment
Contribute to the adoption and better understanding across the company of data science best practices and tools and stay up to date regarding new knowledge and developments in this domain
#LI-JD1

Job Requirements
Core skills in Computer Science: Data Structures, Algorithms, Programming Paradigms and Relational Databases
Deep working experience applying statistics and machine learning techniques to real-world problems and data and deploying models to production
Hands-on experience with SQL and tools to access databases
Expertise in Python and R
Expertise with open source data mining/machine learning/big data programming libraries, models and frameworks (e.g. Pandas, Scikit-Learn, H2O, TSFresh, FeatureTools, MLflow, Shap, Microsoft Interpret, Tensorflow, Statsmodels, Pandas-Profiling, Seaborn, Plotly, Spark, Koalas)
Working experience with cloud computing services such as Amazon AWS, Microsoft Azure or Google Cloud Platform
Excellent presentation skills to non-technical Associates communicating complex concepts in terms the audience can understand through understandable language, tables and visualizations
When evaluating the candidate, special attention will be paid to the following competencies:
Intellectual Curiosity and Critical Thinking, necessary to analyze a problem from multiple perspectives and examine the interrelationships between data that may appear superficially unrelated
Autonomous, to own projects end-to-end; ability to work on the entire stack without being dependent on other team members
Focus, to design and test a technique over days and weeks, find it doesn’t work, learn from the failure, and try again
Creativity, to invent and try new approaches to solving a problem
Attention to Detail, in order to maintain rigor and to detect and avoid over-reliance on intuition when examining data
Clear and concise written and oral communication, in order to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear and precise manner
Interpersonal skills, necessary to build good working relationships and work as part of a team
PhD or Masters in Computer Science, Statistics, Computer Science, Math or a related discipline or equivalent skill set",3.8,"JM&A Group
3.8","Deerfield Beach, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
45,Research Data Scientist,$72k-$120k (Glassdoor Est.),"IAI is looking for a talented research scientist to contribute to research and development efforts in machine learning, graph theory, and scientific software development. The candidate will incorporate novel ideas and improve the state of the art on advanced projects related to processing of large networks, analyzing data in high dimensions and implementing high performance computing software. Additionally, the candidate will develop a portfolio of related research by extending existing work and proposing new methods with novel application domains.

You are highly encouraged to apply if you enjoy working with data and algorithms, passionate about understanding how things work, want to solve complex problems and strive to stay current on the technology and literature in areas of high performance computing, network analysis and machine learning.

JOB DUTIES

Design and develop scalable machine learning and network analytic algorithms
Evaluate performance of a variety of machine learning and network analytic algorithms
Debug and solve problems in complex environments
Explore use of novel methods for compression, dimensionality reduction and summarization
Communicate findings effectively in the form of briefings and technical reports
Formulate research ideas/hypotheses to solve new problems

DESIRED SKILLS

Algorithm development experience in Python, C/C++ and/or Java
Development of machine learning and/or graph-based algorithms (e.g., scikit-learn, networkx, mlpack, weka)
Familiar with high performance and big data computing technology (e.g., MPI, OpenMP, OpenACC, CUDA, opencl, mapreduce, hadoop, spark, BSP)
Exposure to graph traversal languages and graph databases (e.g., Apache Tinkerpop, neo4j, JanusGraph)
Familiar with word embedding methods (e.g., word2vec, GloVe, doc2vec)
Comfortable working on linux systems

EDUCATION

A Masters degree or Ph.D. in Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Physics or related field is required.

About IAI

IAI is a technology innovation company specializing in providing advanced technology solutions and R&D services to federal agencies and corporations. IAI leverages agile R&D processes, a multi-disciplinary collaborative environment, and its substantial intellectual property portfolio to excel in developing concepts into market-focused products and customer-driven solutions. IAI’s core R&D areas include: AI & Advanced Computing; Autonomy & Robotics; Healthcare Research Technologies; Modeling, Simulation & Visualization; and Networks & Cyber Security; and Radar, Communications & Sensors. For more information about IAI please visit www.i-a-i.com.

US Citizenship or Permanent Residency required

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race,

color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status.

Requisition ID:",3.6,"Intelligent Automation
3.6","Rockville, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1987,Company - Private,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
46,Software Engineer - Machine Learning/AI,-1,"Software Engineer - Machine Learning/AI

Expedition Technology is currently searching for a mid to senior level Software Engineer who will develop, maintain, and enhance complex software systems. The applications we develop integrate cutting edge areas of software development with a focus on machine learning and process-intense computing, novel algorithm development, manipulation of extremely large data sets, and real-time systems.

Our Software Engineers responsibilities will include working closely with other engineers to develop software products within an R&D environment and provide guidance on writing code that will enable machine learning applications running novel algorithms to work efficiently. He or she will resolve software problem reports and utilize software design methodologies appropriate to the development environment. There will also be opportunities for system design, to include hardware/software trade offs, software reuse, as well as requirements analysis and synthesis from system level to individual software components.

QUALIFICATIONS
Must be a US Citizen and able to obtain a US Government security clearance of Top Secret or higher.
3 years + experience with full-stack software product development within a Linux-based environment
Knowledge of any or all of the following languages: C++, Python, Java, Javascript (Python is primary language used.)
Bachelors degree in computer science or a related discipline from an accredited school (4 years of additional experience may be substituted for such a degree)
Strong communication skills and a willingness to collaborate in a team-oriented environment
Expedition Technology is an employee-owned defense and aerospace technology small business that has become a market leader in developing software applications running advanced machine learning algorithms for the DOD and Intelligence Communities. We offer a collaborative team-based culture, a people-first mentality and a focus on cutting edge solutions.

We offer self-directed, company-paid, comprehensive medical, dental and vision benefits. Additionally, our team enjoys a 401k with up to 12% company match, equity shares, paid holidays, paid time off, tuition reimbursement programs and a student loan repayment option. Most importantly, we offer an environment where we are encouraged to push boundaries, take risks and enjoy the rewards.

EXP is proud that our dynamic and collaborative culture along with our generous benefits package allowed us to earn a spot on the 2019 Washington Business Journal's Best Places to Work List.

If you are interested in seeing for yourself why our employees' voices made us a Best Place to Work, we'd love to talk with you.

EXP is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer that believes a diverse range of talent creates an environment that fuels creativity and innovation. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, national origin, genetic information or protected veteran status.

Powered by JazzHR",5.0,"Expedition Technology, Inc.
5.0","Herndon, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
47,Data Scientist,$67k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"STRATACACHE provides salable customer experiences, empowering retailers to learn deeply about their customers’ shopping preferences and behaviors, allowing for personalized shopper interaction. Our solutions deliver consumer activation at the point-of-decision, generating new sales opportunities and enhanced retail profitability. With 3 million+ software activations globally, we power the biggest digital networks for the world’s largest brands. Across the STRATACACHE family of complementary digital media/ad tech solution companies, we have the technology, expertise and track record to bring retail innovation that delivers results.

Learn more about the STRATACACHE family at www.stratacache.com.

Data Scientist

Do you love data? Do you enjoy creating statistical models and finding insights that make a difference? Are you interested in the future of retail, commerce, and customer analytics? If so, this is the role for you. In this role you will have the opportunity to work with software engineering, sales, and product organizations to develop innovative, impactful data applications. Your efforts will enhance the overall product quality utilizing many aspects of data science, including various types of modeling that drive toward strategic analytics. You will be focused on the future of the restaurant and retail experience by discovering insights while creating strategic, marketing, retail, customer experience and digital analytics. Your background in statistics, data science, big data, normalization, modeling, quantitative research, and/or analytics consulting will be very beneficial as you take on this exciting position in the company and join our Data Science team. In this role you will also have the opportunity to continue to build and improve the marketing of technology products that are influenced by data, understand human behavior and determine how to influence and impact the retail marketplace with exciting new solutions and insights.

Responsibilities include:

Design, build, and deliver statistical models and related actionable data-focused results to support product and customer requirements and initiatives.
Work closely with engineering, product and sales teams to understand business and technical requirements, translate these into important discovery directives, and follow through to optimize and support the enhancement and growth of Stratacache products.
Establish and make effective use of internal and external datasets to back up and support key strategic, product, and customer decision-making efforts.
Serve as the data science expert on cross-functional teams for large strategic initiatives and education on accessing and utilizing qualified and focused data for decision making.
Analyze, propose, design and successfully deliver data experiments for engineering, product and sales teams to ensure statistical rigor and effectiveness.
Provide expertise and professionalism in handling sensitive, privacy-protected data, including sources, structures, organization, and optimization.
Communicate complex ideas about our product through visual aids like charts and dashboards.
Keep up-to-date with emerging data science and statistical technologies, methods and practices.
Create and/or use existing data models for predictions regarding user behavior.
Communicate ideas, processes, and results to all levels of internal and external clients and teams.
Basic & Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor's degree required in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Quantitative Analysis, or other technical field related to software development.
Minimum 3 years of related experience working with data science and statistical modeling.
Experience in the QSR, retail or ecommerce industries from a data perspective is required.
Experience with recommendation engines and discovering new and advanced modeling methods i.e. deep neural networks, gradient boosted decision trees, etc.. is required.
Experience with SQL and at least one functional or statistical programming language is required.
Minimum of 3 years of related experience working with R and Python is required.
Minimum of 3 years of related experience working with REST APIs is required.
Experience working with Postgres, Timescale DB and/or other related database technologies is required.
Ability to distill complex statistical concepts and methodology, and articulate insights to cross-functional teams and clients with varying levels of knowledge in this space is required.
Ability to work with distributed and remote teams is required.
Experience with complex query writing is required.
Experience with result-set performance tuning and related data administration is required.
Experience with big data technologies is required.
Experience and understanding of various statistical modeling tools and platforms is required.
Experience in ecommerce, wifi, app messaging, social and other datasets is beneficial.
Experience in machine learning and artificial intelligence methods and practice is beneficial.
Understanding and experience with database technologies is beneficial including Oracle, SQLServer, etc..
Understanding and experience with BI technologies is beneficial: Tableau, Microstrategy, Microsoft, OBI, etc..
Experience with kafka, Go, or Redis is beneficial.
Understanding of data modeling techniques and star schemas is beneficial.
Experience with Hadoop and MapReduce is beneficial.
Experience with ftp, file transfers, data exchange methodologies.
A solid understanding of methodology, data and systems from a broad range of research and analytics providers, including emerging tools and methods is required.
Ability to articulate and tie data to business strategy.
Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint skills
Self-motivated, self-starter with a team-centric focus while working in a fluid environment.
Exceptional communication skills: verbal, written, and presentation.
Experience in the following areas: strategic analytics, marketing analytics, digital analytics, data analytics, statistics, data science, big data, normalization, modeling, quant research, analytics consulting.
Desire and interest to uncover and discover insights using disparate data sources.
Desire and interest in being the “Go To” person for data science.
Dynamic personality and passion for data, analytics, visualizations and storytelling is beneficial for this role.
Keen sense of user interface design, style, aesthetics and effective visual presentation.
Experience with agile development methodologies.
Ability to work effectively in fast-paced, results-oriented work environment.
Ability to handle and adjust to change in requirements and direction.
Positive attitude, attention to detail, and great problem solving skills are important.

STRATACACHE and its family of companies provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, genetic information, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical condition, veteran, marital, parental, citizenship, or domestic partner status, or any other status protected by applicable national, federal, state or local law.

While we are excited and appreciate you interest in our opportunities, please keep in mind that we are not able to contact all applicants that have applied.

No vendor/agency solicitation please.",3.6,"STRATACACHE
3.6","Malvern, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
48,Data Scientist,$79k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: Data Scientists

Job Description
Join an elite group dedicated to continuous personal improvement as GCT is currently seeking Data Scientists of all levels to support an intelligence agency with insights gained from analyzing voluminous sensor data. The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. Candidates must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes.

Clearance: TS/SCI w/Full scope polygraph (or used within the past 24 months)

Education/Experience Requirements

Senior Positions:
Masters degree in Data Science, Statistics, Mathematics, Computer Science or another quantitative field, or extensive comparable experience
10+ years of relevant experience
Junior/Intermediate Positions
Completed B.S. in Data Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or a closely related technical field
3-9 years of relevant experience
Qualifications
Experience using statistical computer languages (SAS, SPSS, R, Python, SLQ, etc.) to manipulate data and draw insights fromlarge data sets
Experience working with and creating data architectures
Knowledge of a variety of machine learning techniques (clustering, decision tree learning, artificial neural networks, etc.) and their real-world advantages/drawbacks
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Strong problem solving skills
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques
Desired Skills
Experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models
Coding knowledge and experience with several languages: C, C++, Java, JavaScript, etc.
Knowledge and experience in statistical and data mining techniques: GLM/Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, Bayes, etc.
Experience querying databases and using statistical computer languages: R, Python, SLQ, etc.
Experience using web services: Redshift, S3, Spark, DigitalOcean, AWS, etc.
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics: regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc.
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers: Google Analytics, Site Catalyst, Coremetrics, Adwords, Crimson Hexagon, Facebook Insights, etc.
Experience with distributed data/computing tools: Map/Reduce, Hadoop, Hive, Spark, Gurobi, MySQL, etc.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using: Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, etc.
The success of Great-Circle Technologies depends on the success and well-being of its employees. GCT promotes work/life balance and encourages the overall well-being of each of its contributors. A comprehensive benefits package is provided, which currently includes company paid single medical, dental, life, disability, and long-term care insurances (with contributions to family premiums,) matching 401k plan, 34 days off per year including 10 Federal holidays plus the day after Thanksgiving, Christmas and New Year’s eves!

Join us at Great-Circle Technologies, where innovation is the shortest distance between two points.

Great-Circle Technologies is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Great-Circle Technologies ensures all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to gender, race, ethnic background, religion, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, or protected veteran status.",2.2,"Great-Circle Technologies
2.2","Chantilly, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
49,Data Scientist,$74k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist

About US

At Vyaire, we help the world breathe easier. As a global leader in respiratory care, we know what we do enables, improves and extends lives. We are a young company with a long history of revolutionary products. We devise extraordinary solutions that allow patients to lead ordinary lives. We believe the best way to create value for our customers, is to become invaluable. We know a dynamic culture with diversity of thought makes this possible. Our colleagues are people who specialize in exceeding expectations, building lasting relationships and making it a priority to listen. We are dedicated to anticipating what’s next and get it done. We thrive on contributing and making a difference.

To learn more, visit our website: www.vyaire.com

Watch our video: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZDrQoMbMRrI&feature=youtu.be

About this role

Vyaire teams are dedicated to connecting clinicians and patients with the highest quality respiratory healthcare solutions in the market. At Vyaire, you will find a company that puts the customer at the center of all we do. Our culture is one that rewards performance and each interaction we have with a customer furthers our mission to be the global leader in respiratory care.

We have an exciting opportunity for a Biostatistician with demonstrated expertise in clinical study design and analysis, who specializes in statistical methodologies used to support analytical and clinical validation of medical technology. Working in collaboration with scientists and physicians, you will provide advanced statistical and analytical expertise to Vyaire. You will use your knowledge of clinical study design and biostatistics to provides technical leadership, knowledge, experience and expertise by planning, conducting and supervising clinical development and evidence management projects. You will contribute to the clinical development strategy and ensure statistical integrity, optimal study designs and data and evidence needs are reflected and fulfilled within that strategy. To achieve Vyaire’s objectives, you provide out-of-the-box thinking to develop innovative clinical study designs, quantitative decision making and the incorporation of evidence from disparate sources of big data.

Critical deliverables include the design and formulation of statistical methodologies and input that ensure quality and consistency of key data deliverables across studies. You will analyze data and prepare and review study protocols, statistical analysis plans, interim study reports, manuscripts, abstracts and other technical documents and procedures pertaining to statistical methods.

Essential Functions:
Be an integral member of product development team responsible for supporting claims development, and data management in clinical studies.
Possess data management expertise and advanced knowledge in biostatistical concepts and practical application of such concepts to the assessment of medical device technology.
Serve as a subject matter expert in biostatistics, epidemiology, data mining, data analytics, and data management.
Provide study design and biostatistical guidance to Offering Management, Marketing and Development teams.
Provide functional excellence in the areas of statistics, data analysis and data processing for the department.
Apply extensive fundamental and specialized knowledge to the development of clinical protocols for device validation, respond to FDA questions, implementing new approaches to automated data processing for clinical trials.
Propose new ideas and recommend implementation plans leading to enhanced efficiencies and faster review and analysis of data.
Provide statistical input and advice to clinical teams for the design of studies and sample size/power estimations, including the design, writing and review of study protocols, development of statistical analysis plans and development of analyses requiring advanced statistical methodologies.
Design and lead the preparation of statistical components of protocols which meet project objectives, health authority guidelines, and clinical trial methodology standards.
Lead the analysis, evaluation and planning for methods of approach, and organizes means to achieve the solution to highly complex problems.
Interpret and evaluate statistical data and results of the most complex investigations and develop appropriate recommendations.
Lead the development of reports, charts, graphs, and other documents which support claims recommendations.
Lead building the data and evidence for Vyaire offerings.
Support develop the standards for clinical conduct, data collection, management and/or reporting.
Provide clear and regular technical and administrative input to professional, technical and administrative personnel assigned to a project.
Recognize and address issues which may impact the statistical integrity of the evidence development program or recognition of datasets for which different statistical tools may add value.
Qualifications:
PhD or MS degree with 5+ years of experience in a Healthcare medical device or Life sciences pharmaceutical regulated process mature environment
Experience with clinical decision support systems and/or software as a medical device is critical.
Demonstrated experience of applying statistical methods in biomedical research, pharmaceutical, medical device or CRO experience is required.
Good knowledge of ICH GCP guidelines, FDA regulations and demonstrated experience with pharma and/or medical device clinical trials and FDA/NDA submissions is required.
Experience with study design methodology such as adaptive design or pragmatic clinical trials, state-of-the-art modeling approaches, incorporation of real word evidence or experience analyzing big data.
Ability to understand scientific questions and formulate statistical and data-analytic methods to provide solutions to novel problems.
Sound knowledge of statistical methodologies such as analysis of variance, regression, experimental designs, contingency tables.
Expertise with SAS and R.
Ability to work independently and in project teams.
Excellent communication skills (written and spoken).
Atlanta, GA, Dallas, TX, Irvine, CA, Mettawa, IL, New York City, NY, Orlando, FLFull time",3.1,"Vyaire Medical
3.1","Dallas, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
50,Data Scientist - DAB,$83k-$144k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovation-driven company that will inspire you and empower you to shine? Join us in our Cambridge, MA office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by an unwavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world.

Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission.

For the Takeda global scientific community who aspire to deliver transformative medicines to patients Scientific Informatics is the technology leader, with domain specific expertise, that provides innovative platforms and technologies to improve both operational efficiency and data-driven decision making. As an embedded partner Scientific Informatics is at the leading edge of both science and technology and proactively reacts to the changing scientific environment and needs of researchers in an agile fashion to deliver timely, value-adding solutions.

The Digital Advisory Board programs aim to ensure our growing data is easily accessible to everyone so we can help our patients and HCPs faster and more effectively.

Real World Evidence

Real World Evidence - Increase the use of real-world data across the Takeda value chain to accelerate our clinical trials and demonstrate patient outcomes.

We believe patients should receive the best support, anywhere, anytime, as they need it. We will do this by providing digital solutions that put patients at the heart of their care by integrating and personalizing the support they receive.

We will explore partnering externally and internally to provide fit-for-purpose solutions that help patients and care teams from diagnosis through treatment and beyond. We will leverage the power of data and technology to gain insights into diseases, treatments or lifestyle to improve the quality of care and make it as unique to each patient as possible.

OBJECTIVES/PURPOSE

Independently perform complex analysis using modern Data Science techniques against structured or unstructured data and report results back to generate insights to Takeda.
Apply machine learning, deep learning and other advanced techniques while performing Data Analysis engagements. This is against structured and un-structured data sets, at small and large scale.
Provide mentorship to other Data Engineers, Data Scientists and Data Specialists across R&D and Vaccine at Takeda as we elevate our data IQ across the organization. This will include coordination of Internal and External collaborations.
Deliver critical analysis against Takeda’s toughest data problems to give us critical insight to the organization’s largest questions.

ACCOUNTABILITIES

Perform machine learning, deep learning and other advanced data techniques at a level of quality that can be defended by peers at a PHD level across the organizations.
Introduce novel and state-of-the-art computational techniques to other teams and scientists to improve capabilities for data analysis with the purpose of deriving high accuracy insight from available datasets more efficiently.
Understanding and usage of different Supervised and Unsupervised learning techniques, their biases, how and when to apply them and which methods are the best for a particular analysis.
Ability to wrangle raw data sets into a format that can have advanced methods applied against the resulting data.
Work independently on tough problems with other team members and independently solve, with some guidance, very difficult technology and data problems.
Demonstrates advanced tooling and techniques to other technical organizations throughout the company

CORE ELEMENTS RELATED TO THIS ROLE

Provide leadership and expertise to best construct data and execute analysis for feature detection, retrospective and predictive modelling, within a complex R&D and Vaccines environment.
Understanding of Machine Learning, Deep Learning, Re-enforcement learning and other techniques to be able to use and teach these methods inside the organization.
Ability to stay up to speed on modern data techniques, understand how to apply them and constantly demonstrated how and where to apply these new methods.
Ability to produce analysis for and defend results to PhD and executive level audience across the organizations
Design, Execute, QC and Deliver Data Science Analysis independently and effectively across the organization

EDUCATION, BEHAVIOURAL COMPETENCIES AND SKILLS

Master’s Degree or PhD in Computer Science, Data Science or equivalent
3+ years’ experience or a PhD and relevant project / coursework
Expertise with the Application of Machine Learning and / or Deep Learning
Up-to-date specialized knowledge of data wrangling, manipulation and management of technologies
Experience with Spark
Ability to manipulate voluminous data with different degree of structuring across disparate sources to build and communicate actionable insights for internal or external parties
Possesses strong personal skills to portray information
Ability to work in an agile and rapid changing environment with high quality deliverables
Experience with two of the following languages: Python, R, Java or Scala
Experience with deep learning frameworks: TensorFlow, MX Net
Working knowledge of SQL and NoSQL datastores
Experience in a scientific environment

Locations

Cambridge, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Cambridge, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
51,Senior Android Engineer,$64k-$120k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are

WillowTree is an award-winning digital product agency driven by innovation and grounded in strategy and user-centered design. We create long-term partnerships with the world's leading brands to design and build digital flagship products crucial to their core business. We are one of the largest independent digital firms in the US. Some of our clients include HBO, National Geographic, Anheuser-Busch, and PepsiCo.

The Opportunity

As a Senior Software Engineer at WillowTree, you'll have the opportunity to impact teammates throughout various stages of their careers. You'll have clear oversight of how engineering runs day-to-day and will influence project outcomes.

We understand our responsibility to create a diverse, equitable, and inclusive place within the tech industry, while pushing to make our industry more representative. Because of this responsibility, we need candidates who value diversity and inclusion through their work, team collaboration, or mentorship. So in your cover letter, we encourage you to reflect on diversity, equity, and inclusion.
This is not a remote position and may require some travel. Currently, all team members are working from home until our offices reopen.
Responsibilities
Lead the delivery of large and complex software projects from beginning to end in a team-based environment
Confidently deliver high-quality software by applying critical thinking to products, requirements, and processes
Work closely with clients to influence technical product decisions and business goals
You'll stay up to date with the landscape of software engineering best practices, tools, and frameworks
Understanding of various software architectures and can adapt and compose solutions to unique problems with sustainable and reusable solutions
Mentor a larger team towards shared goals and outcomes
Navigate difficult conversations by providing constructive feedback to teams and clients
You'll identify obstacles to ensure quality, improve our user experience and how we build software
Self-aware of limitations, yet curious to learn new solutions and receptive to constructive feedback from teammates
You'll guide your team to understand and work through changing priorities by bringing positive energy
Communicate and simplify complex problems in order to foster understanding across multidisciplinary teams
Apply your knowledge and findings at an organizational scale
You'll travel onsite to meet with our clients about one week per month
Qualifications
You've built and deployed complex software at scale involving at least one of our core technologies (iOS, Android, Web Apps, API Engineering)
You understand unit testing, when to apply design patterns, and how to use tools like profilers
Significant expertise with ORM/SQLite, understanding of versioning and migrations
Experience with CoordinatorLayout
Knowledge of layout pass implications and performance
Experience managing multiple themes and styles across an application
Grasp of resource buckets for defining locale and device specific layouts and resources
Ability to account for accessibility services like TalkBack (focusability, content descriptions, accessibility delegates, etc.)
Understanding of how to avoid data races, experience with shared memory between threads, and knowledge of when to use concurrent collections
You've owned and led the delivery of major features and components
You've worked with clients and stakeholders (consulting experience, ability to have difficult conversations or solve and advocate for best practices)
Empathetic to client needs and desire to contribute sound recommendations on technical architecture and design
Leadership or mentorship experience
Can present complex ideas to clients and team members in a compelling and energetic way
Proficiency using, modifying, and creating development tools that foster efficiency and improve process
You consider 'big picture' perspectives and can successfully balance business goals and technical constraints
Bonus Points
You've conducted interviews and have hired for your team
Expertise with advanced automation tools (e.g. virtualization, machine learning-based testing, massive parallelization)
Basic understanding of how to design RESTful APIs that are optimized for responsive, interactive mobile experiences
Appreciation of pixel-perfect UI implementations
Experience with a build tool (e.g. Jenkins, TeamCity, CircleCI, Travis CI, etc)
Knowledge of risks identified in OWASP Secure Coding Practices
Understanding of appropriate licensing for 3rd party libraries
A list of emerging technologies we're interested in: Big Data, Machine Learning, Voice, AR/VR, Security Background, and IoT
You have code samples or a GitHub account to share and while you're there, check us out!

Even if you don't have expertise in all of the qualifications listed, we value new perspectives and backgrounds and encourage you to apply. We're committed to building a diverse company that reflects the diversity of our users. We're committed to growth-mindset.

Why WillowTree?

We offer a place to be yourself.

Our differences, both visible and invisible, benefit our teams, our communities, and the products we craft. That's why WillowTree strives to build a team with diverse backgrounds, skills, and perspectives. You'll work hard here; however, we'll balance that with a culture that supports your growth and cares about your well-being. We're committed to creating an environment of inclusion — a place where every Tree can thrive.

We want you to reach your fullest potential and part of your professional development at WillowTree will include dedicated time to innovate on passion projects and an annual stipend to fund your professional pursuits.

WillowTree celebrates our differences and provides equal employment opportunities to all team members and applicants without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws. Diverse teams build better products. We acknowledge that the tech industry especially lacks opportunity for those who are of non-traditional backgrounds and in underrepresented groups. In order to create the best products for everyone, we know that it's important for our team to reflect the diversity of our users, and we are committed to being the change we want to see.",4.9,"WillowTree
4.9","Durham, NC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
52,Interface/Interoperability Engineer,$51k-$119k (Glassdoor Est.),"Vohra Wound Physicians is a dynamic and innovative physician management group with cutting edge proprietary systems. The company is experiencing incredible growth and partnerships with other systems and networks and so is currently looking for a motivated, experienced developer to take ownership of the mission critical interfaces that are vital to patient data exchange. This is a fast-paced, results-oriented and team-centric environment and is a great opportunity to work with a solid group
Responsibilities: *
· Responsible for the development and maintenance of APIs to distribute critical machine learning-derived patient data to our proprietary EHR system, proprietary mobile application and third-party systems

· Responsible for maintaining legacy HL7 systems in Mirth

· Responsible for clear and concise documentation related to all interfaces

· Leadership in terms of all interface oversight and overall health

· Ownership of data integrity checks across interfaces

· Provision of support for FHIR and API connectivity for our systems and implementing CCDA connectivity

· SQL programming and stored procedure development

· Create and analyze complex SQL and SSIS as needed to support new and evolving data integration projects and data extracts

· Conduct ETL / ELT performance tuning, troubleshooting, support and capacity

· Ownership of industry-standard security protocols related to electronic patient health information (ePHI) exchange
Required Experience: *
· BA in Computer Science, or equivalent degree

· 7+ years Development experience required

· Minimum 5 years Microsoft Stack Development in C-sharp required

· Minimum 2 years’ experience responsible for Production Mirth interfaces

· Has base familiarity with SQL and SQL Server

· Experience with ETL, XML, XSL, Schema, and DTD

· Healthcare technology experience

· Understanding and knowledge/ability to learn FHIR specifications

· Has proven implemented and support within an API in production

· Has experience organizing and working efficiently within JIRA or similar system

· Understanding and knowledge of CCDA specifications is a benefit (though not an absolute requirement)

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $110,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year

Experience:
IT development: 7 years (Required)
Microsoft Stack Development in C-Sharp: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off",4.5,"Vohra Wound Physicians
4.5","Miramar, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
53,Machine Learning Engineer,$81k-$140k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we are: Fueled by a fundamental belief that having access to financial services creates opportunity, PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) is committed to democratizing financial services and empowering people and businesses to join and thrive in the global economy. Our open digital payments platform gives PayPal’s 286 million active account holders the confidence to connect and transact in new and powerful ways, whether they are online, on a mobile device, in an app, or in person. Through a combination of technological innovation and strategic partnerships, PayPal creates better ways to manage and move money, and offers choice and flexibility when sending payments, paying or getting paid. Available in more than 200 markets around the world, the PayPal platform, including Braintree, Venmo and Xoom enables consumers and merchants to receive money in more than 100 currencies, withdraw funds in 56 currencies and hold balances in their PayPal accounts in 25 currencies.

Job Description Summary: PayPal customer success team is looking for a talented and highly motivated senior engineer for a technical domain that comprises of customer data analytics and ML/DL models development to support different business use cases

Job Description:

We are looking for a talented and highly motivated senior engineer for a technical domain that comprises of customer data analytics and ML/DL models development to support different business use cases

5+ Years of Experience Desired
Discovering, analyzing, structuring and mining data
Statistical hypotheses validation and model performance analysis
Developing neural network models supporting business use cases
Design and coordinate implementation of DL based solutions for production usage
Deep understanding of data mining algorithms and statistical methods
Experience in successfully applying machine learning to real-world problems
Strong knowledge of Deep Learning frameworks: Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch, etc
Knowledge in python and packages for data analysis (scipy, numpy, pandas, matplotlib)
Proficient in one or more of programming languages Scala, Java, C++
Strong knowledge of extracting and processing data with RDBMS/NoSQL
Experience with one or more Container-ecosystem (Docker, Mesos, Kubernetes) will be a plus
Good communication skills and team player attitude
Experience in Natural Language Processing/Understanding using deep neural networks ( RNN (LSTM, GRU) / CNN) is a plus
Experience in working with GPU, profiling/low-level optimizations, Cuda/CuDNN is a plus
Experience with BigData ecosystem Hadoop, Hive, Spark/PySpark is a plus

We're a purpose-driven company whose beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We hold ourselves to our One Team Behaviors which demand that we hold the highest ethical standards, to empower an open and diverse workplace, and strive to treat everyone who is touched by our business with dignity and respect. Our employees challenge the status quo, ask questions, and find solutions. We want to break down barriers to financial empowerment. Join us as we change the way the world defines financial freedom.

PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities.",4.0,"PayPal
4.0","Austin, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1998,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
54,"Scientist/Machine Learning Engineer, Applied Science",$83k-$139k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Scientist/Senior Scientist/Lead Scientist - (Machine Learning Engineers) will work with the rest of the team to research, invent, and implement the next generation prediction, optimization, and analytics technology. You are a brilliant, motivated self-starter and an extremely fast learner with top notch problem solving, and analytical skills. You have a deep sense of curiosity and innate desire to dig deep into terabytes of data and love to play with the innards of complex algorithms, mathematical constructs and code.

Responsibilities
Research, design and/or implement solutions to challenging problems in real-time bidding domain, such as all kinds of optimization problems, audience understanding, etc.
Research and improve features and machine learning models for production pipeline.
Provide insights and suggestions on customer campaign optimization problems and product/platform optimization problems through statistical data analysis when needed.
Drive innovation by identifying and formulating new problems, publishing papers, filing patents, etc.
Required Qualifications
PhD degree in a closely related field (e.g.: computer science/engineering, optimization) with publications in the area is strongly preferred
Or Masters with significant experience in advertising and Machine Learning
Experience in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, data mining, statistical modeling, optimization, algorithms, big-data, game theory
Proficiency with one or more programming languages - ability to write/debug production code.
Excellent communication skills – ability to present and communicate complex ideas in simple terms
Strong statistical/math/analytical abilities; Exceptional problem solving skills
Desired Qualifications
Previous experience in the advertising industry
Strong programming experience with Java, C/C++, Python and/or Scala
Excellent knowledge in algorithms and data structures
#LI-KM1

About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.8,"Amobee
3.8","Redwood City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
55,Senior Unified Communications Engineer,$13-$23 Per Hour(Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary*
Asset Inventories is an IT Services company that has been in business for 27+ years. We are headquartered in New York City with regional offices around the US and Canada. Our core focus is servicing large financial firms remotely. We have an immediate need for a customer-service driven Unified Communications Engineer.

The Senior Unified Communications Engineer is a full-time position, working remotely in a 60/40 split. Approximately two days per week will be on-site at the main office in either Midtown Manhattan or Jersey City, New Jersey. The Senior Unified Communications Engineer must have Office 365 certifications and real-world experience.

Prospective candidates who are authorized to work in the US are encouraged to apply. At this time we are not sponsoring or transferring work visas.

_Please note that we are not able to work with third party employers to fill these positions due to client requirements._
Main Responsibilities: *
Day to day responsibilities include but are not limited to:
Serve as a Senior-level Unified Communications expert with both operational and design engineering responsibilities in a Windows Infrastructure environment
Emphasis on Microsoft Lync/Skype, Enterprise Voice integration (Oracle/Acme Packet) SBC/ECB, Cisco Call Manager, and regulatory recording solutions (Verba, NICE NTR, Global Relay)
Key Focus on automation and DevOps within the Unified Communications Perimeter
Work closely with both IT and business partners to design and implement solutions supporting business needs
Within a team, design and implement critical business systems aligned with corporate strategic direction
Ability to multi-task and manage operational and project related tasks/responsibilities
Must be able to act autonomously and manage projects efficiently
This role requires the ability to explain & justify design decisions to IT peers and articulate the advantages and risks of alternative solutions
Responsible for diagnosing and troubleshooting complex Skype/Cisco enterprise voice and unified communication issues
As required, perform root cause analysis, incident management, communication with internal clients / business partners / Service team members
Ensures all production changes are made in accordance with production lifecycle methodology and risk/change management guidelines
The senior expert will provide technical mentoring to other team members and actively participate in architecture reviews/ strategic development activities
Strong hands-on technical skills, an analytical problem-solving mindset, delivery focus and client-orientation are all critical for this role
Participate/Contribute with after-hours/weekend work in rotation with all members of the team
SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE NEEDED*
COMPETENCIES: *
Required:
Must have Office 365 Certifications
Must have hands-on architecture/design and implementation experience with expert level knowledge of Microsoft technologies (Lync/Skype, Active Directory, DNS), scripting (Powershell, Python, automation) and Agile methodologies
Experience with Unified Communications technologies related to Enterprise Voice, Archiving, and External Federation Services
Exposure to other infrastructure areas including: Active Directory, Vmware, NAS Storage, Backup & Recovery, SQL Server, etc
Expertise and troubleshooting experience with TCP/IP, DNS and some level of experience with network infrastructure/ topology
Desired:
Specific familiarity with Oracle/Acme Packet SBC or comparable products
Knowledge of Session Initiation Protocol (SIP) and/or Skinny Client Control Protocol (SCCP)
Involvement with Archiving solutions: Global Relay, NICE NTR, Verba
Forwarding thinking of implementing Ethical Wall and Machine Learning capabilities within the collaboration ecosystem
ITIL experience is preferred
TECHNICAL SKILLS*
Required:
Cloud Services (Office 365), Lync/Skype, Scripting, Active Directory, Skype Enterprise Voice (Oracle/Acme Packet SBC), Cisco Call Manager, Archiving Services
Desired:
Trading Telephony technologies
PRIOR WORK EXPERIENCE*
Required:
Minimum 6-8 years
Desired:
Financial services business knowledge, particularly prior work experience with financial industries
EDUCATION*
Required:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science/Engineering or the equivalent experience
Desired:
Certification in MS technologies and IT Project Management
LANGUAGE*
Required:
English speaking
Desired:
French speaking
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $110,000.00 - $120,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Office 365: 3 years (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.5,"Asset Inventories, Inc.
2.5","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Contract,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
56,Azure Engineer Tier 3,-1,"AZURE ENGINEER – TIER 3

Join one of the fastest growing companies in America.

US Cloud added to the Inc 5000 List – ranking of private companies with the most proven track records.

To see our US Cloud blog page, click here.

Our 100% USA-based, never-outsourced Microsoft Premier Support engineers are the engine that drives US Cloud. And if you want to be recognized and work with the best of the best, our Premier Support team is for you. Engineering at US Cloud isn’t a cost center, it’s a profit center. New engineers coming over from the enterprise or MSP’s are surprised at how different it feels to be the lifeblood of a company vs. an ancillary support service. Simply put, our engineers are corporate IT’s first-responders and we give them the credit and respect they deserve each time they save the day for one of our clients.

US Cloud engineers get the most challenging questions from savvy clients like NASA, Garmin, American Cancer Society, L.L.Bean, Bayer, and the US State Department, to name just a few -- all of them depending on us to underpin their Microsoft environments and keep them running. When they can’t fix it, they call US Cloud.

ABOUT US CLOUD

Our simple mission is to liberate businesses shackled to mediocre, overpriced, and monopolistic Microsoft Support. As a Microsoft Certified Partner for 20+ years, Fpweb.net and CyberVault, now US Cloud, has supported 1,000’s of Microsoft clients in over 80 countries.

With recent and dramatic changes in Microsoft’s strategy, the demand for high-quality, cost-effective 3rd-party product support has erupted. Simply put, we need more hands-on deck to help manage our current growth and to make the most of this intensifying trend.

WHY JOIN US CLOUD?

Snacks, coffee and gym memberships are great, but what typically gets our engineers excited is learning new things. By design we team folks across technologies, so they cross-pollinate and share information daily – no product silos here. We move engineers in and out of team pods so they don’t get stale. Our engineers knowledge-share via catered lunches and training seminars on hot technologies like Cloud, Artificial Intelligence, and Machine Learning.

Plus, opportunities to progress in your career go hand-in-hand with rapidly growing companies. Our team members have more opportunities to shift concentrations, tackle new technologies, or step into leadership roles as our business continues to expand. And because our engineers are at the apex of our company’s focus, you also have a voice – to weigh in and make US Cloud the future you want.

*Must be a subject matter expert in all things Azure, On-Prem and Cloud.

RESPONSIBILITIES
As a Premier Support Engineer, your focus will be to represent US Cloud in communications via onsite, phone, email, and web to assist clients and partners in deploying, operating and troubleshooting Microsoft technologies such as Windows server and desktop, Office 365, Azure, SharePoint, Exchange, SQL, Skype, System Center and Dynamics. You will have the opportunity to foster positive client relationships while effectively managing challenging situations and driving client success.

Your key business metrics will be to:
Obtain high client and partner onboarding and ticket satisfaction
Drive client success and adoption of Microsoft technologies
Reduce time/cost to onboard and resolve tickets
Provide high quality data to help drive service improvement
Support Management – 50%
Serve as an escalation point for client tickets.
Participate in proactive account management, spot performance issues, analyze problems, develop solutions to meet client needs, represent them.
Provides the most effective method of service delivery by analyzing trends and common themes across clients.
Create deliverables to address common Premier client needs & support mobile-first, cloud-first strategy, share intellectual property with others.
Engages in strategic service delivery planning to strengthen targeted client relationships.
Gathers client impressions of products and services and integrates this feedback into decision making.
Seeks information about the underlying needs of clients.
Allocates and aligns resources to optimize the client experience.
Develops and communicates realistic performance goals and standards.
Builds plans that consider potential obstacles and immediate and long-term consequences.
Demonstrates expertise in a specific solution, or several products, feature functions, or services.
Provides stakeholder assistance throughout deployment to avoid/resolve technical issues.
Support Execution – Deliver Results through Teamwork & Optimizing Business Results – 35%
Seeks opportunities to drive business results by collaborating with multiple team members.
Identifies opportunities to articulate business value and grow client/partner relationships in alignment with US Cloud business priorities.
Provides and drives actionable feedback across groups about the client/partner experience and competitor threats.
Modifies existing intellectual property (IP) or, where applicable, creates new content.
Leadership and Growing the Business - 15%
Consistently apply “lessons learned”, model personal accountability & teamwork.
Demonstrates an understanding of his or her role and contribution to client change management and adoption initiatives.
Understands client requirements and can map the adoption and optimization of Microsoft technology solutions accordingly.
Contribute & participate with meetings to articulate Premier offerings to all clients; share knowledge thru communities, adapt for clients.
Cultivates relationships, credibility, and loyalty with clients and partners intentionally by sharing relevant business expertise.
Demonstrated self-learner.
QUALIFICATIONS

Experience:
5+ years’ technical support with Microsoft Azure
Extensive experience with Microsoft Office 365 including hybrid environment migrations
Strong knowledge of the Azure Security Stack
Understanding of Azure DevOps principles
Solid knowledge of MSFT Threat Protection Suite
Experience with Powershell
Azure storage and network connectivity
Patch management
Azure subscriptions and clustering
Strong knowledge of hypervisor and infrastructure API technologies
8+ years’ experience in Microsoft technologies
5+ years’ experience in Windows Server
Experience in Active Directory/Azure AD, and DNS
Relevant certifications in Microsoft technologies
Technical proficiency in and learning attitude towards Microsoft and related technologies
Proven ability to work virtually
Communication Skills – Spoken and written English (including technical writing)
Analytical problem solving
Education: Bachelor’s degree in computer science, engineering, math, or equivalent.

Prior Roles: Technical consulting experience, or support experience in a second or third tier.

What it’s Like to Work at US Cloud:

US Cloud has the personality of a high-growth start-up, but we’re built on 20+ years as a successful Microsoft service provider. That brings financial stability and consistency of purpose not seen in most entrepreneurial organizations.

At US Cloud, we focus on fostering a happy place for you to thrive. Besides offering full benefits (medical, dental, etc.), we provide things like:
Flextime
Paid gym membership
Dog friendly offices
Free Starbucks, soft drinks, and snacks
Fun company events
We are also getting ready to move into our new home –50,000 sq.ft. of office space in Des Peres we own and are building out as a state-of-the-art tech services hub and US Cloud HQ. We are all working from home right now but anticipate being in our new digs this winter.

US Cloud is an equal opportunity employer and we value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, dietary preferences, gender, sexual orientation, age, fashion sense, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or political leanings. Come as you are.",4.1,"US Cloud
4.1","Town and Country, MO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1996,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
57,Senior Data Scientist,$72k-$122k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you a talented and passionate engineer? Do you love solving problems and making ideas come to life? Are you a lifelong learner who thrives in dynamic environments and enjoys the challenge of learning new technologies and techniques? Are you a team player and enjoy collaboration, but you are also self-directed and enjoy the autonomy to be able to manage your own schedule and workload? Do you appreciate the importance of good communication and know that teamwork takes practice, effort and a good attitude? If so, we want to speak with you.

The Senior Data Scientist is responsible for collaborating with the team to design and implement systems that focus on forecasting, allocating, delivering, and reporting of advertising on the internet, TV, and connected devices. The successful candidate will utilize advanced mathematical, optimization, machine-learning, software engineering, and programming skills to solve challenging problems.

Responsibilities
Develop innovative forecasts, models, algorithms, and solutions and build prototypes and production implementations
Dig deep into high volumes of data, engineer features for improved forecast performance
Work cross-functionally to gather feedback and requirements from end users
Be a key contributor to product innovation and company strategy
Communicate technical information clearly to both technical and non-technical people
Required Qualifications
Degree in Operations Research, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Industrial Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Physics, or related field; MS/PhD preferred
3+ years of relevant experience
Strong analytical, statistical, and math abilities; Exceptional problem-solving skills
Excellent communication skills
Extreme attention to detail
Ability to work as part of a team in a fast-paced environment
#LI-KR1

About Amobee
The world’s leading independent advertising platform, Amobee unifies all advertising channels—including TV, programmatic and social—across all formats and devices. We provide marketers with streamlined, advanced media planning capabilities powered by in-depth analytics and proprietary audience data. Our platform and technology, provides the most advanced advertising solutions for the convergence of digital and advanced TV— including linear TV, over the top, connected TV, and premium digital video. Enabling advertisers to plan and activate across more than 150 integrated partners, including Facebook, Instagram, Pinterest, Snapchat and Twitter.

Amobee has been named to Fortune’s Top 10 Best Workplaces in Advertising and Marketing. Amobee’s platforms have been widely recognized amongst our industry winning numerous awards in technology innovation, see all Amobee Awards. We are a wholly owned subsidiary of Singtel, one of the largest telco companies in the world, reaching over 700 million mobile subscribers in 21 countries. Amobee operates across North America, Europe, Middle East, Asia and Australia. For more information, visit amobee.com or follow @amobee

In addition to our great environment, we offer a competitive base salary, employee development programs and other comprehensive benefits. Please send a cover letter along with your resume when applying to the position of interest located at Amobee.com. We are an Equal Opportunity Employer. No phone calls and no recruiting agencies, please.",3.8,"Amobee
3.8","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
58,Software Development Engineer,-1,"L&T Technology Services Limited (LTTS) is a listed subsidiary of Larsen & Toubro Limited focused on Engineering and R&D (ER&D) services. We offer consultancy, design, development and testing services across the product and process development life cycle. Our customer base includes 52 Fortune 500 companies and 51 of the world’s top ER&D companies, across industrial products, medical devices, transportation, telecom & hi-tech, and the process industries. Headquartered in India, we have over 14,700 employees spread across 17 global design centers, 27 global sales offices and 48 innovation labs as of December 31, 2018. For additional information about L&T Technology Services log on to www.LntTechservices.com

Software Developer
C++ - 4+ yrs
Python – 2 + yrs
ROS1 and ROS2 – Minimum 1 yr
Development experience with the Linux operating system
RADAR, LIDAR, LVDS Camera
3 -5 Years in Development C++
Job Description & Skill Requirement
The software development engineer role involves software implementation and test in support of a perception data logger and support tools. The logger is used to collect various types of camera data from field applications to support algorithm development.
The engineer will work within an immediate team of 2-3 engineers and with numerous internal process partner teams (software and systems). The engineer will be responsible for creating detailed design documentation with internal development teams.
Software engineering responsibilities include, but are not limited to:
o Develop software requirements and/implementation documentation
o Participate in test case development
o Occasionally perform software verification on concept flash files
o Coordinate feature development across the system
o Validate that project deliverables are completed correctly
o Troubleshoot identified software/system defects
o Investigate source code implementation (C/C++) as needed

The candidate must have:
o Excellent written and verbal communication (ability to coordinate with global teams)
o 3+ years of C++ implementation experience
o 3+ years of Linux Ubuntu (18/16) implementation experience
o 2+ years of Python development
o 1+ year of experience with ROS1 and ROS2 implementation

Top candidates will have:
o 1+ year of experience with CAN/J1939 communication and CANalyzer
o 1+ year of experience with perception technology (RADAR, LIDAR, Ethernet/LVDS cameras)
o Familiarity with Agile development practices and methodologies
o Experience with machine learning algorithms, Kalman filtering, image processing
#IND123",4.1,"L&T TECHNOLOGY SERVICES LIMITED
4.1","Peoria, IL",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
59,Sr Medical Imaging Engineer,-1,"The Company

We are a fast-paced startup building the next generation surgical robot platform. We’re a diverse team dedicated to creating non-invasive solutions that provide clinical value for both patients and doctors. Working here means joining an experienced startup team that is excited and passionate about creating world class products. Founded by a serial entrepreneur with 2 successful exits, the team includes former engineers from top medical robotics companies. We are a well-funded startup and expect talented, motivated, ambitious and interesting co-workers.
Role and Responsibilities*
Work with marketing and users to define and iterate requirements
Research, prototype, iterate algorithmic solutions to medical imaging segmentation, registration and reconstruction problems for surgical planning and navigation
Contribute high quality code to create a medical product that is safe and effective
Support testing and documentation
Job / Skill Requirements
MS/PhD degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Biomedical Engineering, Radiology or other related programs
Solid foundation on mathematics and analytical skills
Deep understanding of and hands-on experience in state-of-the-art (medical) image analysis algorithms
Deep understanding of and hands-on experience in Machine Learning and Deep Learning
Experience in one or more areas: volumetric image segmentation, semantic image segmentation, medical image registration, image reconstruction, graph cut, level-set, or computer vision
Strong development skills using C++, C# and/or Python (and the desire to learn new techniques and tools)
Object Oriented Programming understanding and experience
Experience with lung anatomy and pulmonary clinical application is a plus
Experience or knowledge with estimation, navigation and sensor fusion is a plus
Familiarity with tools such as ITK, VTK, OpenCV, Deep Learning frameworks
3+ years of experience in relevant algorithm development
8+ years of overall relevant experience
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $139,000.00 - $164,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Company will prepare masks for all employees and require to wear masks in the office.

Education:
Master's (Required)
Experience:
C/C++: 3 years (Required)
Python: 2 years (Required)
Deep learning: 2 years (Required)
Medical imaging: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Stealth Mode Startup,"Redwood City, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
60,Sr. Data Scientist - Model Governance,$101k-$163k (Glassdoor Est.),"General Summary:

The position plays a critical role in the oversight of predictive analytics and robust modeling at Elevate. The Sr. Data Scientist, Model Governance provides effective challenge, review, oversight, guidance, and ongoing monitoring for all models used within our Account Origination (Fraud, Risk and Response) and Account Management functions.

Principal Duties and Responsibilities:
Review models and provide effective challenge and feedback to the developers to action change.
Manage a model review/validation program aligned to OCC 2011-12 / SR 11-7 guidelines.
Perform model stability monitoring to ensure ongoing performance for business applications.
Deliver model variable stability and performance reviews on determined cadence.
Write clear and detailed model documentation coordinating efforts with the model developers.
Work with other members of the Governance team to ensure all documentation is saved in the official repository and meets internal Credit Policy standards for all new and existing models.
Utilize advanced statistical software to validate linear/non-linear, parametric/non-parametric based predictive modeling/data mining analytic methodologies.
Creation of associated decks for presentation to executive management.
Present findings and make recommendations to Model and Risk Governance teams.
Act as liaison between partner banks / third party validators and Elevate.
Complete all other projects as assigned.
Experience and Education:
Minimum M.S./M.A. in a highly quantitative field (Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, or other quantitatively-oriented degree) or experience in a process related Senior Analyst role in an analytical capacity.
Strong quantitative /statistical modeling capabilities, including with 5+ years of experience in credit scoring and model development preferred.
3+ years’ experience in Risk Management or Model Governance functions including knowledge of OCC / FDIC regulations for model documentation.
3+ years’ experience within the consumer lending environment.
Strong SAS, R, and SQL skills preferred, with ability to conduct extensive data research required. Candidates with experience with other software such as Python, SPSS, MATLAB may also be considered.
Demonstrated experience working with large complex data sources.
Strong PowerPoint presentation skills a plus.
Required Skills and Abilities:
Ability to work in fast-paced environment with ever-changing demands.
Ability to manage multiple projects at one time, possibly including overseeing others projects.
Strong communication skills. Must be able to clearly communicate in speech and writing with Risk Management peers, Marketing, Operations, Collections, Finance, C-level Executives, CEO, and BOD.",3.7,"Elevate Credit
3.7","Fort Worth, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2014,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
61,Innovation Applied Data Scientist,$60k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Responsibilities:

Noblis is positioned to provide subject matter expertise (SME) on emerging threats, data analysis, and algorithm development to decision makers in the CWMD office and DHS components using information obtained from distributed sensor network capabilities, open source reporting, and other sources.

If you are interested in this exciting opportunity to help develop and advance DHS’s new approach to countering WMD, we are actively seeking to identify personnel to join our team of talented professionals who possess the experience, vision, commitment and integrity to successfully support the strategic goals of DHS CWMD by assisting with the fulfillment of the office’ policy and strategy requirements as DHS’s CWMD focal point as an Innovation Applied Scientist for CWMD. Responsibilities include:

Responsibilities:

Develops and incorporates novel algorithms and methods for complex, large-scale data analysis in coordination with operational/analytic end-users within and outside of DHS CWMD.
Provides applied science technical advice and analytic support to the management of external pilot projects developing new systems, algorithms, and technical approaches.
Researches new technical approaches for application across the CWMD mission portfolio.
Client Engagement: · Support and lead evolving business development efforts by applying technical and functional expertise to develop business solutions. · Lead proposal sections for small or limited competition proposals and actively participate in teaming strategy discussions Qualifications:

Qualification:

Has 7-10 years of experience and a (B.A./B.S) or 3-10 years and a (M.A./M.S) in natural or physical sciences, engineering, computer science, mathematics, statistics, or related fields.
Qualifying experience must be in the natural or physical sciences, engineering, computer science, mathematics, statistics, informatics, or related fields.
Experienced with Providing technical advice and analytic support to the management of external pilot projects developing new systems, algorithms, and technical approaches.
Experience developing, or evaluating the development of, systems, algorithms, and approaches for complex large-scale data analysis across a range of different types of data.
Secret Clearance is required.

Desired:

Preferred Specialized Experience: Considerable professional experience in the natural or physical sciences, engineering, computer science, mathematics, statistics, informatics, or related fields.
Advanced education, knowledge, and capabilities in, but not limited to, mathematics, statistics, computer science, modeling and simulation, software engineering, and signal processing.
Advanced education, knowledge, and capabilities in, but not limited to, mathematics, computer science, statistical and probabilistic modeling, and advanced analytic software such as Matlab and SAS
Overview:

Noblis and our wholly owned subsidiary, Noblis ESI, are solving difficult problems that help our government and our country. We bring the best of scientific thought, management, and engineering expertise with a reputation for independence and objectivity. We support a wide range of government and industry clients in the areas of national security, intelligence, transportation, healthcare, environmental sustainability, and enterprise engineering. Learn more at Noblis -About Us

Why work at a Noblis company?

Our employees find greater meaning in their work and balance the other things in life that matter to them. Our people are our greatest asset. They are exceptionally skilled, knowledgeable, team-oriented, and mission-driven individuals who want to do work that matters and benefits the public.

Noblis has won numerous workplace awards. Noblis maintains a drug-free workplace and is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or other characteristics protected by law.",3.9,"Noblis
3.9","Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
62,NLP and Machine Learning Research Scientist,$94k-$162k (Glassdoor Est.),"Baidu Research USA is actively seeking talents with a Machine Learning background to join our vibrant research team in our Silicon Valley office. Our research team has broad research interests among many different areas, such as natural language processing, speech synthesis and recognition, and computer vision. The candidate will have the opportunity to work with top researchers on various exciting research projects. The ideal candidate should have solid machine learning related knowledge and experience to work together with the teammates on the research, implementation, experimentation, and the analysis of algorithms. As a research scientist at Baidu, you will benefit greatly by working in our creative environment.

Requirements:
PhD degree in computer science, statistics, machine learning, or a related field.
At least 2 years of relevant industry or research experience.
Good knowledge of common machine learning models.
Expertise in one or more of natural language processing, computer vision, speech synthesis or recognition, optimization, generative models.
Strong publication record in top conferences or journals, e.g., ACL, EMNLP, NAACL NeurIPS, ICML, ICLR and so on.
Good presentation and communication skills.
A solid foundation in computer science, with strong competencies in data structures, algorithms, and software design.
Expert knowledge developing and debugging in python, C/C++ or CUDA is a plus.
Key Responsibilities:
Conduct scientific research to design, implement and evaluate novel machine learning algorithms
Collaborate with other researchers in developing machine learning algorithms
Prepare presentation and technical paper drafts to demonstrate research findings and experimental results.
Participate in software prototyping and experimental evaluation.
Culture Fit:
Mission alignment: If you want to be part of a team to accomplish this great mission, we will provide you the best possible platform to do that.
Self­-directed: We work best with people that are driven, motivated, and aspire to greatness. Are you the sort of person that, if you had time on your hands, will independently find interesting and useful things to do?
Hungry to learn: We are eager to see you learn new skills and grow. But learning is hard work and this is something we hope you want to do.
Team orientation: We work in small, fast­-moving teams. We don't believe in lone wolves. We watch out for each other and go after big goals together as a team.",4.2,"Baidu USA
4.2","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
63,Principal ML Engineer,$125k-$206k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description:

This role is fixed term, benefit eligible employment for 12 months and requires work authorization in the United States. Remote candidates in the United States will be considered.

Backstop is looking for an experienced Machine Learning 'ML' engineer that has a passion for solving complex automation, classification, and prediction problems. The ideal candidate has previous experience working with data classification, tagging, and information extraction. This role will report to the CTO and start out as a Principal focused blazing a trail with new technologies and approaches and can grow into a leadership role.
Required Experience:

Requirements:
Expertise in Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning to perform algorithm development and data analysis
Experience with data preparation, OCR, data classification and information extraction
Experience with scalable architecture designs
Experience with CI/CD on AWS
Responsibilities:
Design software-systems, applications, and data architectures that directly implement AI techniques to support achieving better accuracy and end-user automation
Implement ML approaches to business problems for the Backstop platform utilizing techniques such as prediction, optimization, and classification
Work hands-on and provide overall guidance to a team of SW engineers to implement AI/ML software
Design, develop, document, test and debugs applications software and systems
Collaborates with members of the Product team to understand business needs and translate those into technologies and us
Keyword: Principal Machine Learning Engineer
From: Backstop Solutions Group LLC
Apply now",3.4,"Backstop Solutions Group LLC
3.4","Chicago, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
64,"Software Engineer, Search / Machine Learning",$71k-$131k (Glassdoor Est.),"Req ID: 35082

Location: Los Angeles, CA

Other location(s): Los Angeles (CA); Los Angeles West (CA); Seattle (WA)

Relocation benefits offered: No

Travel required: None

I can be myself at work.

You define yourself by more than just a job title, and we want you to feel comfortable bringing your true self to work. We value your talents, your traditions and your take on the world everything that makes you unique. Were working hard to advance diversity, equity and inclusion in our organization and our communities because we know that what makes us different makes us better.

We want you to feel a strong sense of belonging. We value and welcome your experiences, ideas and identity. Over 40 employee resource groups unite our people and help to develop our collective empathy through unfiltered conversations about race, ethnicity, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, faith, disabilities, mental health and so much more.

I can influence my income.

You want to feel recognized at work. Your performance will be reviewed annually, and your compensation will be designed to motivate and reward the value that you provide. Youll receive a competitive salary, bonuses and benefits. Your company-funded retirement contribution will be the equivalent of 15% of your annual pay (including bonuses).

I can lead a full life.

You bring unique goals and interests to your job and your life. Whether youre raising a family, youre passionate about where you volunteer, or you want to explore different career paths, well give you the resources that can set you up for success.
Enjoy generous time-away and health benefits from day one, with the opportunity for flexible work options
Receive 2-for-1 matching gifts for your charitable contributions and the opportunity to secure annual grants for the organizations you love
Access on-demand professional development resources that allow you to hone existing skills and learn new ones
COVID-19 HIRING: Our recruiting and onboarding activities are virtual during the pandemic and weve transitioned to a work-from-home environment until further notice. We are offering generous work-from-home benefits to improve our associates ability to work remotely.

Do you want to drive global impact through a company with nearly $2 trillion assets under management? Do you want to help millions of families reach their financial goals? Do you want to help build our next generation investment platform? Would you like to leverage the latest open source software running in AWS?

We are seeking a Software Development Engineer to help build the next-generation search platform for our investment professionals. This role will collaborate directly with senior investment professionals and technology associates, creating and implementing detailed quality technical designs using existing and emerging technology platforms. The ideal candidate will be passionate about our mission and will drive for superior long-term investment results. The ideal candidate will apply modern engineering and analytical methods to deliver customer-focused value.

Responsibilities:
You will independently implement new features in a highly collaborative work environment alongside product managers and fellow engineers.
You will write legible, efficient, and performant code.
You will collaborate with business partners and internal customers.
You will share technical solutions and product ideas through team planning, design review, pair programming, code review, and technical discussions.
You will take on projects and make software enhancements that improve team software and processes.
While you are an agent of change with a sense of urgency, you are respectful of what came before.
Requirements:
5+ years experience with at least one modern programming language such as Java, Python, C++ or C#. Strong OO or Functional design skills with understanding of common design patterns.
Outstanding communication skills, ability to establish and maintain a close working relationship with distributed team members and business partners.
Experience solving full stack machine learning problems, from data collection to model training to deployment. Must have experience using machine learning or NLP to solve real business problems.
Experience with search technologies, tuning search performance, and ranking and relevance. Its great if you know Elasticsearch, but were more concerned with your ability to solve search relevance problems.
Strong computer science fundamentals including data structures, algorithms, and complexity analysis.
Excellent knowledge of software engineering best practices (e.g. Agile software development, test-driven development, unit testing, code reviews, design documentation, etc)
Willingness and ability to own all stages of the development process: design, testing, implementation, operational support.
Knowledge of data stores, SQL and No-SQL preferred.
Experience with AWS services (S3, containers ECS & EKS, Lambda, Elasticsearch) preferred.
I can apply in less than 4 minutes.

Youve reviewed this job posting and youre ready to start the candidate journey with us. Apply now to move to the next step in our recruiting process. If this role isnt what youre looking for, check out our other opportunities and join our talent community.

I can learn more about Capital Group.

At Capital Group, the success of the people who invest with us depends on the people in whom we invest. Thats why we offer a culture, compensation and opportunities that empower our associates to build successful and prosperous careers. Through nine decades, our goal has been to improve peoples lives through successful investing. We know that our history is a testament to the strength of the people we hire. More than 7,800 associates in 30+ offices around the world help our clients and each other grow and thrive every day. Find us on LinkedIn, Glassdoor, FairyGodBoss, DiversityJobs and Instagram.

We are an equal opportunity employer, which means we comply with all federal, state and local laws that prohibit discrimination when making all decisions about employment. As equal opportunity employers, our policies prohibit unlawful discrimination on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, ancestry, sex (including gender and gender identity), pregnancy, childbirth and related medical conditions, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, sexual orientation, citizenship status, AIDS/HIV status, political activities or affiliations, military or veteran status, status as a victim of domestic violence, assault or stalking or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law.

#GD-Tech",4.1,"Capital Group
4.1","Los Angeles, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1931,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
65,Senior Machine Learning Engineer (NLP),-1,"Senior Machine Learning Engineer (NLP)

Remote

USD $165,000 - $185,000 + Great PTO/Benefits + Equity

This is an opportunity for an innovative machine learning engineer to use their expertise in NLP to find trends around the world and identify major correlations on what will happen next. You will work in one of Worlds' most innovative tech startups where they have captured the global capacity of supply chain relationships.. They have seen great success attracting clients and investors because of their completely unique commitment to machine learning in this domain.

THE COMPANY

This is a start-up supply chain risk company that is changing the way the marketplace reacts and interacts with fluctuations in the market due to phenomena, enterprise, and news. As a Senior Machine Learning Engineer, you'll find yourself working closely with both Data leaders and engineering teams and will enjoy the pace and innovation that runs through the company culture. For those ready for a start up environment, you'll enjoy the perks that this company can offer you - I hope you bring a good sense of humor!

THE ROLE

As a Senior Machine Learning Engineer, you will be asked to be forward thinking in your approach to applying analytical techniques to advancing the departments capacity in creating unique algorithms and leveraging your NLP expertise. You will add to their implementation for machine learning for both internal and external projects. With a rich and varied dataset to work from, you'll have the chance to apply your machine learning and algorithmic techniques to all types of data sets to detect trends before anybody else in the world.

As a Machine Learning Engineer you will be required to:

· Develop end to end AI and machine learning models

· Have strong experience in BERT, spaCy, and TensorFlow

· Fluency in Python, and ML/NLP Libraries

· Have a great attitude and want to work with a high performing team

· Work with a cross-functional team of machine learning engineers and OPs

· Productionalize models

· Help innovate the way AI is used within the company

You will need to be a proven problem solver, critical thinker, and have an advanced technical background to join this growing, yet experienced team.

THE BENEFITS

A competitive base salary of $165,000 - $185,000 + amazing benefits

YOUR QUALIFICATIONS

· PhD or Master's in Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, or Quantitative Fields

· Commercial experience developing machine learning and deep learning algorithms being put into production

· Experience working with cross-functional teams

· Extensive software engineering experience, working with models end to end

More than anything - You will need proven, commercial experience as a machine learning engineer!

HOW TO APPLY

Please register your interest by sending your CV to Elizabeth Sobel via the Apply link on this page.

KEYWORDS

Data Science, Machine Learning, Information, Technology, Team Lead, Tech Lead, Software Engineering, Software Engineer, AI, Deep Learning, Robotics, NLP",4.1,"Harnham
4.1","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
66,Principal Systems Engineer,-1,"Would you like to be part of the new space movement? Are you a rock star engineer? Do you have the leadership gene? Raytheon Intelligence and Space is the place for you. In the last few years you might have seen in your social media feed amazingly beautiful images of the Earth from space in exquisite detail. Or perhaps images in the news forecasting the weather and reporting on natural disasters. Maybe youve even gazed at images from deep space wondering when humans will journey to the farthest reaches of the universe. Behind many of these amazing images are the technologies and innovations created by the engineers at Raytheon Intelligence and Space. Situated in sunny Southern California, a location rich in aerospace history, we have unparalleled heritage in advanced sensing systems for space exploration, national security and civil space. We are actively seeking engineers to help evolve our technology and grow our business into new domains and markets. Are you up to the challenge? Were looking for you.

The RF Algorithm Engineer provides the full range of systems design and analysis-related activities in support of SAS RF programs. These activities include:
Development of mathematical algorithms for RF signal processing and calibration
Modeling and simulation of sensor physics and phenomenology to predict performance
Development of system and/or subsystem requirements
Data analysis of hardware under test or in operations
Design and development of RF waveforms
Creating technical presentations to both internal and external customers
Participating in customer and/or program technical reviews
Technical team leadership participating in technical peer reviews throughout the product lifecycle of design, development, integration and test, and requirements verification
Required Skills:
Minimum 8 years of relevant experience in systems engineering and/or algorithm development
Knowledge and experience of basic RF operations: Filtering, Pulse Compression, Calibration, and/or Antenna Array processing
Knowledge of RF signal processing techniques, experience developing advanced mathematical algorithms, analytic techniques and computer simulations
Able to effectively multi-task and prioritize actions
Proficient in Matlab, C++, Python, or related programming languages
Strong written and oral communication skills
U.S. Citizenship and ability to access to US only data systems
U.S. Citizenship status is required as this position requires an active U.S. Security Clearance as of Day 1 of Employment
Active SSBI Clearance
Desired Skills:
Experience in RF design, development, integration and test (system verification)
Experience in hardware and/or software development of embedded, real-time systems
Experience in digital pre-distortion, advanced coding and modulation, and channel equalization schemes/techniques
Experience in space-time adaptive processing
Experience in system requirements development
Experience in machine learning, artificial intelligence, deep learning, convolutional neural networks
Technical publications and/or patents
Education:
Bachelor's degree in Engineering, Physics, Math, or related STEM discipline; advanced degrees preferred

#IdeasInOrbit
170312

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.6,"Raytheon Intelligence & Space
3.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
67,Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Job Summary*
We are looking for a Machine Learning (ML) Engineer to help us create artificial intelligence products for Research and Development in the Medical Field. ML Engineer responsibilities include creating machine learning models and retraining systems. Transform Data Science prototypes to production-grade solutions. Responsible for implementing various algorithms for automated feature extraction, dataset augmentation, optimizing runtimes of neural network algorithms, and building higher level abstractions for various common AI/ML techniques.
Responsibilities: *
Study and transform data science prototypes
· Design, code and deploy machine learning systems capable of processing large volumes of data
Design and develop machine learning systems to create, train and deploy ML models
Develop machine learning applications according to requirements
Establish reusable data processing pipelines to enable rapid re-training and iteration through different ML methodologies
Select appropriate datasets and data representation methods
Design experiments and analysis methodologies that are statistically rigorous
Run machine learning tests and experiments
Perform statistical analysis and fine-tuning using test results
· Tailor and deploy software tools, processes and metrics

· Serve as a subject matter expert
Requirements: *
· Proven experience as a ML Engineer or similar role

· Experience with supervised, unsupervised, reinforcement learning algorithms

· Understanding of data structures, data modeling and software architecture

· Knowledge of ML frameworks such as Keras/Tensorflow/Theano/PyTorch and libraries (like scikit-learn)
Keep abreast of developments in the field
· Ability but to write robust code in Python, Java or equivalent modern programming language

· Proficiency in SQL, big data technologies and working with large data sets

· Works independently, able to manage multiple projects simultaneously

· Deep curiosity and a demonstrated ability to craft original solutions

· Highly communicative with collaborators and managers

· Proactive in seeking opportunities for innovation

· Ability to deal with ambiguity and deliver results in a fast-paced environment

· Dedicated and Self-Motivated

· Team collaboration and strong written and verbal communication skills

· Ownership and urgency across all responsible projects

· Proficient in Calculus, Statistics, and Linear Algebra

· Ability to work with cross-functional team to turn ideas into working solutions
Education & Experience: *
Requires Master’s Degree in Computer Science or Equivalent
2-5 years verifiable employment using requirements above. May substitute internships and projects for years of experience.
3-5 years Software Development Experience is preferred
1-2 years Networking Experience is preferred
Benefits*
· Competitive Pay

· Health, Dental & Retirement

· Continuing Education available
Salary*
· DOE

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
relevant: 1 year (Preferred)
Machine Learning: 1 year (Preferred)",-1,Ophthalmology Specialists of Texas,"Abilene, TX",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
68,AI/ML Engineer,$109k-$186k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

We seek a data scientist who specializes in artificial intelligence and machine learning. The ideal candidate is highly motivated to apply the breadth of their technical expertise to solving problems faced by MITRE’s Department of Treasury and Department of Commerce sponsors.

The ideal candidate will have the following personal attributes:
• Independent thinker with intellectual curiosity in both technical and business domains
• Interest in opportunities to lead small teams
• Ability to work autonomously while accountable to work leader
• Growth mindset – ability to listen and respond to constructive feedback

Key Responsibilities:
• Work in close collaboration with government stakeholders as part of a multidisciplinary team
• Analyze structured and unstructured data sources to determine the key business questions and hypotheses that can be explored with the data sets
• Evaluate approaches and algorithms based on available data and research objectives
• Develop experimental prototypes to demonstrate concepts for Federal government sponsors
• Communicate approach and results to decision makers in a manner that enables them to act

Basic Qualifications:
• Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science or Computer Engineering or similar field, and 5 years related experience
• Candidate must be able to demonstrate an ability to apply advanced principles, theories and concepts comparable to those obtained with a Master's degree in a relevant field of study.
• Candidate should understand the missions, domains and challenges of MITRE customers.
• In addition, the candidate understands that he/she will be fully responsible for deliverables-including definition, completion, and technical quality, as well as assuring consistency across the responsibility span.
• Applicants selected for this position will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information or applicants who are eligible for security clearances

Required Qualifications:
• B.S. degree and 5 years related experience, M.S. degree and 3 years related experience, or Ph.D. in computer science, mathematics, or a related field
• Strong theoretical background in at least two learning techniques: supervised (e.g., SVMs, regression, decision trees), unsupervised (e.g., clustering, neural networks), or reinforcement
• Demonstrated experience applying supervised and unsupervised techniques to structured data
• Experience with at least one language for implementing AI/ML algorithms (e.g., Python, R)
• Basic SQL skills
• Strong writing and communication skills and ability to communicate results of research and analysis to a non-technical audience, particularly communicating why results matter
• Ability to visualize patterns in data and research results for a non-technical audience
• Familiar with data management best practices
• Familiar with DevOps patterns and practices

Preferred Qualifications:
• Program management skills
• Experience developing and deploying data-driven applications
• Experience with Docker and Kubernetes
• Capable of evaluating Differential Privacy algorithms and implementations, and capable of researching DP to develop new algorithms
• Experience working with financial data
• Theoretical background in natural language processing techniques (e.g., parsing, topic modeling, entity recognition, sentiment analysis)
• Experience with Hortonworks Data Platform tools

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
69,Data Engineer,$59k-$105k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to get a foot in the door at an online Advertising and Media company that has seen tremendous growth? Do you want to work in the world of online video; one of the fastest growing advertising formats in the world? Then Playwire is the place for you…

Playwire Media is a full-service digital innovation partner that leverages online advertising and proprietary technologies to build publishing brands in the gaming and entertainment verticals.

To keep pace with our explosive growth, we are currently seeking a data engineer to extend our data collection, warehousing, and analysis capabilities. You’ll use your skills to facilitate objectives ranging from simple data pipelining and summarization for use in internal dashboards, to supporting our prediction initiatives by collecting and transforming data from a variety of sources and then crafting prediction algorithms to run at scale. As such, you’ll need to bring a variety of skills to bear, from pipelining to ETL to algorithmic manipulation of data.
Playwire’s services are responsible for delivering millions of ads daily to sites and apps that depend on our technology and expertise for their ad revenue. Data is central to our latest advances in this regard; if you want to participate in the early expansion of our data-related capabilities, and thrive in a fast-paced, rapid-development environment, then talk to us.
This position requires full-time employment; availability at our main office in Boca Raton, FL is preferred, but remote work is a possibility.

Essential functions:
Architect and maintain data pipelines, data lakes, and databases, both independently and as part of a data engineering team.
Work with the development team to support data-centric applications.
Design and deploy algorithms best suited for Playwire’s optimization and prediction needs.
Integrate data from external sources, gathered both via API and from email-based reports.
Identify bottlenecks and bugs, and devise solutions to these problems.
Help maintain data-related code and service quality, organization, and reliability.
Required qualifications:
Experience with Amazon AWS’s data-related services.
Knowledge of common data design patterns.
Experience with data pipelining.
Experience with ETL.
Experience using APIs to access data.
Knowledge of business intelligence tools, and the relationship between data and BI-type instrumentation.
An understanding of source control, particularly git and Github.
Comfort with big data principles and management.
Nice-to-haves:
Experience with digital ad servers, SSPs, or ad exchanges.
Experience with Amazon AWS, particularly RDS and S3.
Proficiency with one or more coding languages; Ruby, Go, and Javascript are all plusses.
Knowledge of machine learning principles and technologies.
Experience with digital advertising units, terminology and standards.
Experience working in a team using Agile development and project management practices.
A basic knowledge of CDNs and the role they fill, including edge computing capabilities.
Job Type: Full-time
Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Company's website:
https://www.playwire.com/
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.5,"Playwire Media
3.5","Boca Raton, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
70,Staff Data Scientist I,$127k-$203k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Scientist – Machine Learning & Real-Time Decision Processing (Remote, US)

Valassis is a leader in online advertising technology. We process over 12 trillion calculations daily to analyze and decide on more than 110 billion digital ad requests. As a Data Scientist at Valassis your work is central to keeping us at the forefront of the AdTech industry.

We are seeking data experts who are passionate about using cutting edge technology and data science methods to solve unique and complex problems. The ideal candidate is innately curious about how data can be used to tell a story and inform decisions. You have honed your skills through a combination of education, work experience, and hobbies. You are excited about the complexity and challenges of creating intelligent, high performance systems while working with a highly experienced and driven data science team.

If this describes you, we are interested. You can be an integral part of a cross-disciplinary team working on highly visible projects that improve performance and grow the intelligence in our product suite. Our day to day work is performed in a progressive, high-tech workspace where we focus on a friendly, collaborative and fulfilling environment.

On any given day you’ll be…
Using geo location data to track foot traffic, commercial visitation and next most likely visit to understand consumer physical behavior.
Using online behavior data to determine the primary interest categories of consumers and the web properties they visit.
Implementing a predictive model to determine whether a person is likely to visit a car dealership based on the advertising signals they’ve received.
Monitoring & improving a system that deploys and refits 10’s of thousands of models daily.
Developing algorithms to optimize the setting of every lever in a high throughput real-time decision system.
Analyzing data to better understand how a neighborhood’s consumption of web pages correlates with visits to a local big box store.
Finding the handful of outliers in billions of transactions.
Deriving a set of new features that will help better understand the interplay between geography and audience features to improve model performance.
Building new products with applied AI and bring them to market.
Participating in planning, roadmap, and architecture discussions to help evolve our AI processes to improve revenue-generating products.
Our ideal candidate will likely have…
The professional experience and desire to perform responsibilities similar to those listed above
An advanced degree in a relevant, quantitative field or equivalent experience working with Big Data and Spark in a professional setting
Ability to grow and ultimately mentor team members of varying experience levels and competencies through data science, product and software development life cycles
WHO WE ARE
Valassis is a leading digital marketing intelligence company, providing a best-in-class data management platform and online and offline targeting capabilities that fuel superior display advertising and media offerings. Through proprietary technology and the Valassis Digital Consumer Graph™, we power the lifecycle of marketing campaigns – from planning to activation and measurement. In fact, 19 of 20 leading brands work with Valassis to drive better campaign performance.

WHAT'S IN IT FOR YOU?
Valassis has a generous total rewards benefits package that includes medical, dental and vision coverage, 401k and PTO allowance. A wide variety of additional benefits like life insurance, employee assistance and pet insurance are also available; not to mention smart and friendly coworkers!

Valassis is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Applicants who have disabilities may request that accommodations be made in order to complete the selection process.

EEO is the law. To review your rights under Equal Employment Opportunity please visit: www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf.

#LI-JM1",3.4,"Valassis
3.4","Morrisville, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1970,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
71,Full-Stack Firmware Engineer - IOT Med Device,-1,"This is an opportunity to be a part of something transformational! Tespo invented a totally new way to track and take your supplements and medication. Our product offering includes multi dose Tespo-Pods and a wifi connected countertop Tespo-Connect dispenser and the fully integrated health management app, Tespo-Health.
Tespo is in need for an Embedded Firmware Engineer to design and develop the PCBA hardware boards and firmware that drives our award winning IoT Tespo Countertop Dispenser System.
About the Job*
You're responsible for working with our fast-moving Engineering team developing and maintaining new products and features, staying up-to-date on the latest best practices and working them into our Engineering strategy.

Start-up environment means there is considerable responsibility and ownership of this function along with a significant opportunity to do amazing things! This position requires \*\*a self-motivated person with great communication skills\*\* who is a multi-talented and resourceful team-player that has experience building scalable, well-documented, maintainable and secure products.

\*\*What will make you stand out?\*\*
Experience in embedded systems and IOT devices
Program Audio triggers, stepper motors, actuators, solenoids
Strong C and C++ language skills with an understanding of build systems like CMake and GCC
Debugging skills using GDB
Well versed in microcontrollers (preferably STM, EspressIF and Nordic) and their peripherals
\*\*Responsibilities\*\*

There is a high degree of autonomy in day-to-day responsibilities, but some of the things we expect:
Write the embedded firmware to control IOT Tespo countertop dispenser
Support the overseas manufacturing team with necessary software and PCBA for Testing station improves for quality fixtures
Troubleshoot difficult electrical and timing problems to ensure the highest quality of product customer experience
Use of GitHub effectively and organization to manage various dispenser firmwares in testing and production
Document your code and design changes
Design, source components, support development of PCBA hardware to be prototyped (internal pick and place machine) and mass produced
\*\*Technical Requirements\*\*
Expertise in common languages including C, C++, Python, etc...
Demonstrable embedded engineering experience
GitHub and Project Management knowledge and experience, include Asana, Clubhouse and others
Ability to work well with a motivated team to accomplish the task and teach us a thing or two
Ability to refactor existing code
Experience using ARM architecture, peripherals and communication protocols such as UART, SPI, I2C, etc...
Experience designing circuits and bringing them to life with manufacturers
Knowledge of PCBA manufacturing and testing jigs
Eagle/Fusion360 Experience
\*\*Bonus Qualifications\*\*
Experience designing PCBAs in Eagle or Fusion 360
Experience using a Pick-n-Place and Thermal Reflow Oven (We have one to play with)
Experience maintaining/configuring AWS services with IoT hardware devices
Startup experience!!!
Knowledge of wireless communication protocols (Cellular, WiFi, BLE) is a plus
Ability to read, write and interpret schematics and other hardware documentation
Working knowledge of oscilloscopes, logic analyzers, and related test/measurement equipment
Hands-on bring-up, debugging, and optimization of production systems
Experience with manufacturing, on-site experience in Asia a plus
Tespo is an Equal Opportunity Employer
Plymouth, Michigan*
This is an opportunity to be a part of something transformational! Tespo* *invented a totally new way to track and take your supplements and **medication**. Our product offering includes multi dose Tespo-Pods and a wifi connected countertop Tespo-Connect dispenser and the fully integrated health management app, Tespo-Health. Please check out our website before applying - gettespo.com *
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $85,000.00 - $130,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
COVID-19 considerations:
No interaction with the general public at our office, we are following social distance guidelines, wearing face masks and frequently hand sanitizing and wiping down surfaces.

Experience:
PCBA Embedded Engineering, software/firmware development: 4 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Plymouth, MI 48170 (Required)
Application Question:
Please list programming languages you are proficient in then list programming languages you have experience in but have much to learn.
Work Location:
One location
Visa Sponsorship Potentially Available:
No: Not providing sponsorship for this job
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
High stress tolerance -- thrives in a high-pressure environment
Company's website:
www.gettespo.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",3.6,"Tespo
3.6","Plymouth, MI",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
72,Aviation Data Scientist and Machine Learning Engineer,$106k-$182k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

MITRE has an immediate opening for an Aviation Data Scientist with a specialization in machine learning to be part of a dynamic team of professionals working to improve the efficiency of traffic flow management operations in the United States National Airspace System (NAS). We are looking to expand our team with someone with demonstrated technical excellence involving analysis of aviation data and the application of machine learning techniques to solving complex problems. Key Functions: The successful candidate will be part of a team conducting analyses of multiple, integrated sets of aviation, weather, and other related data to identify ways to improve predictive models, identify trends impacting operations, and apply machine learning techniques to solve complex problems. Qualifications: Preferred Qualifications: - Experience using tools such as Java, R, and Python to prepare and analyze time series data. - Coding, data modeling, simulation, and data visualization experience (e.g., Tableau). - Excellent statistical and mathematical skills. - Excellent written and verbal communications skills. - Experience with machine learning techniques and algorithm development. - Familiarity with machine learning frameworks (like TensorFlow, Keras, or PyTorch) and libraries (like scikit-learn). - Knowledge of Hadoop (e.g., Pig, Spark) or another distributed computing system. - Past experience working in the aviation domain and with aviation data. Skill is desired, but not required. Minimum Qualifications: BS in Data Science, Machine Learning, or related field of study.

MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
73,Machine Learning Engineer,$118k-$201k (Glassdoor Est.),"With the continued impact of COVID-19 and social distancing measures, Kensho is conducting all interviews and on-boarding activities remotely. At the present time, all employees are working remotely, until further notice. When the time comes to open our offices, Kensho will fully support those employees who would like to continue working remotely and not ask anyone to return to the office until they are comfortable.

At Kensho, we hire talented people and give them the freedom, support, and resources needed to build cutting edge technology and products for our parent company, S&P Global. As a result, we produce technology that is scalable, robust, and solves the challenges of one of the world’s largest, most successful financial institutions.

As a Machine Learning Engineer, you will be responsible for tackling a wide range of problems from natural language processing to timeseries prediction. You will move beyond the theoretical confines of academia and apply your tradecraft to build machine learning systems on real world data. In this role, you will constantly collaborate and work with groups of engineers. Our Machine Learning team is responsible for delivering ML-based solutions from problem framing, to prototyping, and production application.
Are you looking to make impactful, scalable contributions that transform the way we think about data? If so, we would love to help you excel here at Kensho. We take pride in our tightly-knit, team-based community that provides our Kenshins with a collaborative, supportive environment to bring transparency to the biggest challenges in data.
What You’ll Do
You will conduct original research on large proprietary and open source data sets
Identify, research, prototype, and build predictive products
You will build cutting-edge models for understanding vast amounts of textual data
Write production code
You will write tests to ensure the robustness and reliability of your productionized models
You will work closely with software engineers to build incredible systems
Technologies You’ll Use
Python and specifically NumPy, SciPy, Pandas, SciKit-learn
Neural network packages like TensorFlow/Keras and pytorch
ML packages like LightGBM and XGBoost
OpenFST
Elasticsearch
Required Skills, Knowledge & Experience
You have 3+ years of experience being a major machine learning contributor at a top company, hedge fund, or university
You have at least one core programming expertise, such as Python (NumPy, SciPy, Pandas), MATLAB, or R
You have experience with advanced machine learning methods
You possess strong statistical knowledge, intuition, and experience modeling real data
You demonstrate effective coding, documentation, and communication habits
You have a strong research acumen and experiment design skills
You have the ability and credibility to lead a team
You have a stellar ability to communicate even the most complicated methods and results to a broad, often non-technical audience
Several of the following terms should hold deep meaning for you: LSTM, lookahead bias, bagging, boosting, stacking, information retrieval, batch norm, entity recognition, bootstrapping, Glorot initialization, Kullback-Leibler divergence, GLOVE, SMAPE, HMM, MAP, exponential family, VC dimension, EM, L1, TD(Lambda)
How to Really Get Our Attention
Your GitHub/Kaggle profile shows a project or problems you’ve tackled
You have relevant research or publications
You are a specialist in deep learning in an academic setting or production-grade machine learning


At Kensho, we pride ourselves on providing top-of-market benefits, including:
- Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance
- 100% company paid premiums
- Unlimited Paid Time Off
- 20 weeks of 100% paid Parental Leave (paternity and maternity)
- 401(k) plan with 6% employer matching
- Generous company matching on donations to non-profit charities
- Up to $20,000 tuition assistance toward degree programs, plus up to $4,000/year for ongoing professional education such as industry conferences
- Plentiful snacks, drinks, and regularly catered lunches
- Dog-friendly office (CAM office)
- In-office gyms and showers (CAM, DC) or Equinox membership (LA, NYC)
- Stipend towards commuter or gym reimbursement
- Bike sharing program memberships
- Compassion leave and elder care leave
- Mentoring and additional learning opportunities
- Opportunity to expand professional network and participate in conferences and events
About Kensho
Kensho uses machine learning, artificial intelligence, natural language processing and data visualization techniques to solve some of the hardest analytical problems and create breakthrough financial intelligence solutions for our parent company, S&P Global.
Kensho was founded in 2013 by Harvard & MIT alums and was acquired by S&P Global in 2018. Kensho continues to operate as a startup in order to maintain our distinct, independent brand and to promote our breakthrough, innovative culture. Our team of Kenshins enjoy a dynamic and collaborative work environment that runs autonomously from S&P, while leveraging the unparalleled breadth and depth of data and resources available as part of S&P Global. As Kenshins, we pride ourselves on maintaining an innovative culture that depends on diversity and inclusion.
We are an equal opportunity employer that welcomes future Kenshins with all experiences and perspectives. Kensho is headquartered in Cambridge, MA, with offices in New York City, Washington D.C. and Los Angeles. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",4.1,"Kensho
4.1","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
74,Data Scientist,-1,"About us

Boxy Charm was founded in 2013 and continues to be a leader in the beauty subscription box industry experiencing immense growth of more than 100% year over year. We work with some of the hottest brands including Butter London, Dr. Brandt, Elemis, GlamGlow, Smashbox, Tarte, Too Faced and many more.

Today, Boxy Charm has a community of more than 2.4 million followers across its social media platforms, 10 million monthly visitors online and is the #1 searched beauty box brand on YouTube. In 2018, Inc magazine named it as one of the fastest growing companies in the nation. Boxy Charm is headquartered in South Florida and has an office in Toronto, Canada.

About you

Boxy Charm is seeking a Data Scientist who will use a range of data science and machine learning methodologies to build solutions for a variety of business initiatives. Additionally, the ideal candidate will be able to solve complex problems and apply those solutions within a cutting-edge cloud-based technology platform.

The role will be filled with a solution-oriented candidate that thrives on working in a highly dynamic and engaging environment.

What you will be doing
Work closely with different business units and translate high level business problems into actionable deliverables for the Data & Algorithms team
Work with a wide variety of data ranging between social media and email to customer transactions and logistics
Develop a variety of machine learning models including customer recommendations, customer propensity, forecasting, and marketing performance.
Collaborate closely with the Software Development and DevOps teams to ensure continued delivery of high-quality data through our data processing pipeline
Partner with various business stakeholders and implement solutions that improve their business process
Conduct big data analysis using SQL, Python, Snowflake, Spark and other technologies
Break down complex projects and problems into actionable tasks that be delivered quickly and iteratively and provide value to the business stakeholders
Key Understandings
Customer lifetime value, regression analysis, cohorts, retention, customer lifecycle, customer segmentation, machine learning, large-scale data analysis, classification and propensity modeling
What you will bring to the table
Bachelor's degree or higher in Computer Science, Math, Statistics or a related field
3+ years of experience programming in languages such as Python, Java, Scala, Ruby, R
3+ years of experience working with SQL and relational databases
3+ years of experience with machine learning, statistical modeling, and data mining techniques
Experience with one or more machine learning algorithms such as neural networks, regression, clustering etc.
Working experience with machine learning technologies such as TensorFlow, Keras, ScikitLearn, H20.ai, MXNet, Caffe, Gluon etc. is highly desirable
Experience working in an Agile (SCRUM, XP etc.) development environment
Experience with AWS or other cloud environments is desirable
Knowledge of Big Data and NoSQL systems such as Snowflake, Hadoop, Spark, MongoDB, etc. is a plus",3.1,"Boxy Charm
3.1",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Beauty & Personal Accessories Stores,Retail,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
75,DevOps Engineer III,$79k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

MiTek® is a global provider of building solutions for the residential and commercial construction industries. Utilizing software, services, engineered products, and automated manufacturing equipment, MiTek partners with clients to accelerate their genius and deliver breakthroughs in building. With a rich 60-year history and a network of 6,500 team members worldwide, MiTek pairs local expertise with global capabilities. As a Berkshire Hathaway (NYSE: BRK-A, NYSE: BRK-B) company since 2001, MiTek has a record of continuous growth and innovation. Learn more at www.mii.com .

Summary
Leads in “clearing the way” by designing and developing means to improve processes, automate, deploy, document, monitor and collect feedback from other teams. The DevOps team primarily serves the needs of the Software Development process, but will also assist other teams in the organization to find the best solution for a problem. Responsible for coding and debugging engineering or business management applications and the requisite infrastructure by performing the following duties.

Job Responsibilities & Requirements

ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:

Assist in coding, testing, and deploying of automation for processes and services. This typically involves Microsoft technologies such as Powershell.
Create documentation of processes and solutions.
Collaborate with other teams to ensure that automated solutions are efficient, consistent and fulfill business needs.
Advise other teams on expert Cloud infrastructure such as Kubernetes, Machine learning, databricks, NoSQL, etc.
Advise and assist other teams with deploying infrastructure as code using Terraform.
Advise and assist other teams with creating and maintaining YAML CI/CD pipelines in Azure DevOps and the tools needed to be successful with automated deployments.
Deliver infrastructure services like automated monitoring and logging to our internal users.
Provide technical guidance to other DevOps engineers, may include developing alternative system and software designs.
Demonstrate ability to learn new technologies with minimal support and guidance.

SKILLS & ABILITIES:

Education: Bachelor's degree from four-year college or university preferably in Network Administration, Computer Science or Engineering; four plus years related experience and/or training with two plus years of experience designing and supporting Azure environments; or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Supervisory Responsibilities: This job typically mentors less experienced DevOps engineers.

Qualifications

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Language Skills

Ability to read, analyze, and interpret general business periodicals, professional journals, technical procedures, or governmental regulations. Ability to write reports, business correspondence, and procedure manuals. Ability to effectively present information and respond to questions from groups of managers, clients, customers, and the general public.

Mathematical Skills

Ability to apply advanced mathematical concepts such as exponents, trigonometry, quadratic equations, and permutations. Ability to apply mathematical operations to such tasks as frequency distribution, determination of test reliability and validity, analysis of variance, correlation techniques, sampling theory, and factor analysis.

Reasoning Ability

Ability to define problems, collect data, establish facts, and draw valid conclusions. Ability to interpret an extensive variety of technical instructions in mathematical or diagram form and deal with several abstract and concrete variables.

Computer Skills

Working knowledge of managing and securing the following technologies is preferred: Cloud Solutions, Enterprise Windows servers, and networking. TCP/IP networking concepts (routing, switching, firewalling), Wireless Security, Storage, database, and virtualization security, Anti-virus, backups, disk encryption, and Data Loss Prevention, Network and endpoint security prevention and detection, Vulnerability scanning and verification, Log collection and correlation. Working knowledge in the following areas is preferred: System policy and compliance verification techniques, Auditing principles, Risk management concepts and techniques, assisting with incident response activities, Evaluating new and emerging technologies, Ability to script or program in one or more language (e.g. Powershell, JSON, YAML, Perl, Python, .Net). Hands on experience with one or more configuration management systems such as Terraform, SCCM, Ansible, Chef or Puppet. Hands on experience with CI/CD tools – Azure DevOps or Jenkins. Extensive knowledge of Microsoft enterprise software products and services. Hands on experience with Docker and Kubernetes, Machine Learning and NoSQL.

MiTek is an E-Verify and Drug and Tobacco-Free Workplace.

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.

For accommodation to assist with completing this application, please contact Human Resources at +1 314-434-1200.

www.mii.com",3.6,"MiTek Inc.
3.6","Chesterfield, MO",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1955,Company - Private,Miscellaneous Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
76,"Telecommunications Engineer, Chelmsford or Marlboro",$46k-$81k (Glassdoor Est.),"Essential Functions:

Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Designs, configures, maintains, monitors and secures the 24/7 enterprise telecommunications infrastructure (primarily Avaya) and any enhancements.
Provides technology expertise and associated technical support, evaluating and resolving complex technical issues related to the voice network.
Ensures performance, capacity, availability, and quality of the voice environment monitoring for emerging incidents and initiate preventative action.
Provides technical leadership on organizational projects by outlining needs, identifying solutions, develop timeline for deliverables, and resources required
Manages all tasks appropriately to adhere to requirements, timelines and network and security standards
Evaluates existing infrastructure and develops roadmap based on the goals of the business areas, vendor support, and risk assessments
Creates and maintains all necessary technical documentation.
Adherence to policies, procedures and documentation standards.
Perform other job-related duties as assigned by Manager(s).

Other Duties:

Please note this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

Job Competencies:

Takes action without being asked or required to; achieves goals beyond job requirements; being proactive; taking prompt action to accomplish objectives.
Clearly conveys and receives information and ideas through a variety of media to individuals or groups in a manner that engages the listener, helps them understand and retain the message, and invites response and feedback. Keeps others informed as appropriate. Demonstrates good written, oral, and listening skills.
Consistently maintains high levels of activity or productivity; sustains long hours when necessary, works with vigor, effectivenss and determination over a sustained period
Breaks down problems into component and recognizes the interrelationships; makes sound, well-informed, and objective decisions. Compares data, information, and input from a variety of sources to draw conclusions; takes action that is consistent with available facts, constraints, and probable consequences.
Organizes work, sets priorities, and determines reources requirements; determines necessary sequence of activities needed to achieve goals.
Builds constructive working relationships with clients/customers, other work units, community organizations and others to meet mutual goals and objectives. Behaves professionally and supportively when working with individuals from a variety of ethnic, social and educational backgrounds.
Is committed to developing professionally, attends professional conferences, focuses on best practices, values cutting-edge practices and approaches; takes advantage of a variety of learning activities, introduces newly gained knowledge and skills on the job.

Education and Experience Requirements:

Related 4-year degree
Minimum of 5 years VoIP experience
Minimum of 2 years QoS and SIP experience
Minimum 1 year Networking and/or Systems experience
Minimum of 1 years Cloud VoIP experience
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.

Work Environment:

This job operates in a professional office environment. This role routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, photocopier/scanner, filing cabinets, and fax machines.

Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. While performing the duties of this job, the associate is required to have ordinary ambulatory skills sufficient to visit other locations; and the ability to stand, walk, stoop, kneel, crouch, and manipulate (lift, carry, move) light to medium weights of 10-50 pounds. Requires good hand-eye coordination, arm, hand and finger dexterity, including ability to grasp, and visual acuity to use a keyboard, operate equipment and read application information. The associate frequently is required to sit, reach with hands and arms, talk and hear.

Travel:
Minimal, as required by the business or professional development.

Service Excellence: The DCU Way:
All employees are expected to provide service excellence the “DCU Way” through teamwork and by providing quality service to internal and external members, incorporating the Guiding Principles of DCU’s culture:

People come first
Do the right thing
Make a difference

Bank Secrecy Act (BSA):

All Credit Union employees are required to complete all BSA related training annually and maintain knowledge of current BSA policies, specifically those related to functions performed within the department and identify and report possible suspicious activity.

We are proud to be an EEO/AA employer M/F/D/V

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",3.9,"Digital Federal Credit Union
3.9","Chelmsford, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1979,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
77,Senior Network Security Engineer,-1,"Fluxergy is on the cutting edge of laboratory testing. We're developing a true multi-mode point of care device, the kinds of which has never been conceived, and we'd love to have you as part of the team. We empower people and foster an environment of open discussion. We believe it's key to keep a mostly flat organization, where people can collaborate easily and freely. In addition, Fluxergy encourages cross-pollination so you’ll learn about all aspects of the business. If you're interested in revolutionizing the world of diagnostics and improving the lives of millions of people, we'd love to hear from you.

We are looking to hire a Senior Network Security Engineer with an analytical mind and a detailed understanding of cyber security methodologies. This Security Engineer is expected to have meticulous attention to detail, outstanding problem-solving skills, can work comfortably under pressure and deliver on tight deadlines.
Responsibilities *
Work directly with the Internal Systems and Integration team and consultants to secure and maintain the organization's technology and IT systems.
Troubleshoot security and network problems as they arise.
Plan, implement, manage, monitor, and upgrade security measures and controls for the protection of the organization’s data, systems, and networks.
Establish disaster recovery procedures and conduct security breach drills.
Perform vulnerability and penetration tests, identifying and defending against threats.
Respond to and provide post-mortem analyses for all system and/or network security breaches.
Research and design public key infrastructures, certification authorities, and digital signatures, and ensure all personnel have IT access limited to their need and role in the organization.
Responsible for daily administrative tasks, reporting and communication with the relevant departments in the organization.
Maintain company-wide best practices for IT security.
Review and provide feedback on security policies to maintain compliance with all regulatory requirements.
Communicate with third parties regarding Fluxergy’s security posture.
Responsible for creating security related risk management reports on a daily, weekly, monthly, and annual basis.
Travel to conferences and utilize educational resources to stay up to date on cutting edge cyber security related threats and capabilities.
Perform other responsibilities as required.
Requirements*
Background in network infrastructure technologies, preferably at an organization that has predominantly used a Microsoft stack.
Experience with migration from on-prem into cloud and hybrid-cloud environments.
Experience configuring and deploying RBAC security frameworks.
Experience configuring and managing security policies for Windows, Mac and Linux PC/VM environments.
Experience with firewalls (functionality and maintenance), Office 365, and endpoint security.
Ability to work under pressure in a fast-paced environment.
Current awareness of cybersecurity trends and hacking techniques.
Understanding of patch management in a Microsoft/Linux Environment with the ability to deploy patches in a timely manner while understanding business impact.
Expert level working knowledge of shells such as PowerShell and Bash.
Familiarity with the OWASP Security Framework and its applicability to the Microsoft technology stack.
Experience with implementing multi factor authentication.
Knowledge of cloud computing solutions including Azure and Azure Hybrid Cloud.
Working knowledge of virtual machine spool-up, securing, and maintenance.
Willingness to come in, roll up sleeves and get busy. Must be self- motivated and eager to dive in and make a difference.
Experience*
5+ years - Incident detection, incident response and forensics
Education*
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, IT, Systems Engineering or a related discipline
Job Type*
Full Time
Exempt
Note: *No agencies. All candidates/resumes submitted by an agency or 3rd party will be considered a referral.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $1.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Face masks are required. We provide sanitation stations at each main point of entry which includes disposable face masks, disposable gloves, tissues, and hand sanitizer.

Experience:
Shells; Powershell or Bash: 3 years (Required)
Network Security: 5 years (Required)
security policies for Windows, Mac and Linux PC/VM environme: 3 years (Preferred)
Cloud migration: 3 years (Required)
RBAC security frameworks: 3 years (Required)
Company's website:
https://fluxergy.com/
Work Remotely:
No",5.0,"Fluxergy
5.0","Irvine, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
78,CNC Machine Operator Virtual Hiring Event,-1,"Master Millwork Virtual Hiring Event!

Event Details
Date: Friday, October 23, 2020

What We're Hiring For

Assistant Project Manager (Construction)

CNC Machine Operator

Lead Wood Finisher

Millwork Drafter/Engineer

Millwork Estimator

Wood Finisher

Wood Worker/Cabinet Maker

Production Manager- Architectural Millwork/ Cabinet Making

Intake Details:

Requirements

Please refer to the job description.

What to bring to this event

Resume

What to wear

Dress code is Casual (come as you are, but please be presentable).

About Master Millwork

Master Millwork is a commercial Architectural Millwork and Finish Carpentry firm headquartered in Massachusetts, offering construction services throughout New England and the Mid- Atlantic states. Master Millwork provides turn-key interior finish carpentry services specializing in Senior Living, Multi-Unit Apartments & Hotels. We also provide architectural millwork packages for Restaurants, Nightclubs, Libraries, and Schools.

We value all the relationships that are developed throughout the construction process and make a great effort to provide a synergistic approach to completing projects. We understand the pressures of deadlines and finishing jobs and are often able to assist in creating harmony and a good working relationship with the other subcontractors as we all work toward the same deadlines.

Our management team, our foremen, and our craftsmen all work together with the same motivation and pride, to provide the highest quality of work, service, and communication throughout the duration of our projects.

We pride ourselves in our ability to work together, solve issues, and bring ideas to the table that make sense and move projects forward.

What is a Virtual Hiring Event?
Virtual hiring events are a great way for employers and jobseekers to connect, even if they aren't in the same physical location. Hiring is a human process, and they would like to talk with you online (either through chat, on the phone, or video) to see if you’re a fit!

This position is a full time operating a nested base CNC machine cutting cabinet and casework parts. CNC experience is a plus. We are willing to train someone who has some machining and cabinet building experience. 3 years of machining experience, with a minimum of 1 year CNC operation.

Must have reliable transportation.
Must work well with others.
Able to learn and follow clear instructions.
Able to work safely and comply with safety regulations.
Ability to lift, push, or pull 50 lbs.
Excellent attendance and prior work history
Must be able to work 40+ hours a week

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $13.00 - $18.00 per hour

Experience:

Machining: 3 years (Preferred)
CNC Operator: 1 year (Preferred)",3.6,"Master Millwork
3.6","Wareham, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
79,Data Scientist,-1,"Sartorius Stedim Data Analytics, a market leader in advanced analytics and provider of Umetrics Suite of Data Analytics Solutions, is on a strong growth path driving new innovative solutions in the field. It currently has an outstanding opportunity for a Data Scientist to drive customer applications, support the Sartorius sales teams and feedback customer needs into the development of new solutions. The incumbent for this key role will have a strong customer focus to help secure innovation and growth from both new and existing customers.

What you can look forward to
Assisting customers in solving business related problems using advanced data analysis and data driven technologies
Supporting implementation of advanced analytics in industry
Analyzing large amounts of data and building data driven models
Initiating, leading and driving customer projects
Training customers on the use of our software
Supporting sales (pre/post)
Supporting marketing & development
Performing regular follow up with customers to track satisfaction, secure project momentum and discover additional opportunities
Creating technical documents
Attending and presenting at conferences, seminars and forums
Developing & cultivating strong relationships with external and internal stakeholders
Being part of a team of data scientists
Skills and experience
Minimum of a bachelor's degree (master’s degree preferred) in a relevant field (engineering, life sciences, informatics, automation/control, etc.)
Minimum two years’ work experience within Biopharma or Pharma
Minimum two years’ working knowledge of applied statistics including MVDA, DOE, MSPC, PAT, QbD, Model Predictive Control (MPC), MMPC, AI/Machine learning
Strong bioprocess knowledge preferred
Familiarity with Umetrics Suite of Data Analytics Solutions preferred (MODDE, SIMCA, SIMCA-online, Control Advisor, Active Dashboard)
Working knowledge of prescriptive analytics a plus
Working knowledge of Python scripting preferred
Working knowledge of MATLAB, data historians and control strategies a plus
Teaching, consulting and project management experience a plus
Excellent communications skills, strong presentation skills
Comfortable working independently
Comfortable working from home office, willingness to travel (~25%)
Strong identification with Sartorius core values: sustainability, openness, enjoyment
Driving our future growth requires talented people. Sartorius is a dynamic organization suited to people who want to showcase skills, be recognized for expertise and thrive in a vibrant and innovative environment.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex or national origin. We are also an equal opportunity employer of individuals with disabilities and protected veterans.

Please view equal employment opportunity posters provided by OFCCP here

E-Verify Participation Info

E-Verify Workers Rights

Interested? Driving our future growth requires talented people. Sartorius is a dynamic organisation suited to people who want to showcase skills, be recognised for expertise and thrive in a vibrant and innovative environment.

To find out more about Sartorius as an employer visit us on Sartorius Careers

Become part of our global team.",3.7,"Sartorius
3.7",United States,-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1870,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
80,"SR. RESEARCH ENGINEER - SPACE AVIONICS - AUSTIN, TEXAS",$75k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:


Join our Austin Space Science and Engineering team! Provide support to engineering design teams in selecting, evaluating and documenting compliance to specification of electrical, electronic, electromechanical and electro-optical parts. Make recommendations regarding appropriate components, researching and suggesting alternatives, and documenting decisions, with minimal direction. You will be responsible for procurement management of all EEE parts. Collaborate with electrical design engineers to help them select appropriate parts given project requirements, schedule and cost limitations. Conduct presentations to customers and clearly communicate with design team member. Must develop an understanding of component lead times, design fluidity, and how that impacts project deliverables in order to manage procurements related to EEE parts. Applications will include military and space products.


Education/Experience:


Requires a BS degree in Electrical Engineering or closely related engineering degree with 5-8 years of engineering experience; 3 of which must be as a Parts Engineer. Working knowledge of NASA EEE-INST-002 preferred. Working knowledge of EEE parts TORs a benefit. EEE parts Procurement management experience is required. Must have at least a 3.0 GPA. Strong communication skills are required. Knowledge of electronic components and basic electronics design is preferred. Must be able to collaborate in a team environment and have initiative to handle projects autonomously. Background in statistical process control a plus. Background in electronics component manufacturering a plus. Must be willing to travel. A valid/clear driver's license is required.


Special Requirements:


Work assignment is in Austin, Texas. Must be a U.S. citizen or Permanent Resident due to ITAR work in section.

Job Locations: Austin, Texas | Boulder, Colorado


For more information about this division, visit the Space Science & Engineering home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.1,"Southwest Research Institute
4.1","Boulder, CO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
81,Product Development Engineer,-1,"Product Development Engineer *
“Applying advanced Technology and practical Experience to make the industry better”.

At Logika Systems we do this by tackling the most difficult applications in the most extreme environments. We develop leading edge sensors and couple them with image processing and machine learning to provide complete systems. Our approach is solution based designed to improve safety, quality, and profitability of our customers.

We are a startup company with a team which has several decades of experience in providing leading edge products and solutions. Our goal is to design and manufacture technical products that solve difficult problems and reach our objectives in Safety, Quality and Profitability

The Successful Candidate we are looking for has to have entrepreneurship spirit, be self-motivated, and want to make things happen. We are looking for people to join our team who have passion to solve problems and face challenges with hard work and applying their skills for success.
Product Development Engineer * *Duties*
• Define specifications for new products and projects in conjunction with Marketing and technical specialists.

• Develop project timelines and budgets.

• Provide a project charter along with keystones and test points

• Identify resources required for project(s)

• If not in house find appropriate resources

• Prepare individual project descriptions and specifications for each project contributor.

• Hold regular update meetings with team members.

• Provide regular project updates to Business development and upper management

• Ensure that work project is properly documented and is documented on a timely manner.

• Make sure that our IP and confidential information is properly protected.
Qualified Candidates will have *
• Bachelor’s degree in Electrical/Electronics Engineering

• Minimum 5 years’ experience in a lead position in product design and development

• Advanced electronics and electro-mechanical knowledge

• Superior leadership and mentoring skills

• Must possess strong communication and presentation skills

• Must have a meticulous attention to detail and a continuous improvement focus

• Assertive approach to solve problems

• Ability to prioritize and make decisions

• Results oriented, self-motivated, and organized work ethic

• Proficiency in Microsoft Office Suite (PowerPoint, Excel, Word and Project)

• 2 years’ experience working on projects for Heavy Industry (Iron and Steel a Plus)

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $65,000.00 - $100,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Health insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Schedule:
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Commission pay
Experience:
Electrical/Electronics: 7 years (Preferred)
Product Development: 3 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Logika Systems inc.,"Saint Louis, MO",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
82,Machine Learning Engineer,$108k-$186k (Glassdoor Est.),"CircleUp harnesses the power of machine learning and predictive analytics to discover some of the fastest-growing companies in the consumer & retail sector. We are building a predictive data system called ""Helio"" to bring the data-driven revolution that has occurred in the public markets to the private markets, starting with consumer & retail.

We are working on challenging problems in information retrieval, entity resolution, and developing an in-depth knowledge graph of all private companies. We are mining vast amounts of data to successfully rewrite the rules on how private companies are evaluated.

With a background in both software development and machine learning, you will collaborate with software engineers, data scientists, PMs, and domain experts in consumer investing to develop & ship predictive data products in support of CircleUp's mission - helping entrepreneurs thrive by connecting them with the capital & resources they need.

You are a passionate software engineer who is comfortable working across the full stack & lifecycle of predictive data products - prototyping, feature engineering, validation, and productionalization.

CircleUp was recently honored as one of Fast Company's Top 10 Most Innovative Companies in Data Science and has been named a CB Insights FinTech 250, a Top 5 Most Disruptive Company in Finance by CNBC, and to the Forbes FinTech 50. Founded in 2012, CircleUp is headquartered in San Francisco and backed by Union Square Ventures, GV, Canaan Partners, QED Advisors, and others.

Responsibilities:
Collect and refine structured and unstructured data on private companies
Build out our entity resolution platform that can identify references to companies, brands and products in highly unstructured digital documents and link them back to real world entities
Build scalable production systems for data collection, data transformation, feature extraction, model training, and scoring, using distributed software tools
Build end to end algorithms for objectively measuring the quality of private consumer companies
Contribute to all phases of algorithm development including ideation, prototyping, design and production
We're looking for teammates who have:
Bachelor's degree or higher in Computer Science, Information retrieval, Natural Language processing, Math, Statistics or related technical field
2+ years of experience in machine learning, NLP and/or information retrieval
Broad knowledge of machine learning APIs, tools, and open source libraries
Excellent coding skills and strong fundamentals in algorithms, data structures, predictive modeling and big data concepts
Experience putting models into production systems is a huge plus
An interest in disrupting and democratizing the entire industry within the private markets.
If you got to this point, we hope you’re feeling excited about the job description you just read! Even if you feel that you don't meet all of the requirements and qualifications, we still encourage you to apply. We’re eager to speak with those who share our passion to help entrepreneurs thrive - not just those who match every bullet point in our job descriptions.

CircleUp is an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate based upon race, religious creed, color, national origin, ancestry, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, marital status (including registered domestic partnership status), sex and gender (including pregnancy, childbirth, lactation and related medical conditions), gender identity and gender expression (including transgender individuals who are transitioning, have transitioned, or are perceived to be transitioning to the gender with which they identify), age, sexual orientation, Civil Air Patrol status, military and veteran status and any other consideration protected by federal, state or local law. We encourage those who really want to make an impact to apply for our open positions.",4.5,"CircleUp
4.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Venture Capital & Private Equity,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
83,Software Engineer - Data Science,$60k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join ClearEdge and be a part of the team of men and women that solve some of the DoD’s most complex technical challenges. Every day, ClearEdge empowers customers in Government and industry with innovative data driven solutions.
Check out our extremely competitive benefits package at clearedgeit.com/benefits which includes a 10k annual training/education benefit, tech bonuses, and state of the art technology lab. We also offer monthly TechConnect and DeepDive collaboration sessions with our entire technical staff, fully paid.

Your mission: Work with a dynamic team and key stakeholders to generate and execute challenging solutions to mission problems.
We are seeking Software Engineers of all levels with Data Science experience. The position requires a self-starter with excellent problem-solving skills. The right person will work closely with the customer to gather requirements for assisting in solving real world problems using data science techniques. The candidate should be experienced with exploratory data analysis, machine learning, network graph modeling, information insight, data mining, data driven analytics and statistical methods.
You will excel in this role if you are:
Results-oriented developer who can leverage your technical skills and techniques to successfully design, develop and deploy software solutions
Self-motivated and have a desire to build new skills
Are familiar with Agile frameworks and methodologies with a desire to be a certified SCRUM Master
Enjoy learning new technologies, are a forward thinker, and are interested in growing your career with a cutting-edge technology company
A day in the life consists of:
Working directly with clients, managers and technical staff to understand business needs, develop technical plans, and deliver data-driven analytical solutions that solve client problems
Creating and deploying predictive models from a wide variety of data sources and types using the latest mathematical and statistical methods
Performing enterprise level software development, integration, and implementation using advanced data science or big data technologies
Establishing and implementing end-to-end proof of concepts
Performing data mining, statistical analysis, predictive modeling and simulation, and forecasting for the development of solutions
Working across multi-functional teams to formulate, prototype, implement, and fine tune solutions
Educating product development and operations teams using documentation, presentations, and demonstrations
Establishing strong, collaborative working relationships with Government customers, technical staff, and peers
What we are expecting from you:
Experience in the design and development of data science software applications
Bachelor’s or Advanced degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or other technical discipline
Experience with Exploratory Data Analysis including wrangling, grooming, transformation, and analysis
Experience applying statistical methods to solve data problems
Software development programming experience in languages such as Python, R, Java, Scala
Experience using IDE tools such as Jupyter to develop and demonstrate results
Experience with integrating and using Data Science libraries such as scikit-learn, MlLib, Pandas, python (Jupyter, scikit-learn, pandas, etc.), R, Java
Experience with supervised and unsupervised machine learning techniques
Experience with Agile development and Agile tools (i.e. Jira, Confluence)
Experience within the SIGINT mission environment and an understanding of customer data formats
Strong analysis and problem-solving experience
Nice to have:
Experience using large-scale distributed frameworks such as Hadoop, Spark, Tensorflow
Experience with GPU-based machine learning techniques


About us: Experienced advanced analytic development company providing new Cyber solutions to current and emerging missions.
Our Core Values of Honesty, Integrity, Loyalty, Fairness, Respect, Responsibility, and Accountability drive our mission and vision and are the heart of what we do each day. We combine our Core Values with the three key elements of people, technology, and integrity to repeatedly deliver stellar results within our primary competencies.
ClearEdge is also pleased to share that we have recently expanded our prime and subcontract presence into new Cyber markets!
If this position does not fit your skillset, please visit our Careers page to explore our current openings, or contact a ClearEdge recruiter at careers@clearedgeit.com. ClearEdge is an equal opportunity employer.",4.0,"ClearEdge
4.0","Annapolis Junction, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
84,Senior ML/CV/AI Software Engineer,-1,"_[Please only apply if you have *at least 5 years of experience* as a SWE and if *you have a BSc or MSc in Computer Science / Software Engineering*. Please don't apply if you graduated recently or are about to graduate, we'll have other openings for these roles soon.]_

At Skyways we are building a new form of air transportation -- some people call it the flying car. We believe large unmanned aerial vehicles (UAVs) represent a unique opportunity to move things and ultimately people in new, more efficient ways. Skyways is an early stage VC funded startup based near Austin TX. We were part of *YCombinator*, S17 batch.

We are growing and looking for *a senior Software Engineer* specialized in *Machine Learning / Computer Vision / AI* to join our team. You are excited about things that fly and you want to advance the future of our civilization by working on new fundamental ways to go from A to B. You are excited about joining a startup. You are able to think in abstract ways, come up with solutions to tough engineering challenges, and you are willing to implement and work directly on the aircraft. You are comfortable with extremely fast-paced environments and limited budgets.
Responsibilities*
take ownership of *computer vision* related projects at Skyways
*collect training data, set up training pipelines, produce models*, rinse and repeat
invent, design new systems and go through *design review* process
reason about your decisions based on data (experiments, math/science)
maintain a clean codebase doing *code reviews, writing tests, using CI*
promote software engineering best practices, and develop processes for the long term
ship software to *production* (i.e. our aircraft but also network-based applications), systems integration, and be an SRE
work with *flight ops to test your software* and iterate/improve at an insane speed
Hard requirements*
BSc. or MSc. (preferred) in Computer Science / Software Engineering
Graduated before 2015
at least 5 years of experience as a Software Engineer
at least 3 years of experience in Machine Learning / AI in particular Computer Vision
at least 3 years of experience in C++ and Python
at least 3 years of experience with code reviews, unit tests and e2e tests
generalist and able to work beyond full stack
Soft requirements*
basic EE knowledge
experience with software running onboard a vehicle/robot
experience with flight controls / control theory
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Software Engineering: 5 years (Required)
code review: 3 years (Required)
managing/leading: 1 year (Preferred)
unit and e2e testing: 3 years (Required)
aviation / space related: 2 years (Preferred)
AI / ML / CV: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Manor, TX 78653 (Required)
License:
Private Pilot (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Skyways,"Manor, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
85,Plastic Extrusion Process Engineer,$44k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"Scope of the Role: *
This position is responsible for design and manufacture of profile extrusion tooling and the development of custom plastic extrusion processes with the objective of improving total quality, material usage and productivity. This position will work closely with the Pexco Engineer Manager, Manufacturing, QC, Materials, and Sales teams to provide leadership, support and training to achieve these common team objectives.
Duties and Responsibilities: *
Take ownership of new projects from start to finish. This includes communicating with internal stakeholders to develop quotation. Understanding of different plastic resins and processing is a must. Must be able to identify the feasibility of the project and research equipment necessary.

Design tooling and develop processes for mono and co-extrusion plastic profiles, tubes and secondary fabrication individually or with other process engineers.

Lead new tooling development process for the project assigned using hands-on approach to meet customer expectation with quality and on time delivery of samples

Coordinate the tooling needs for new products with Die Development, technicians, Engineer Manager and other involved in producing first article samples.

Oversee the tool making activities in the machine shop, ensuring that the tools produced by the machine shop can meet the design criteria and are up to the company’s high standard for design and workmanship.

Support other department and Pexco sites in their tooling needs. Actively seek ways to improvise process efficiencies by way of redevelopment in the shortest possible lead time and most effective design.

Troubleshoot process difficulties on daily basis and support production. Work with Engineer Manager to coordinate a timely response to the need for rebuilding tooling or handling other special tooling needs that cannot be planned for in advance.

Work on continual improvement projects to improve efficiencies and reduce scrap.
Other key elements: *
Follow and support plant and corporate safety policies and initiatives.
Plans, develops and coordinates tool development trials.
Maintain engineering database and documentation as required.
Perform other accountabilities as assigned.
Education, Experience, and Skills required: *
BS in Engineering, 3-5 years of plastics manufacturing experience a plus. Plastic Extrusion die design and process development is a must.

2 years minimum experience in a beginning supervisory position a plus

Ability to read and interpret technical drawings and specifications

Must be HANDS-ON and be willing to work on the floor.

Must working knowledge with a CAD system, CAD/CAM software and Microsoft office

Must have very good technical understanding of plastic extrusion process, terminology and extrusion tooling.

Understanding of plastic materials and ability to research materials.

Understand customer requirements and application.

Demonstrated experience managing multiple projects and attention to detail.

Task oriented, Strong analytical skills and well organized.

Strong interpersonal, excellent oral and written communication skills with the ability to effectively communicate with all levels of the Organization.

Aptitude to learn and be a strong team player.
Key Skills and Attributes: *
Must be HANDS-ON and be willing to work on the floor
Working knowledge of plastic extrusion process, terminology and extrusion tooling
Understand customer requirements and application
Demonstrated experience managing multiple projects and attention to detail
Task oriented, Strong analytical skills and well organized
Strong interpersonal, excellent oral and written communication skills with the ability to effectively communicate with all levels of the Organization
Aptitude to learn and be a strong team player
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $28.00 - $33.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Plastics Extrusion: 3 years (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.pexco.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",3.2,"Pexco, LLC
3.2","Plaistow, NH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
86,Machine Learning Engineer - Pipeline Requisition,$86k-$154k (Glassdoor Est.),"Machine Learning Engineer - Pipeline Requisition
Location


Simi Valley, CA

Employment type


Regular - Full Time

ID

1727

Apply Now

This is a pipeline requisition posted in advance of approved headcount for future hiring needs of Machine Learning Engineers.

AeroVironment Machine Learning Engineers have the opportunity to lead engineering development and work with our R&D Group to develop a variety of innovative capabilities - computer vision detection, classification, localization, and tracking solutions for defense and commercial applications. These development efforts will generally be small focused design teams, which will require a Machine Learning Engineer to use a range of skills and tools across traditional engineering, computer science, and mathematical disciplines including computer vision, machine learning, optimization, deep convolutional neural networks, and visual tracking. This position will work on, and lead, a variety of stages of development including requirements definition, concept design, prototyping, detailed design, test and evaluation, and validation and verification testing.

Position Responsibilities
Leads development of computer vision & machine learning algorithms capable of detection, classifying, localizing & tracking objects-of-interest from a group 1 UAV, using the existing gimballed camera payload
Writes Hand test software to Lead integration of autonomy algorithms into aircraft (such as autopilots, payloads, or other functional components) or other robotic systems
Explores and visualizes data to gain an understanding of it, then identifying differences in data distribution that could affect
Implements Machine Learning systems and validate designs through a series of purpose-designed experiments
Creates objectives & develop models that help to achieve them, along with metrics to track progress
Performs design and analysis tasks using AeroVironment and industry developed tools
Leads Analysis of ML algorithms to solve a given problem and ranking them by success probability
Performance when deploying the model in the real world; Verifying data quality, and/or ensure it via data cleaning
Supervises the data acquisition process if more data is needed; Finds available datasets online that could be used for training
Understands the preprocessing feature based engineering to be done on a given dataset; Training models and tuning their hyper-parameters
Analyzes the errors of the model and designing strategies to overcome them. Deploy models to production; Study and transform data science prototypes
Researches and implemenst appropriate ML algorithms and tools
Determines methods and procedures on new assignments and may coordinate activities of other personnel
Special Requirements
U.S. Citizenship required. Must be willing to work on government contracts and the ability to obtain a security clearance

We are pipelining for Engineers with various level of experience:
Machine Learning Engineer III with a minimum of 5+ years of relevant experience
Sr. Machine Learning Engineer with a minimum of 8+ years of relevant experience
Sr. Staff Machine Learning Engineer with a minimum of 12+ years of relevant experience
Basic Qualifications
BS Degree in Computer Vision and Machine Learning is required or equivalent combination of education, training, and experience - with qualifications in any of the following fields: Mathematics, Optimization, Computer Science/Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Aerospace, or Mechanical Engineering
Familiarity with C/C++ and Matlab required
Demonstrated ability to troubleshoot complex systems
Familiarity with office software and computer-based productivity tools
Advanced degree is preferred
Other matrixed skills include:
Proficiency with a deep learning framework such as TensorFlow or Keras
Proficiency with Python and basic libraries for machine learning such as scikit-learn and pandas
Expertise in visualizing and manipulating big datasets
Proficiency with OpenCV
Familiarity with Linux
Ability to select hardware to run an ML model with the required latency
Computational statistics
Mathematical optimization
Data mining
Exploratory data analysis
Predictive analytics
Note: Our team is always interested in speaking with exceptional Machine Learning Engineers though please note this is a Pipeline posting with more of an eye towards our future needs rather than necessarily being an immediate hire. Only qualified candidates will be contacted.
ITAR Requirement:

This position requires the use of information which is subject to compliance with International Traffic Arms Regulations (ITAR). To conform to U.S. Government export regulations/ITAR, applicants must be a U.S. Citizen, lawful permanent resident of the U.S. (or, green card holder), protected individual as defined by 8 U.S.C. 1324b(a)(3). Applicants cannot be hired until they are qualified to have such access. Some positions due to U.S. Government contract requirements will require current U.S. Citizenship.

Benefits: AV offers an excellent benefits package including medical, dental vision, 401K with company matching, a 9/80 work schedule and a paid holiday shutdown. For more information about our company benefit offerings please visit: http://www.avinc.com/myavbenefits.

We also encourage you to review our company website at http://www.avinc.com to learn more about us.

Principals only need apply. NO agencies please.

Who We Are

Based in California, AeroVironment (AVAV) is a global leader in unmanned aircraft systems (UAS) and tactical missile systems. Founded in 1971 by celebrated physicist and engineer, Dr. Paul MacCready, we’ve been at the leading edge of technical innovation for more than 45 years. Be a part of the team that developed the world’s most widely used military drones and created the first submarine-launched reconnaissance drone, and has seven innovative vehicles that are part of the Smithsonian Institution’s permanent collection in Washington, DC.

Join us today in developing the next generation of small UAS and tactical missile systems that will deliver more actionable intelligence to our customers so they can proceed with certainty – and succeed.

What We Do

Building on a history of technological innovation, AeroVironment designs, develops, produces, and supports an advanced portfolio of unmanned aircraft systems (UAS) and tactical missile systems. Agencies of the U.S. Department of Defense and allied military services use the company’s hand-launched UAS to provide situational awareness to tactical operating units through real-time, airborne reconnaissance, surveillance, and target acquisition.

AeroVironment Incorporated is an equal opportunity employer, M/F/D/V and works in compliance with both federal and state laws. We are committed to the concept regarding Equal Employment opportunity. Qualified candidates will be considered for employment regardless of race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, marital status, medical condition nor disability, genetics, veteran and all others that may appy.

To view our CCPA Privacy Policy click here: https://www.avinc.com/legal/ccpa-privacy-policy",4.1,"AeroVironment
4.1","Simi Valley, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1971,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
87,(Sr) Computer Vision Engineer,-1,"The Company

We are a fast-paced startup building the next generation surgical robot platform. We’re a diverse team dedicated to creating non-invasive solutions that provide clinical value for both patients and doctors. Working here means joining an experienced startup team that is excited and passionate about creating world class products. Founded by a serial entrepreneur with 2 successful exits, the team includes former engineers from top medical robotics companies. We are a well-funded startup and expect talented, motivated, ambitious and interesting co-workers.

Role and Responsibilities
Work with marketing and users to define and iterate requirements
Research, prototype, iterate algorithmic solutions to computer vision problems for surgical planning and navigation
Contribute high quality code to create a medical product that is safe and effective
Support testing and documentation
Job / Skill Requirements
MS/PhD degree in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering or other related programs
Solid foundation on mathematics and analytical skills
Solid training and hands-on experience in geometric computer vision including camera calibration, stereo reconstruction, pose estimation, structure from motion, SLAM
Working knowledge and hands-on experience with Machine learning and Deep learning
Strong development skills using C++, C# and/or Python (and the desire to learn new techniques and tools)
Object Oriented Programming understanding and experience
Experience with volumetric medical image segmentation, registration or reconstruction is preferred
Experience or knowledge with estimation, navigation and sensor fusion is a plus
Familiarity with tools such as OpenCV, ITK, DL frameworks
Industry experience is preferred but not required
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $139,000.00 - $186,000.00 per year

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Company will prepare masks for all employees and require to wear masks in the office.

Education:
Master's (Required)
Experience:
medical industry: 2 years (Preferred)
Computer vision: 3 years (Required)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Stealth Mode Startup,"Redwood City, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
88,Lead Computer Vision Engineer - Active TS/SCI Required,-1,"Lead Computer Vision Engineer – TS/SCI Required

Active TS/SCI Security Clearance Required

Expedition Technology, Inc., in Herndon, VA is searching for an experienced, intelligent, collaborative and talented team player who has expertise in developing and deploying Computer Vision/Image Processing applications. If you are seeking an opportunity to become part of a passionate team whose mission is to push the frontier of computer vision and machine learning technology into defense and space-related applications, look no further than Expedition.

Our successful new team member will lead a team of engineers on a ground-breaking new program integral to the US Department of Defense and the Intelligence Community by creating, designing and implementing complex sensor network system/algorithm data into computer vision systems.

Position Responsibilities will include:

Designing algorithms and experiments to improve existing computer vision models focusing on tracking capabilities, and object detection
Designing system architecture from the ground up alongside engineers from related disciplines
Collaborating with hardware, back-end, embedded, and software teams
Leading team members to accomplish project goals while interacting with customer to ensure requirements are understood and met

Required Qualifications

US Citizenship
Active TS/SCI Security Clearance
Bachelor of Science in Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering, Computer Science, Physics, or related field. Advanced degrees (MS/PhD) are preferred
Minimum 4+ years of professional experience working with computer vision and/or machine learning
2+ years of professional experience leading a computer vision team
Proficiency in Python, OpenCV and deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, Keras or similar
Extensive expertise in one or more of the following: object detection and tracking, human pose estimation, activity recognition, scene understanding, geometry-based methods in vision, sensor fusion, autonomous systems
Understanding of DOD and Intelligence communities along with experience working with relevant stakeholders within them
Understanding of wireless systems and digital signal processing
Well-versed in taking a computer vision project through the planning, data collection, annotation, training, deployment and iteration phases
Ability to juggle multiple priorities and make things happen quickly.
Exceptional writing and verbal communications skills.

Preferred Qualifications

Masters or PhD in Computer Science or related field focus on computer vision research and deep learning.
Some experience working with SAR
Experience investigating, designing, prototyping, and productizing new and innovative computer vision system solutions
Knowledge of GPU programming (CUDA or OpenCL) on GPU accelerator architectures.
Experience with camera bring-up and ISP pipeline configuration.

About Us
Expedition Technology (EXP) is an employee-owned defense and aerospace technology small business that has become a market leader in developing software applications running advanced machine learning algorithms for the DOD and Intelligence Communities. We offer a collaborative team-based culture, a people-first mentality and a focus on cutting edge solutions.

We offer self-directed, company-paid, medical, dental and vision benefits. Additionally, our team enjoys a 401k with up to 12% company match, equity shares, paid holidays, paid time off, tuition reimbursement programs and a student loan repayment option. Most importantly, we offer an environment where we are encouraged to push boundaries, take risks and enjoy the rewards.

We are proud that our dynamic and collaborative culture along with our generous benefits package allowed us to earn a spots on the 2019 and the 2020 Washington Business Journal's Best Places to Work List.

If you are interested in seeing for yourself why our employees' voices made us a Best Place to Work, we'd love to talk with you.

EXP is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer that believes a diverse range of talent creates an environment that fuels creativity and innovation. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, national origin, genetic information or protected veteran status.

Powered by JazzHR

g0YyhJbm3F",5.0,"Expedition Technology, Inc.
5.0","Herndon, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
89,Machine Learning Software Engineer,$106k-$183k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we are: Fueled by a fundamental belief that having access to financial services creates opportunity, PayPal (NASDAQ: PYPL) is committed to democratizing financial services and empowering people and businesses to join and thrive in the global economy. Our open digital payments platform gives PayPal’s 286 million active account holders the confidence to connect and transact in new and powerful ways, whether they are online, on a mobile device, in an app, or in person. Through a combination of technological innovation and strategic partnerships, PayPal creates better ways to manage and move money, and offers choice and flexibility when sending payments, paying or getting paid. Available in more than 200 markets around the world, the PayPal platform, including Braintree, Venmo and Xoom enables consumers and merchants to receive money in more than 100 currencies, withdraw funds in 56 currencies and hold balances in their PayPal accounts in 25 currencies.

Job Description Summary: We are looking for a talented and highly motivated senior engineer for a technical domain that comprises of customer data analytics and ML/DL models development to support different business use cases

Job Description:

Discovering, analyzing, structuring and mining data
Statistical hypotheses validation and model performance analysis
Developing neural network models supporting business use cases
Design and coordinate implementation of DL based solutions for production usage
Deep understanding of data mining algorithms and statistical methods
Experience in successfully applying machine learning to real-world problems
Strong knowledge of Deep Learning frameworks: Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch, etc
Knowledge in python and packages for data analysis (scipy, numpy, pandas, matplotlib)
Proficient in one or more of programming languages Scala, Java, C++
Strong knowledge of extracting and processing data with RDBMS/NoSQL
Good communication skills and team player attitude
Experience in Natural Language Processing/Understanding using deep neural networks ( RNN (LSTM, GRU) / CNN) is a plus
Experience in working with GPU, profiling/low-level optimizations, Cuda/CuDNN is a plus
Experience with one or more Container-ecosystem (Docker, Mesos, Kubernetes) is a plus
Experience with BigData ecosystem Hadoop, Hive, Spark/PySpark is a plus

We're a purpose-driven company whose beliefs are the foundation for how we conduct business every day. We hold ourselves to our One Team Behaviors which demand that we hold the highest ethical standards, to empower an open and diverse workplace, and strive to treat everyone who is touched by our business with dignity and respect. Our employees challenge the status quo, ask questions, and find solutions. We want to break down barriers to financial empowerment. Join us as we change the way the world defines financial freedom.

PayPal provides equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all persons regardless of age, color, national origin, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, race, religion, creed, gender, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, genetic information, marital status, status with regard to public assistance, veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law. In addition, PayPal will provide reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with disabilities.",4.0,"PayPal
4.0","San Jose, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1998,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
90,Field Service Engineer 1 (Tier 1),-1,"Title: * Field Service Engineer 1 (Tier 1)
Reporting to: *Site Manager
Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) Status: * Non-exempt (overtime rules apply)
Applicants for this position must be legally authorized to work in the United States. This position does not meet the employment requirements for individuals with F-1 OPT STEM work authorization status.*
About us: *
NuFlare is a spin-off of the Semiconductor Equipment Division of Toshiba Machine. We have over thirty years of experience developing electron beam (Ebeam) mask writers that print IC circuit patterns on photomasks. Photomasks are quartz plates used to transfer IC circuit patterns onto silicon wafers for semiconductor devices, and play a pivotal role in micro- and nano-fabrication processes by improving productivity and device performance. NuFlare’s electron beam mask writers lead the industry and are valued by customers worldwide.
Job Duties: *
The duties of Field Service Engineer 1 include but are not limited to the following:
Responsible for technical service of NuFlare’s E-Beam equipment installed at customer site. Duties include; Facility checks, routine maintenance and adjustments of the equipment, basic troubleshooting of equipment issues.
Working with more experienced FSEs, following their direction closely in performing maintenance and repairs.
Take full advantage of all on-the-job training opportunities provided, take thorough notes and demonstrate your ability to repeat procedures learned.
Follow the site leader’s directives and prioritization to ensure uninterrupted operation of customer’s equipment and high customer satisfaction.
Responsible for providing timely service in an effective and efficient manner. Coordinate with site manager as necessary.
Provide On-Call/Stand-By Support as needed on a rotational basis including after normal service hours, weekends and holidays.
Provide Shift coverage as required by the site service contract requirements.
Travel internationally and domestically for Training and Site coverage support as requested by the service management team.
Site to Site support within the US for coverage and training. Up to 2 mos. at a time.
Support Logistics management by tracking, replacing, and proper ship-back procedures for spare parts. This requires lifting and moving parts which are > 50 lbs. on a regular basis.
Follow and enhance when applicable, all NuFlare Service procedures including Safety, Repair, Maintenance, and Customer specific site procedures
Follow all customer safety, security and cleanroom protocols at all times
Customer communication
Other Requirements: *
Basic familiarity with Unix
Microsoft Excel, Word skills
Basic knowledge of Statistics
Basic understanding of Quality concepts
Networking concepts
Problem solving skills and desire to enhance that capability
Nice to Have: *
Japanese Language Skills
Mechanical knowledge of High Vacuum
Education/Experience: *
4 year degree Mechanical Eng./Electrical Eng., or

2 Year Degree in technology field plus 2-4 years of experience in like technology.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On call
Experience:
Statistical Analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Applications design and support background if any: 1 year (Preferred)
Language:
Japanese (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
How many years of Field Service experience do you have?
Work Remotely:
No",5.0,"NuFlare Technology America, Inc.
5.0","Boise, ID",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
91,Sr Quality Engineer - Manufacturing,-1,"Main Objective:

Responsible for various Quality Assurance functions for manufacturing development of medical devices in achievement of company goals. Design, develop, implement, and improve manufacturing processes to quality medical device products and systems. This position requires leadership skills, the willingness and ability to mentor Quality Assurance team members and contributions beyond objectives and expected performance.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities :

Participates in the development of medical devices and components from design initiation through design transfer and by representing Quality Assurance for manufacturability in all design and development project teams.
Participates in all manufacturing activities to assure compliance of design specifications.
Leads development of quality plans of new product introductions based on designspecificatons, PFMEA, and control plans.
Works with design team and assist/provide feedback on design specifications and improvements.
Evaluates and develops effective and efficient methods of testing and inspection of products.
Utilizes problem solving tools and techniques and apply risk based approach to problem solving.
Determines necessity of testing and initiates testing by preparing test and inspection plans, and identifying and obtaining required test fixtures and test/inspection instrumentation.
Initiates new projects and acts as the project leader for key initiatives, identifies best practices.
Provides technical support on manufacturing technical issues.
Performs quality trending and leads/supports process improvement initiatives.
Approves manufacturing product and process changes and assures the change management is controlled, adequate, and documented.
Ensures information and documentation is consistently accurate.
Responsible for MRB activities for assigned products, timely resolution of nonconformities, issuing and/or monitoring corrective actions associated with nonconformance and deviations.
Provides input and direction to other members of the quality assurance department to assist them in their assignments and provide them with learning experience.
Supports manufacturing suppliers with assistance in on-site resolution of quality and process related issues andcorrective and preventive actions.
May supervise other engineers, technicians, and support personnel.

Incidental Duties:

The above statements describe the general nature and level of work being performed in this job. They are not intended to be an exhaustive list of all duties, and indeed additional responsibilities may be assigned, as required, by management.

Education and Experience:

Bachelor’s degree required in an Engineering or Engineering Technology discipline.

At least seven years experience in a Quality Control or Quality Assurance position, preferably in a medical device company.

Knowledge and Skill Requirements/Specialized Courses and/or Training:

Working knowledge of risk assessments, design control requirements, PFMEAs, control plans, quality plans, testing and inspection equipment and techniques.
Manufacturing process knowledge.
Technical knowledge in development methodologies, design, project implementation, including, but not limited to GD&T, DOE, verification, and validation.
SPC (Staticstical Process Control) knowledge.
Strong communication skills and ability to communicate effectively with technical and non-technical staff.
Project management skills preferred.
Recognized process improvement (i.e.: Lean, Six Sigma) and problem solving (i.e.: RCA, DMAIC, 5 Whys) training preferred.

Machine, Tools, and/or Equipment Skills:

Proficiency in the use of PC and programs, particularly Excel, Word (or equivalents if changed by the Company), SAP or similar inventory software.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or protected veteran status.

Nearest Major Market: Naples",3.0,"Arthrex
3.0","Ave Maria, FL",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
92,Data Engineer - Cloud Services,-1,"Why 2nd Watch

2nd Watch is in growth mode, and we are looking for like-minded, focused team members to join us! We are looking for the most technically forward-thinking, cloud-passionate employees in the world, and strive daily to align our core values with those that we hire Elevating Each Other, Being Outcome Driven, Winning as a Team, Being Bold, Trusting Each Other, and Having FUN! these are all key elements to who we hire.

2nd Watch has a unique company culture and working environment that live and breathe success and promote pushing the envelope every day in your respective role at the company. This is what drives our teams a perpetual thirst for knowledge, and a desire to work with the best people and take on big challenges together. Getting our attention takes creativity, integrity, a desire to improve yourself and your co-workers each day, and a track record of caring about who you are affecting, both positively and negatively, while you are getting the right stuff done.

We offer roles ranging from all levels in our Sales, Managed Cloud Services, Cloud Enablement, DevOps, Product Development teams and beyond. We are looking for superstars to help raise the bar, setting industry-level standards around project management and delivery of AWS, Azure, and Google Cloud services.

About 2nd Watch

A leader in the post-hardware era, 2nd Watch walks alongside our clients to help them navigate and embrace change to provide better customer experiences through the blend of technology and innovation that is at our core. Our world-class cloud native capabilities in strategic consulting, workload design, technology deployments and workload management enable our clients to have the agility of a growth company and the security of a leader.

Selected by global brands for our thought leadership and agility through tested, proven and trusted customer-obsessed solutions for people, processes and technology, we are hyper-focused on six solution areas:
Datacenter Migration & Application Modernization
Optimization
Data Engineering
Compliance, Security & Business Continuity
DevOps
Managed Cloud services
2nd Watch is an AWS Partner Network (APN) Premier Consulting Partner, a Microsoft Azure Gold Partner, and a Google Cloud Platform Partner. The venture-backed company is headquartered in Seattle, Washington. To learn more about 2nd Watch, visit www.2ndwatch.com or call 888-317-7920.

Position Title:

Data Cloud Engineer :

The ideal candidate is someone who
Operates with the highest levels of integrity
Thinks Big and takes on Big Challenges
Has a continuous thirst for knowledge and is a perpetual learner
Strives to make themselves and everyone around them better
Has a passion for technology
Expertise you bring:
Owning the technical engagement and ultimate success around specific implementation projects.
Developing a deep expertise in enterprise cloud technologies and services.
Being subject matter expert and taking on a consultative role as it pertains to cloud adoption.
Ensure that our applications and infrastructure are designed and implemented to the highest security standards thus maintaining and enhancing customer trust
Evangelize security within 2nd Watch and be an advocate for keeping customer information secure
Demonstrated ability to think strategically about business, product, and technical challenges
Other duties as assigned
Specialized Knowledge & Skills Requirements
Demonstrated experience building and maintaining cloud-native data lakes
Demonstrated experience providing customer-driven solutions, support or service.
In-depth knowledge of SQL or NoSQL and experience using a variety of data stores (e.g. RDBMS, analytic database, scalable document stores)
Extensive hands-on Python programming experience, with an emphasis towards building ETL workflows and data-driven solutions.
Able to employ design patterns and generalize code to address common use cases. Capable of authoring robust, high quality, reusable code and contributing to the divisions inventory of libraries.
Expertise in big data batch computing tools (e.g. Hadoop or Spark), with demonstrated experience developing distributed data processing solutions.
Applied knowledge of cloud computing (AWS, GCP, Azure).
Familiarity with open source machine learning toolkits, such as sklearn, Keras, or TensorFlow.
Applied knowledge of data modeling principles (e.g. dimensional modeling and star schemas).
Understanding of relational database internals
Experience using tools for infrastructure-as-code (e.g. Docker, CloudFormation, Terraform, etc.)
Experience with software engineering tools and workflows (i.e. Jenkins, CI/CD, git).
Education and Licenses:
Bachelor's degree in computer science or related field, or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Benefits and Perks of working at 2nd Watch:
Competitive salaries and all employees are bonus eligible.
401(k) with company stock plans to all employees
100% paid medical, dental and vision coverage for all employees and 90% paid for family, along with other wellness and disability plans.
Open and flexible Paid Time Off Policy
Powered by JazzHR",3.8,"2nd Watch, Inc.
3.8",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
93,Machine Learning Engineer,$127k-$211k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

Wish is a mobile e-commerce platform that flips traditional shopping on its head. We connect hundreds of millions of people with the widest selection of delightful, surprising, and—most importantly—affordable products delivered directly to their doors. Each day on Wish, millions of customers in more than 160 countries around the world discover new products. For our over 1 million merchant partners, anyone with a good idea and a mobile phone can instantly tap into a global market.

We're fueled by creating unique products and experiences that give people access to a new type of commerce, where all are welcome. If you’ve been searching for a supportive environment to chase your curiosity and use data to investigate the questions that matter most to you, this is the place.

Job Description

We're looking for engineers to work on our massive semi-structured datasets.

The role is ideal for someone who has solid mathematical background, industry experience working on a range of classification, information retrieval, and optimization problems, e.g. click-through rate prediction, search ranking, collaborative filtering/recommendation, or review/sentiment classification. It offers the unique opportunity to have direct impact on key product initiatives, including product feed relevance, ad targeting, information extraction, and recommendations.

What you'll be doing:
Improve match accuracy of Wish users and products to boost revenue of Wish
Use big data platform to analyze massive semi-structured dataset and get data insights
Develop data models based on new data insights
Write highly efficient code to serve and a/b testing new models
Monitor, analyze and iterate on data models
Share gained knowledge with teammates and brainstorm new ideas
Qualifications
BS in computer science or equivalent degrees
2+ years of experience
Excellent software design skill with experience in Python, Go, and/or Java.
Strong background in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, recommendation system, search ranking, or data mining.
Passionate about working with large amounts of data and the ability to translate insights into business recommendations.
Experience with different big data frameworks, including Hadoop, Presto, MapReduce, and/or distributed systems.
#LI-BD1

Additional Information

Wish values diversity and is committed to creating an inclusive work environment. We provide equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees. We do not discriminate based on any legally-protected class or characteristic. Employment decisions are made based on qualifications, merit, and business needs. If you need assistance or accommodation due to a disability, please let your recruiter know. For job positions in San Francisco, CA, and other locations where required, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Individuals applying for positions at Wish, including California residents, can see our privacy policy here.",3.5,"Wish
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Other Retail Stores,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
94,Senior Deep Learning Compiler Engineer,$114k-$180k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

About us
Habana Labs is a new and innovative company focused on developing purpose-built AI processors, disruptive solutions that will shape the future of AI and Deep Learning computing. Habana was founded in 2016 by successful entrepreneurs, launched its first AI Inference processor in 2018, its Training processor in 2019 and was acquired by Intel in December 2019. The company now operates as an autonomous subsidiary of Intel. Our vision to take AI processing from its current limits to the peak of its potential continues. We see challenges as opportunities, laser focus on execution and are determined to fulfill our vision to improve the quality of life, work and leisure with our AI solutions.

We are looking for a hands-on compiler engineer to join the R&D Engineering team, with in-depth knowledge in one or more of programming languages, compilers and hardware architecture. Knowledge of ML/DL frameworks and machine learning would be an added bonus but is not required.

Roles and Responsibilities:
Explore solutions to challenging customer requirements through state-of-the-art compilation techniques
Put together, discuss and advocate design proposals for innovative ideas
Rapid prototyping and data-driven exploration of new ideas
Design and implement next-gen features in our compiler and runtime software stack
Tackle large scale optimization problems across novel architectures
Collaborate with peers in SW, Architecture and HW teams
Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications
BS with 9+ years of experience or MS with 6+ years of experience in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or similar field
6 + years of experience C++ experience and software design skills
3+ years of compiler engineering experience with one or more of
2+ years of experience building compilers using LLVM or equivalent
2+ years of Experience building/designing programming models and languages
2+ years of experience with loop optimizations (vectorization, unrolling, fusion, parallelization etc.)
Inside this Business Group

The Data Center Group (DCG) is at the heart of Intel’s transformation from a PC company to a company that runs the cloud and billions of smart, connected computing devices. The data center is the underpinning for every data-driven service, from artificial intelligence to 5G to high-performance computing, and DCG delivers the products and technologies—spanning software, processors, storage, I/O, and networking solutions—that fuel cloud, communications, enterprise, and government data centers around the world.

Other Locations

US, Oregon, Hillsboro

Posting Statement

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, religious creed, sex, national origin, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, military and veteran status, marital status, pregnancy, gender, gender expression, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by local law, regulation, or ordinance.",4.1,"Intel
4.1","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1968,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
95,AWS / Elastic Engineer,-1,"Lodestone Security is seeking a motivated, talented engineer in the AWS and Elastic space. In addition to supporting the build of a brand new AWS infrastructure, this individual will also have duties related to the deployment and administration of Elastic Enterprise and other services in AWS. An ideal candidate would also be able to contribute to the support of other information security related applications and devices in our world-class digital forensics lab.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities*
This position will have responsibilities in four key areas: AWS, Elastic, forensic lab, and other technology.

_Amazon Web Services (AWS)_

Be the go-to person for new deployments, support of existing deployments, and troubleshooting of issues with both. This includes multiple clusters with high availability serving database, application, and workspace workloads. AWS hosts our MDR, MSSP, and workspace virtual desktops, supporting not only our consultants and investigators but also our SOC and business operations staff.

_Elastic / Elasticsearch_

Lodestone has partnered with Elastic on multiple fronts, implementing multiple features at multiple license levels, including machine learning and endpoint defense. This role includes the administration of all of these functions, to include automation of regular tasks like data expiration and archival.

_Forensic Lab_

In our world-class forensic lab, we have purpose-built software and hardware designed specifically for use in Digital Forensics and Incident Response investigations. Our facility in Lewisville, TX had more than 1PB of physical storage, hundreds of processing cores, and many TB of RAM in dozens of on-premise servers and other computers. This is all connected to a 40Gb switching core with a minimum of 10Gb connectivity to endpoints. Our raised-floor datacenter has dedicated 3-phase power and approximately 10 tons of dedicated cooling. This lab requires occasional maintenance and other physical actions taken in order to ensure our ability to conduct forensic investigations in an efficient and timely manner. This role will ideally include attention paid to the forensic lab, as needed.

_Other Applications_

You may be called upon to exercise other parts of your skillset, including development and automation of infrastructure-related activity. Our Business Operations and ticketing platforms, our Customer Relationship Management (CRM) software, and many other one-off applications are all part of the core infrastructure at Lodestone. We welcome your contribution on any front.
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities*
· 3-5 years of AWS Administration

· 1-2 years of Elasticsearch Administration

· Familiarity with Information Security concepts

· Strong organizational and documentation ability

· 5-10 years in related Information Technology areas

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $80,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
COVID-19 considerations:
For the remainder of 2020, Lodestone employees are primarily remote, visiting our facilities on an as-needed with strict social distancing guidelines in place. We will continue this past the end of the year if needed - employee safety is our #1 priority.

Experience:
AWS: 3 years (Required)
Elasticsearch: 1 year (Preferred)
IT: 5 years (Preferred)
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
Company's website:
http://www.lodestonesecurity.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,"Lodestone Security
5.0","Lewisville, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
96,Machine Learning Engineer Principal,-1,"We are currently seeking a Principal Machine Learning Engineer to join our team.

The Principal Machine Learning Engineer will have the opportunity to lead engineering development and work with our R&D Group to develop a variety of innovative capabilities - computer vision detection, classification, localization, and tracking solutions for defense and commercial applications. These development efforts will generally be small focused design teams which will require a Principal machine learning engineer to use a range of skills and tools across traditional engineering, computer science, and mathematical disciplines including computer vision, machine learning, optimization, deep convolutional neural networks, and visual tracking. This position will work on, and lead, a variety of stages of development including requirements definition, concept design, prototyping, detailed design, test and evaluation, and validation and verification testing.

Position Responsibilities

Create Strategy and Lead development of computer vision and machine learning algorithms capable of detection, classifying, localizing, and tracking objects-of-interest from a group 1 UAV using the existing gimballed camera payload.
Create Strategy and Write and test software to Lead integration of autonomy algorithms into aircraft (such as autopilots, payloads, or other functional components) or other robotic systems.
Exploring and visualizing data to gain an understanding of it, then identifying differences in data distribution that could affect
Implement Machine Learning systems and validate designs through a series of purpose-designed experiments.
Create objectives and develop models that help to achieve them, along with metrics to track their progress
Create and Perform design and analysis tasks and criteria using proprietary and industry developed tools.
Managing available resources such as hardware, data, and personnel so that deadlines are met
Create Strategy for Analyzing and leading the ML algorithms to solve a given problem and ranking them by their success probability
Performance when deploying the model in the real world
Verifying data quality, and/or ensuring it via data cleaning
Supervising the data acquisition process if more data is needed
Creating and Finding available datasets online that could be used for training
Defining the preprocessing feature-based engineering to be done on a given dataset
Defining data augmentation pipelines
Training models and tuning their hyper-parameters
Analyzing the errors of the model and designing strategies to overcome them
Deploying models to production
Study and transform data science prototypes
Design machine learning systems
Research and implement appropriate ML algorithms and tools
Develop machine learning applications according to requirements
Select appropriate datasets and data representation methods
Create and Run machine learning tests and experiments
Perform statistical analysis and fine-tuning using test results
Train and retrain systems when necessary
Extend existing ML libraries and frameworks

Other Matrixed Skills include:

Proficiency with a deep learning framework such as TensorFlow or Keras
Proficiency with Python and basic libraries for machine learning such as scikit-learn and pandas
Expertise in visualizing and manipulating big datasets
Proficiency with OpenCV
Familiarity with Linux
Ability to select hardware to run an ML model with the required latency
Computational statistics
Mathematical optimization
Data mining
Exploratory data analysis
Predictive analytics

Special Requirement
U.S. Citizenship required

Basic Qualifications (Required Skills & Experience)

BS in Computer Vision and Machine Learning with qualifications in any of the following fields: Mathematics, Optimization, Computer Science/Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Aerospace, or Mechanical Engineering with 15 years relevant experience or MS/Ph.D. related degree with 11 years of relevant experience.
Familiarity with C/C++ and Matlab required.
Demonstrated ability to troubleshoot complex systems.
Excellent verbal and written skills.
Must be a team player and collaborate effectively.
Familiarity with office software and computer-based productivity tools.
Must be willing to work on government contracts and ability to obtain a security clearance.
Able to excel in a fast-paced, deadline-driven environment.

#D820",3.7,"Johnson Service Group Inc.
3.7","Simi Valley, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
97,Lead Machine Learning Engineer,-1,"Glassdoor is leading the industry in how jobs seekers find a job they love. We are building state of the art algorithms to power personalized jobs search experience for 60+ Million unique users per month and growing.

Our mission is to help people everywhere find a job and company they love. We're transforming an entire industry through the power of transparency. Our vision is for a world where radical transparency holds companies accountable to strive to become better employers.

Please note this role is open to remote hiring. Our main office locations are in San Francisco, CA, Chicago, IL and Uniontown, OH.

You will be part of a highly talented team of machine learning engineers and data scientists, using the latest machine learning technologies to improve Glassdoor's products on user generated content, such as company reviews and interview questions.

Join us if you are a technical leader with a deep understanding of NLP, Search, and machine learning and experience implementing those models at large scale in real-world applications.

Key Responsibilities:


Lead a team of engineers and data scientists to create, implement, and improve NLP and Search solutions for entity recognition, classification, clustering, and recommendation
Lead projects to define, research and implement features to enhance our user experience on User Generated Content, such as reviews and interview questions
Coordinate cross-team projects and proactively drive projects to completion
Key Qualifications:


4+ years of experience applying machine learning in production environment
Hands-on technical leader with excellent problem solving and analytical skills. Capable of making sound decisions and bringing others on board with proposed solutions.
Deep understanding and hands-on experience in applying machine learning solutions to solve real-world problems
Hands-on experience in deploying machine learning models in production environment
Hands-on experience in using structured and unstructured data
Hands-on experience with supervised and unsupervised machine learning algorithms for regression, classification, and clustering
Familiarity with search domain (Information retrieval, Elastic Search or related tech) is a plus
Experience in NLP is a plus
Experience with analyzing large data sets, using Hadoop, Spark or related technologies is a plus
Write code with a high standard of quality, maintainability, and testability
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
M.S. or above in Computer Science or a related field
Why Glassdoor?
Work with purpose join us in creating transparency for job seekers everywhere
100% company paid medical/dental/vision/life coverage, with 80% dependent coverage
Long Term Incentive Plan
401(k) Plan with a Company Match to prepare for your future
Generous paid holidays and open paid time off
Our Commitments
Pay transparency: Pay bands and compensation philosophy are shared publicly to ensure that everyone is paid fairly. Our annual Pay Gap Study found no gender or race/ethnicity pay gap at Glassdoor.
Diversity data transparency: Glassdoor externally publishes diversity information about its employee population to hold ourselves accountable to our commitment to change. We also provide programs and resources to foster a greater sense of belonging for our employees.
Employee feedback transparency: We publicly publish our employee feedback survey responses to ensure everyone has a complete picture of what it's like to work here.
Company performance transparency: Glassdoor will provide candidates easy access to the financial performance of the HR Tech strategic business unit of Recruit Holdings, of which Glassdoor is a part.
Operating transparently at Glassdoor is fundamental to us walking the talk as we advocate for transparency everywhere. The ultimate goal is not just to change how we operate at Glassdoor, but for every employer to follow our lead!

Glassdoor is committed to equal treatment and opportunity in all aspects of recruitment, selection, and employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, ethnicity, age, sex, marital status, physical or mental disability, gender identity, sexual orientation, veteran or military status, or any other category protected under the law. Glassdoor is an equal opportunity employer; committed to creating a community of inclusion, and an environment free from discrimination, harassment, and retaliation.",3.7,"Glassdoor
3.7",Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
98,Staff Data Scientist,$134k-$219k (Glassdoor Est.),"Integral Ad Science (IAS) is a global technology and data company that builds verification, optimization, and analytics solutions for the advertising industry and we're looking for a Staff Data Scientist to join our Data Science team. If you are excited by technology that has the power to handle hundreds of thousands of transactions per second; collect tens of billions of events each day; and evaluate thousands of data-points in real-time all while responding in just a few milliseconds, then IAS is the place for you!

As a Data Scientist at IAS, you will be part of a team that is a center of innovation for the company and a major contributor to the company's core products. The Staff Data Scientist will work on challenging technical problems in brand safety, developing and pushing out ML/DL models at scale that classify brand unsafe material across the web.The types of challenges we solve have attracted people from industry and academia with diverse backgrounds, including machine learning, physics, biology, neuroscience, computer science, finance, and economics. We're passionate about maintaining an open and collaborative environment, where team members bring their own unique style of thinking and tools to the table.

What you'll get to do:
Scope work and projects in the realm of machine learning, focusing on deep learning applications in image/video classification.
Work with a variety of data sources to build production-ready ML models
Apply machine learning to novel problems in online advertising.
Collaborate with engineers to integrate solutions within larger engineering workflows
Effectively communicate results from ML/DL models and statistical learnings to a variety of stakeholders within R&D and product organizations
What you'll need:
Advanced degree (MSc, PhD preferred) in a relevant technical field (machine learning, computer science, computer vision, etc)
Solid research background and experience in computer vision, machine learning, and image/video analysis algorithms.
2-5 years industry experience, with technical leadership, and experience guiding ML projects from start to finish
Experience with at least one scripting language such as Python and with deep learning frameworks (tensorflow, keras, caffe, etc)
Familiarity with relational databases and SQL
Experience with source control workflows and deploying ML models in production
Comfort manipulating and analyzing complex, high-volume, high-dimensionality data from varying sources
Experience distilling product requirements into problem definitions, dealing with ambiguity and competing objectives
Ability to communicate complex quantitative analysis in a clear, precise, and actionable manner
What puts you over the top:
Practical experience with image/video classification, object detection, speech recognition, machine translation, and similar problems.
Publication record in deep learning / neural networks or adjacent fields
Experience working with distributed computing tools (Hadoop, Spark, Hive, etc.) and cloud platforms (AWS, GCP)
About Integral Ad Science

Integral Ad Science (IAS) is the global market leader in digital ad verification, offering technologies that drive high-quality advertising media. IAS equips advertisers and publishers with both the insight and technology to protect their advertising investments from fraud and unsafe environments as well as to capture consumer attention, and drive business outcomes. Founded in 2009, IAS is headquartered in New York with global operations in 18 offices across 13 countries. IAS is part of the Vista Equity Partners portfolio of software companies. For more on how IAS is powering great impressions for top publishers and advertisers around the world, visit integralads.com.

Equal Opportunity Employer:

IAS is an equal opportunity employer, committed to our diversity and inclusiveness. We will consider all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, nationality, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, religion, disability or age. We strongly encourage women, people of color, members of the LGBTQIA community, people with disabilities and veterans to apply.

California Applicant Pre-Collection Notice:

We collect personal information (PI) from you in connection with your application for employment or engagement with IAS, including the following categories of PI: identifiers, personal records, commercial information, professional or employment or engagement information, non-public education records, and inferences drawn from your PI. We collect your PI for our purposes, including performing services and operations related to your potential employment or engagement. For additional details or if you have questions, contact us at compliance@integralads.com.

To learn more about us, please visit http://integralads.com/ and https://muse.cm/2t8eGlN

Attention agency/3rd party recruiters: IAS does not accept any unsolicited resumes or candidate profiles. If you are interested in becoming an IAS recruiting partner, please send an email introducing your company to recruitingagencies@integralads.com. We will get back to you if there's interest in a partnership.",3.5,"Integral Ad Science
3.5","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
99,Machine Learning Engineer,$65k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description
This role will be part of our Applied Data Team and will be responsible for providing Machine Learning Engineering support.
Tasks & responsibilities required of this role include but are not limited to:
Construct machine learning models including data collection, normalization, and standardization, data pipeline construction, model selection and hyperparameter tuning, working ml systems that can add new data into ml model.
Create apps to present ml models and host them in the cloud or locally.
Create pipelines to query and retrieve and update data for existing applications to keep them updated
Supervise the scaling and management of the machine learning modeling ecosystem
Find orthogonal data sets to supplement models and increase alpha
Stay abreast of new technology and machine learning methodologies and implement them into the model building architecture
Work alongside (re)insurance domain experts to improve predictive aspects of their lines of business
Requirements:
3+ years of demonstrative excellence in building, scaling, and productizing machine learning models
Experience working with sparse, high dimensional, and time series data
Python ml stack
Experience dealing with imbalanced classes
Deep Learning Architectures
ML Optimization Techniques
Cloud Services: Azure, AWS, Google Cloud
Distributed systems: Hadoop, MapReduce, Spark
Databricks
Ensemble Stacking and Meta Learners
Classification and Regression Metrics
Regularization Methods
Version Control
Quant trading experience welcome but not required
Kaggle ranking of expert or higher a plus",3.5,"TransRe
3.5","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
100,Data Scientist,$65k-$108k (Glassdoor Est.),"HPOne, named CT Magazine's 2018 Great Places to Work, is looking for a Data Scientist to join our team.

The Data Scientist is responsible for collecting, cleaning, translating data to meet the company's needs. Every business collects data, whether it's sales figures, market research, logistics, or transportation costs. The Data Scientist will use that data and machine learning to help drive HPOne's business plans.

What you'll do:
Research and develop statistical learning models for data analysis
Develop insights and deliver recommendations based on data analyses
Work with business leaders to articulate business requirements for data analyses
Implement new statistical or other mathematical methodologies for specific models or analyses
Optimize joint development efforts through database use and project design
Create automated reports and dashboard products, in order to display results to internal teams
Develop end-customer segmentation schemes by analyzing customer behavior
Perform ad hoc analyses and deliver recommendations
Develop and implement predictive models like decision tree, regression using R or similar
Communicate results and ideas to key decision makers
Required Skills/Abilities:
Master's Degree in Computer Science, Statistics, Applied Math or related field
Five years' experience with SAS (or similar), ETL, data processing, database programming and data analytics
Experience in data mining and statistical analysis
Able to understand various data structures and common methods in data transformation
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Experience with programming languages such as Java / Python (or ""R"")
Experience conducting regression analyses
Understanding of relational databases and data management as well as experience with data aggregation and normalization
Advanced excel expertise (pivot tables, VLOOKUP, report filters, etc.)
Ability to approach tasks strategically, while owning and mastering the details
Exceptional problem solving, as well as analytical and strategic thinking skills
Initiative to own projects from start to finish
Strong oral and written communication skills, with ability to work well with people across the company at all levels


Preferred Skills/Abilities:
Coursework in at least one of the following: mathematics, business, analytical marketing, information systems, programming/databases, statistics/statistical modeling, finance, economics, or physics
Experience conducting analyses and building predictive models using SAS (or similar)
Experience with business intelligence and data visualization tools preferred (like Domo or Tableau)
Physical Requirements:
Prolonged periods of sitting at a desk and working on a computer, typically in an office or cubicle environment (constant noise, fluorescent overhead lighting)
HPOne is an Equal Opportunity Employer:

Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) is a fundamental principle at HPOne, where employment is based upon personal capabilities and qualifications. HPOne does not discriminate because of actual or perceived sex, sexual orientation or preference, gender identity, gender, transgender, race, color, religion, national origin, creed, citizenship status, ancestry, age, marital status, pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions, medical conditions including genetic characteristics, mental or physical disability, military and veteran status, or any other protected characteristic as established by law. HPOne requires the necessary drug testing and background checks as part of our pre-employment practices.",3.5,"HPOne
3.5","Trumbull, CT",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
101,Data Scientist,$57k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"A trusted partner at nearly three million commercial customer locations, Ecolab (ECL) is the global leader in water, hygiene and infection prevention solutions and services. With annual sales of $13 billion and more than 45,000 associates, Ecolab delivers comprehensive solutions, data-driven insights and personalized service to advance food safety, maintain clean and safe environments, optimize water and energy use, and improve operational efficiencies and sustainability for customers in the food, healthcare, hospitality and industrial markets in more than 170 countries around the world.

Ecolabs Institutional division, serving the restaurant and hospitality market, is seeking a business focused Data Scientist to unlock the value in data assets while creating new and unique offerings for customers. As a data scientist in the Advanced Analytics organization, you will play a pivotal role in planning, executing and delivering machine learning-based projects. The bulk of the work will be in machine learning (ML) modelling, management and problem analysis, data exploration and preparation, data collection and integration, as well as operationalization. You will be a key interface between the advanced analytics team and the business unit and various other departments (such as IT). Candidates need to be very much self-driven, curious and creative.

In this role, we are looking for:
A problem-solving mindset with the ability to understand business challenges and how to apply your analytics expertise to solve them.
The unique person who can present complex mathematical solutions in a simple manner that most will understand including customers.
An individual excited by innovation and new technology and eager to finds ways to employ these innovations in practice.
A team mentality empowered by the ability to work with a diverse set of individuals.
Whats in it For You:
Opportunity to take on some of the worlds most meaningful challenges, helping customers achieve clean water, safe food, abundant energy and healthy environments.
Ability to make an impact and shape your career with a company that is passionate about growth.
Support of an organization that believes it is vital to include and engage diverse people, perspectives and ideas to achieve our best.
What you will do:
Problem Analysis and Project Management.
Inspire the organization about the business potential and strategy of artificial intelligence.
Collaborate across the business to understand IT and business constraints.
Manage data science projects and the corresponding key performance indicators (KPIs) for success.
Data Collection and Integration.
Understand new data sources and process pipelines and catalog/document them.
Acquire access to various databases and other sources systems such as SQL or graph databases.
Create data pipelines for more efficient and repeatable data science projects.
Data Exploration and Preparation.
Apply statistical analysis and visualization techniques to various data.
Generate hypotheses about the underlying mechanics of the business process.
Test hypotheses using various quantitative methods.
Display drive and curiosity to understand the business process to its core.
Network with domain experts to better understand the business mechanics that generated the data.
Machine Learning.
Apply various ML and advanced analytics techniques to perform classification or prediction tasks.
Acquire domain knowledge and integrate it into ML solutions, for example, from an understanding of financial risk, customer journey, quality prediction, sales, marketing.
Testing of ML models, such as cross-validation, A/B testing, bias and fairness.
Operationalization.
Collaborate with ML operations, data engineers, and IT to deploy ML solutions.
Follow established best practices around ML production infrastructure.
Network with internal and external partners.
Upskill yourself (through conferences, publications, courses, local academia and meetups).
Collaboration with other technical teams within the organization.
Encourage and leverage the reuse of artifacts.
Be encouraged and expected to innovate and be creative in your data analysis, problem solving and presentation of solutions.
Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelors Degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics with 3+ years related experience, or
Masters Degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics with 1+ years of related experience
Experience working with statistics/analytics/visualization tools, preferably in the Microsoft Azure Suite.
Preferred Qualifications:
Ph.D. degree in Data Science, Math, Statistics, Computer Science or related field with an emphasis on analytics.
Experience working in Python/SQL/Jupyter.
Self-driven, curious and creative with a collaborative mindset.
Demonstrated ability to work in diverse, cross-functional teams in a dynamic business environment.
Strong communication and presentation skills.
Our Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion

At Ecolab, we believe the best teams are diverse and inclusive, and we are on a journey to create a workplace where every associate can grow and achieve their best. We are committed to fair and equal treatment of associates and applicants. We recruit, hire, promote, transfer and provide opportunities for advancement on the basis of individual qualifications and job performance. In all matters affecting employment, compensation, benefits, working conditions, and opportunities for advancement, we will not discriminate against any associate or applicant for employment because of race, religion, color, creed, national origin, citizenship status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expressions, genetic information, marital status, age, disability, or status as a covered veteran.

In addition, we are committed to furthering the principles of Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) through Affirmative Action (AA). Our goal is to fully utilize minority, female, disabled and covered veteran individuals at all levels of the workforce. Ecolab is a place where you can grow your career, own your future and impact what matters.

We will consider for employment all qualified applicants, including those with criminal histories, in a manner consistent with the requirements of applicable state and local laws, including the City of Los Angeles Fair Chance Initiative for Hiring Ordinance and the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance.",3.7,"Ecolab
3.7","Saint Paul, MN",-1,10000+ Employees,1923,Company - Public,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
102,Data Scientist,$90k-$148k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Summary*
Nutrisystem is seeking a Data Scientist to join our growing Analytics community. This role will develop, manage, and deliver analytical solutions to solve complex business challenges. The Data Scientist will closely interact with Marketing, Finance, Product Development, Information Technology, and our Call Center to influence key business decisions through fact-driven insights. The ideal candidate will possess excellent analytical and communication skills and have a history of thriving in fast-paced business environments.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities*:
Use complex data and algorithms to solve known and unknown business challenges.
Designs analytic plans, translating business problems/opportunities into analytic approaches. Engages with project sponsors and stakeholders to understand each business question. Probes for hidden questions and goals. Brings structure to each request and translates requirements into the appropriate analytic approach.
Develops queries and performs extensive programming to access, transform and prepare data for statistical modeling and analysis.
Designs and develops models to target marketing offers. Responsible for model validation, implementation, and documentation.
Performs deep-dive descriptive and predictive analytics for customer behavioral segmentation related to customer acquisition and retention.
Analyzes data to describe customer behavior and preferences, understand marketing channel usage, diagnose customer experience problems, size marketing opportunity, and measure the impact of marketing initiatives.
Prepares and delivers insight presentations and recommendations. Communicates complex material in digestible terms appropriate for each audience. Educates company executives and the broader marketing team on analytical findings and implications using storytelling and data visualization techniques.
Provides statistical consultation services within the organization. Serves as the analytics expert on cross-functional teams for large strategic initiatives.
Work with Marketing and business partners to design valid tests with results that are reliable and actionable.
Develops and applies domain knowledge of Nutrisystem’s business and data to shape the analytic road map.
Contributes to the growth of the broader analytics community at NTRI.
Participates in special projects and performs other duties as required.
Qualifications (Include Education and Specific Experience)*
Bachelor degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Data Science, Analytics, Operations Research, Economics, or other quantitative field required. Masters preferred.
Minimum 5 years of experience with progressively more complex data science, applied statistics, and machine learning projects.
Experience utilizing statistical and machine learning methods: data imputation, propensity models, regression (logistic, linear), clustering (k-nearest neighbors, hierarchical), decision trees (CHAID, CART), random forest, uplift modeling, optimization, simulation, time series, hazard function and survival analysis, Bayesian methods, principal component analysis, support vector machines, association rules, ensemble methods, forecasting, model validation, design of experiments.
Domain experience in marketing analytics: customer acquisition, digital marketing, response modeling, clustering, forward looking customer lifetime value, next best offer.
Expert level skills in the data science tool stack: R, Python, SQL, data visualization tools (e.g. Tableau,
Company Info*:
Tivity Health: *
Tivity Health®, Inc. (tivityhealth.com) is a leading provider of health improvement, nutrition, fitness, and social engagement solutions at scale to improve clinical outcomes, reduce healthcare costs and create opportunities to feel better, work better, and live better. With decades of clinical and operational expertise, the company touches millions of consumers through its integrated portfolio of brands and works directly with hundreds of healthcare practitioners and many of the nation’s largest payers and employers. Tens of millions of Americans are currently eligible for Tivity Health’s SilverSneakers®, Prime® Fitness, WholeHealth Living™, and flip50™ programs and millions of people have lost weight with Nutrisystem®, South Beach Diet® and DNA BodyBlueprint™. As part of its commitment to tackling social isolation and loneliness, in 2017, Tivity Health launched a rural aging initiative to address challenges unique to older adults in rural communities.
Our Purpose: *
We empower older adults to live their best lives – with vitality, dignity, and purpose. We enable healthy aging – both in place and in the community.
Our Vision: *
We will transform the aging experience – reducing the burden of chronic conditions among older adults, enabling these to be their best years, and inspiring the next generation that the best is yet to come.
EEO/AA*
Tivity Health. Inc. is an equal employment opportunity employer and is committed to a proactive program of diversity development. Tivity Health, Inc. will continue to recruit, hire, train, and promote into all job levels without regard to race, religion, gender, marital status, familial status, national origin, age, mental or physical disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, source of income, or veteran status.
SQF Standards*
All staff shall be informed of their responsibility to report food safety and quality issues to personnel with authority to initiate action.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $95,000.00 - $125,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We will be working from home until the end of the year (2020). While we plan to be back in the office soon, that date is not determined.

Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
tivityhealth.com
Company's Facebook page:
tivityhealth.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.0,"Nutrisystem
3.0","Fort Washington, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
103,Data Scientist,$80k-$111k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Brief

The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience. Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.

Overview

IFG Companies is in search of a Data Scientist to join its growing Predictive Modeling team.

The ideal candidate will have previous Data Modeling experience. Strong preference will be given to candidates with an actuarial background in the property and casualty insurance space.

Responsibilities
Build predictive and/or Machine Learning models in SAS
Research new statistical and mathematical techniques that are suitable and helpful for solving business related problems
Prepare data for modelling and make best/creative use of applicable and available internal or external data
Identifying and integrating new datasets that can be leveraged for modeling efforts
Support related processes around effectively deploying model to business
Effectively communicate results in written, oral and presentation formats to technical and non-technical audiences
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, applied mathematics, or related discipline
3+ years of Data Modeling or similar experience.
Experience with predictive modeling (classification, regression, parameter tuning, optimization criteria, feature selection), preferably with multiple techniques
Experience in model validation techniques, model testing and continuous monitoring of model performance
Experience in Property & Casualty Insurance is strongly preferred.
Demonstrated experience working with large relational data sets.
Working knowledge in SAS, R, Python or another platform to develop and implement predictive models.
Ability and willingness to quickly gain knowledge of SAS enterprise guide and enterprise miner.
Ability to communicate complex technical information in common language to foster teaching and analytics guidance to internal customers.
Advanced experience in analytics, data cleaning, and predictive modeling.
Ability to write queries in SQL.
Detail-oriented and ability to work collaboratively
Physical Demands
Physical demands are considered to be that of an office environment, climate controlled, with minimal physical exertion. This position requires prolonged sitting, ability to utilize a computer and interactions with others in meetings or via phone.
Benefits
We offer a competitive compensation and benefits package including medical, dental, vision, 401(k), flexible spending, short-term and long-term disability insurance, life insurance, long-term care, education assistance and paid time off.
IFG Companies is an equal opportunity employer committed to a diverse workforce. M/F/D/V",2.7,"IFG Companies
2.7","Atlanta, GA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1985,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
104,Test Engineer,$41k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"Secure our Nation, Ignite your Future

Become an integral part of a diverse team while working at an Industry Leading Organization, where our employees come first. At ManTech International Corporation, you'll help protect our national security while working on innovative projects that offer opportunities for advancement.

Currently, ManTech is seeking a motivated, career and customer-oriented Test Engineer to join our team in San Antonio, TX.

Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:

Perform duties as both software developer and test engineer for the Test Engineering team and make sure quality objectives are fulfilled on a par with customer requirements
Using Python and other technologies to develop new capabilities for a system-independent desktop application and maintain top-notch automation performance
Develop software resolutions for automation management server, both back and front end, using Microsoft .Net framework and sustain test automation capabilities
Constantly update production automation scripts to expand the competence of the test team’s automation framework
Monitor test automation results and make sure any software defect is documented and addressed prior to product delivery

Basic Qualifications:

This position requires a strong understanding of, and experience with, Linux and Windows operating systems, as well as, Bash, Python and MySQL/PostgreSQL databases
You will need to be methodical in your approach; have solid problem solving and debugging skills to determine the root cause of software defects, and be able to properly convey and report your findings
You will write and review technical documentation, including but not limited to: test reports, installation, and user guides
Ability to handle stress and work well under pressure
Analytical and critical thinking skills
Multi-tasking ability

Preferred Qualifications:

A degree, professional, or personal experience in one of the following disciplines: Computer Engineering, Software Engineering, Computer Science, or Math
Knowledge of and experience with: VMware, proxies, PyTest/NoseTest
Ideal candidates will exhibit our core values: Passion, Capacity, and Humility
Passion for the customers and mission we serve
Capacity to learn and grow into a technical leader
Humility to learn from others and treat others with respect

Security Clearance Requirement:

Must be a US citizen with the ability to obtain/maintain a Secret clearance is required

Active/current Secret clearance is highly preferred

Physical Requirements:

Must be able to remain in a stationary position 50%
Constantly operates a computer and other office productivity machinery, such as a calculator, copy machine and computer printer.
The person in this position frequently communicates with co-workers, management and customers, which may involve delivering presentations
Working with Data
Move about freely in a laboratory setting
Repetitive Motions

#LI-CD1

ManTech International Corporation, as well as its subsidiaries proactively fulfills its role as an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, national origin, marital status, physical or mental disability, status as a Disabled Veteran, Recently Separated Veteran, Active Duty Wartime or Campaign Badge Veteran, Armed Forces Services Medal, or any other characteristic protected by law.

If you require a reasonable accommodation to apply for a position with ManTech through its online applicant system, please contact ManTech's Corporate EEO Department at (703) 218-6000. ManTech is an affirmative action/equal opportunity employer - minorities, females, disabled and protected veterans are urged to apply. ManTech's utilization of any external recruitment or job placement agency is predicated upon its full compliance with our equal opportunity/affirmative action policies. ManTech does not accept resumes from unsolicited recruiting firms. We pay no fees for unsolicited services.

If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, you have the right to request an accommodation if you are unable or limited in your ability to use or access http://www.mantech.com/careers/Pages/careers.aspx as a result of your disability. To request an accommodation please click careers@mantech.com and provide your name and contact information.",4.2,"ManTech International Corporation
4.2","San Antonio, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1968,Company - Public,Research & Development,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
105,Senior Software Engineer,$93k-$179k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to be part of an exciting team driving innovative solutions? Do you love working with emerging technologies? We’re looking for a Senior Software Engineer with a passion for creating new innovative solutions to consumer and business problems to join Epson’s Digital Innovations Team.

What you will do:
The Senior Software Engineer performs research, prototyping, design, development, integration and/or sustaining of full stack applications, for both new and existing cloud environments.

Research and comprehend contemporary concepts in computer science in order to integrate full software for mobile devices, desktop computers and the cloud. Use this knowledge to design and develop proof of concept and production web applications that interface with Epson consumer electronics devices as well as algorithms that meet and exceed performance targets.
Analyze and engineer feature requests for business teams, contribute to roadmaps for specific technologies and propose new projects to management.
Recommend optimal approaches to design and efficient implementation based on practicality, best practices, and key technology trade off decisions.
Learn and/or evaluate new software technologies
Plan, estimate, schedule and develop software that interfaces with multi function printers, iOS/Android apps, third party reference designs (e.g. Raspberry Pi), multi modal interfaces and server platforms or libraries.
Integrate Epson source code with open source software, and software produced by both Epson affiliates and third party companies.
Investigate problem reports, perform troubleshooting and recommend remedies for multiple products. Also research, install, test, evaluate and document problems in released and pre-release software from vendors.
Review software designs, source code under development by colleagues as needed.
Perform unit and integration testing or create test code for features on various platforms.
Create or update documents explaining feature implementation and usage.
Re-engineer assigned software to improve the performance, scalability, stability, and maintainability.
Utilize agile project methodologies.

What you will bring:

5-7 years experience in designing and developing software for full stack deployments specializing in backend cloud environments that connect standalone products,
Completion of an undergraduate program required. (B.A. or B.S.).
Have a general understanding of approaches in Artificial Intelligence
Experience applying Machine Learning techniques preferred
Experience working with web applications and developing software in one or more server scripting languages
Knowledge of iOS and Android app development and common libraries, object oriented software development
Experience developing multi-threaded applications, and database formats
Working knowledge of backend server application development including Google/Azure/AWS Cloud services, Software as a Service (SaaS), Python, Java, JavaScript, Node.js, RESTful APIs, XML, JSON, HTTP, WebSockets and Socket.IO, SSH, SQL and NoSQL databases.
Working knowledge of RESTful architecture concepts, Docker containers, and design patterns, voice user interfaces, Python, Java, JavaScript, Node.js, Software as a Service (SaaS), MySQL or SQLite, one or more NoSQL databases, callback functions, software factories and common server frameworks and machine learning concepts are preferred.
Experience with personal assistant (Alexa, Google Assistant, Cortana, Siri) skill design capability is a plus.

Epson America, Inc. is an Equal Opportunity/ Affirmative Action Employer

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, disability and protected veteran status, as well as any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law.

IND1",3.8,"Epson America, Inc
3.8","San Jose, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1975,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
106,Senior Data Scientist,$80k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Benson Hill empowers innovators to develop more healthy, tasty and sustainable food by unlocking the natural genetic diversity of plants. Benson Hill's CropOS platform combines machine learning and big data with breeding techniques and plant biology to drastically accelerate and simplify the product development process. This platform allows for cost-effective and more efficient ways for companies to analyze and make improvements in plant genetics. Benson Hill brings a unique and holistic approach to our product and platform development, as we span a broader workflow involving trait and seed development, genome editing, and breeding all the way to creating better ingredients and varieties that tap a strong consumer demand for more flavorful and nutritious fruits and vegetables. More information can be found online at www.bensonhill.com. Follow us on Twitter at @BensonHillInc.

Our Purpose and Core Values

Our Core Values are a set of common principles we share that are fundamental to our company's identity.
Be Bold! We redefine boundaries by providing new solutions to difficult problems. Together we are driven to transform the future and will not allow the fear of failure to prevent us from innovating. We voice our opinions, embrace change, and challenge each other to think creatively.
Be Inspired! We redefine boundaries by providing new solutions to difficult problems. Together we are driven to transform the future and will not allow the fear of failure to prevent us from innovating. We voice our opinions, embrace change, and challenge each other to think creatively.
Be Real! We understand who we are, what we want to achieve, and what it takes to get there. We hold each other accountable through timely, candid, and well-intentioned feedback. Together we engage in honest communication and healthy debate that leads to success through true alignment.
Department Overview

The Data Science & Platform Engineering Department leads the development of Benson Hill's crop design platform, CropOS which combines machine learning and big data with genome editing and plant biology to accelerate and simplify the product development process. The team partners with the Research & Development teams on the development of a portfolio of offerings (commercial, product, or platform related) that meet the needs of Benson Hill's business units.

Position Summary

We are actively seeking a Senior Data Scientist to join our rapidly growing Research and Development Department. The successful candidate will be responsible for developing and implementing models enabling field experimental design and optimization of product performance across testing environments. This person will work closely with Benson Hill data engineers, scientists and project leaders to maximize the impact of Benson Hill's product development programs.

You Will:

(Essential Duties and Responsibilities)
Develop and refine data analysis, storage, and modeling systems.
Conduct independent analyses of performance, and use advanced approaches to identify predictive models in a geospatial framework.
Participate in the design of hypothesis-driven experiments and analyses.
Perform spatial and statistical analysis on experimental outputs and interpret results
Communicate results in written and visual formats to scientists and program leaders.
Identify opportunities for model enhancements and opportunities for new models to create value in the product discovery and testing pipeline.
You Have:

Education
PhD preferred (minimum BS plus 4 years' experience), in applied mathematics, physics, engineering, statistics, ecology, or closely related field with formal training in statistics and experimental design, with demonstrable track record of peer-reviewed publications.
Experience
Demonstrated enthusiasm for data-driven discovery.
Experience with geospatial analyses, modeling, and interactive system development.
Highly developed ability to identify and evaluate predictive models and their utility.
Experience with machine learning and statistical concepts, packages and libraries.
Background and experience analyzing data with Python, R, or Julia.
Expert with at least one scripting language, Python or R preferred.
Ability to work in collaborative team, and the ability to respond positively to critiques of work.
Excellent communication skills, both electronic and in-person.
A track record of producing deliverables and meeting tight release deadlines.
Ability to work autonomously, identify key tasks, and find solutions to challenges.
Experience organizing and planning complex projects
Strong record of personal development and learning new technologies.
Software/Skillset
Strong understanding of scientific concepts, approaches, application, and interpretation.
Demonstrated experience with common machine learning approaches, statistics, geospatial and command line (e.g. R) applications.
Preferred Qualifications:
Doctorate in associated area, with proven publication and communication track record.
Familiarity with crop science and agronomic applications and modeling a plus.
Background and experience using AWS or experience with other cloud architectures
Other
Attention to detail
Strong Customer Focus
Collaborative
Ability to focus and work independently with little direction
We have a Total Rewards Package at Benson Hill that consists of more than just your paycheck. Total Rewards at Benson Hill covers Pay (salary and bonus), Health (employer benefit contributions) and Wealth (investments). Some of the perks include:
A Collaborative Environment
A flexible PTO program with a focus on work/life balance
Competitive medical benefits and retirement savings plan
FREE Dental and Vision Coverage
Education reimbursement
PAID parental leave
And more.",3.0,"Benson Hill
3.0","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
107,Sr. Vision Engineer,-1,"Softwear Automation is disrupting the $100B sewn products industry by reducing sewing labor costs via cutting-edge robotics. We are excited to be changing the clothing manufacturing industry in a way that hasnt been seen since the Industrial Revolution and are in need of a few smart, passionate people to join our growing team!

Role Description:

As a member of a highly collaborative and groundbreaking team, you will be challenged to build out our design-to-product CAD software pipeline and write robot control code.

We are looking for an experienced machine vision specialist to help us develop image-processing algorithms to support our fabric handling, identification, and defect detection systems. You will be working closely with the rest of our team to build the technology that will allow clothing brands to respond even more quickly to customer needs and desires.

Duties & Responsibilities:
Research and implement computer vision and machine learning primitives
Collaborate and contribute with other engineers to facilitate creation of novel embedded architectures
Find the optimal balance between setting and maintaining a research direction, and day-to-day delivery of robust and flexible services
Research, develop, maintain and build state-of-the-art algorithms to analyze images
Execute model building
Determine implementation of algorithms
Critical Skills & Experience:
Solid machine/ computer vision experience
5+ years of continuing development skills: C++, Python, Linux environment, etc
Proficient in algorithms and mathematics
Deep understanding of software architecture and object oriented programming/design
Collaborate with hardware architects to facilitate creation of novel embedded architectures for future deep learning workloads
Flexible, can-do attitude
Desired Experience:
Experience with OpenCV
Experience with CUDA",4.8,"SoftWear Automation
4.8","Austell, GA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
108,AI/ML Data Engineer,-1,"As a Data Engineer at MORSE, you will work with our multidisciplinary team of scientists, engineers, and software developers on a variety of programs related to machine learning and artificial intelligence. You will be expected to rapidly define, develop, implement, and exercise ETL pipelines for complex systems that use data to help produce actionable insights in operational systems.

Skills and Requirements

A successful candidate will be working with data scientists, software engineers, and data providers to maintain data and transforms on that data. The candidate will be creating and maintaining novel pipelines for on premises hardware, externally hosted hardware, cloud-computing systems. The pipelines include data primarily from computer vision systems, traditional sensing systems, robotics data, and human generated label data. All data and pipelines are used for machine learning and artificial intelligence.

US CITIZENSHIP REQUIRED, or the ability to obtain a U.S. Security Clearance

BS, MS, or PhD in computer science, database management, data engineering, or equivalent

At least 5 years of experience as a data engineer

Proficiency in Python and PySpark

Experience with Docker

Good communication skills

Self-starter and driven

Desired Skills:

Experience with cloud computing (AWS, Azure, GCP) is a plus

Familiarity with Kedro is a plus

Familiarity with the latest data engineering trends

Experience with Docker-compose

Experience with Microservices

Proficiency in one or more programming languages

Demonstrated experience with large data sets in one or more of the following areas: parsing, cleaning, storage strategies, provenance tracking, database formats, and parallelized data transformations",5.0,"MORSE Corp
5.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2014,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
109,Machine Learning Engineer,$92k-$161k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you enjoy extracting value from our data? Does the prospect of leading the processes from data collection, cleaning, and preprocessing, to training models and deploying them to production excite you? If you answered “yes” to any of those questions, then we would love to talk with you about joining our Data Platform team as a Machine Learning Engineer.

Our purpose at The Motley Fool is to help people become Smarter, Happier, and Richer. We educate people on everything from how to choose the best credit card to how to make the most of their 401(k). We are looking for our next great Fool to lead our ML initiatives.

The ideal candidate will be a confident, experienced machine learning engineer who is passionate about machine learning and will stay up-to-date with the latest developments in the field.

Responsibilities:
Properly use statistical techniques
Use data exploratory techniques using visualization tools
Requirements gathering working with Business Owners and ability to explain insights.
Ability to use choose between a higher score versus explain
Understanding of time-series
Verifying data quality, and/or ensuring it via data cleaning
Analysis of data drift
Defining validation strategies
Defining the preprocessing or feature engineering to be done on a given dataset
Observing the best practices on training models
Automatically tuning hyperparameters using tools like Grid Search
Analyzing the errors of the model and designing strategies to overcome them
Deploying models to production
Skills:
A minimum of 2 years of experience required
Proficiency with a deep learning framework preferred
Proficiency with Python and basic libraries for machine learning (PANDAS and Scikit-Learn)
Expertise in visualizing and manipulating big datasets
Proficiency with auto-ML and data modeling frameworks using AWS, Azure, and/or Google
Ability to select hardware to run an ML model
Communication skills and ability to collaborate with Data Engineers and Business Analysts
Adept with Data Wrangling techniques",4.6,"The Motley Fool
4.6","Alexandria, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
110,Data Scientist,$80k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Capsule


The Data Scientist analyzes complex and unstructured data using state-of-the-art data science methods for data driven decision making. This role uses knowledge of data science methods and applies analytics to solve real world problems. The Data Scientist will work with customers to collect and understand data, perform wrangling, develop applications and collaborate actively across the organization and with senior management to accomplish various objectives.

Job Duties/Roles
Apply advanced data science concepts to deliver data driven digital offerings and insights
Be able to write independent source code, validate and test for model quality assessment and improvement
Experience with Data Visualization tools such as Power BI or Tableau or Spotfire
Use machine learning and artificial intelligence methods, classification, regression algorithms
Comfortable working independently on data engineering, pre-processing and data preparation tasks to prepare data for further analysis
Generate Intellectual Property for the company
Stay current in the field of advanced analytics and take initiative to apply new technologies
Knowledge, Skills and Abilities Required (KSAR)
Python - Numpy, Pandas, lamdas, keras, Tensorflow, MS Cognitive AI, Matlab, R, SQL
OOP(Object Oriented Programming)
ANN, RNN, Classification, Clustering, CNN, Regression tools
Exposure to building RestFul APis for data science modelling is a plus
Practical experience using predictive analytics, multiple approaches, to ID abnormalities and failures using time series and unstructured data sources.
Knowledge of data architectures and systems is a plus
Minimum years of Experience


Minimum 3 years of relevant experience in data / analytics.

Country Requirements


Must be a US Citizen or Permanent Resident (US Person) and able to work on Government Data with ITAR classification

Required/Preferred Education Requirements


BS degree required in Data Science or Computer Science or Engineering or another relevant field",3.5,"American Bureau of Shipping
3.5","Houston, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1862,Other Organization,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
111,Lead Data Scientist,$89k-$143k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary
Tranzact is hiring a lead data scientist to assist our team in driving our data science and analytics group forward. You’ll be joining a group of curious, smart, technically minded yet business savvy data scientists looking to make a difference to the company by further designing and building out our data decisioning capabilities. We have been up and running for several years and our team must grow to meet the demands of our business partners—they see the value we have provided and want more.

The Lead Data Scientist is passionate about using data and insights to drive business strategy and develop data products. A successful candidate will manage data science projects including scoping, designing, and executing the vision with the help of more junior data scientists / analysts. They would also identify and prioritize initiatives to deliver value to our internal stakeholders. The ideal candidate would have experience managing data science projects, managing stakeholders, and working cross functionally. This person would have real world experience “in the data trenches” as a data scientist and be an all-star individual contributor. We expect this person to have a passion for driving projects for business outcomes, strong analytical skills, and a strong desire to make an impact in our growing data science practice!

What you’ll do:
Become the domain expert in multiple areas of the Tranzact business (i.e. retention, call center effectiveness, etc.) and contribute to the advancement of those area through thought leadership.
Lead new projects and initiatives through understanding business needs, executing, presenting and influencing stakeholders.
Be a technical leader on the team that can advise, mentor, and delegate tasks to more junior data scientists and analysts.
Facilitate data-driven decision making and prioritize initiatives.
Develop strong cross functional partnerships with business and technology stakeholders.
Act as a subject matter expert within the organization on all things data.
Find new and improved ways for us to use data in our products, operations, and business strategies.

What we do:
We achieve competitive advantage through data-driven marketing and full management of the customer experience. We’re constantly refining our technology and our strategies, that’s why we’re the industry leader in delivering the best results to the top insurance brands in America.

That’s not just lip service either, we’re consistently awarded partner of the year from brands like AFLAC, Humana, and more. Our work has also been featured on The Dr. Oz Show, Forbes, and Vox -- to name a few.

We want people who fit within our Be Real culture. We want a diversity of programmers and writers and designers and data scientists and strategists and more. We’re made up of introverts and extroverts, suits and rebels, corporate types and anti-corporate types. We’re an environment where every person feels their full potential is only limited by their ability to conceive of it and make it happen. Our company grew from entrepreneurial roots but has big company resources to get amazing things done.

What we’re looking for:
BA/BS in a quantitative field (Computer Science, Engineering, Mathematics, Statistics, etc.)
5 years of experience in data science at a B2C or direct to consumer company (experience in marketing, business operations, or customer retention is a plus)
Experience implementing predictive and prescriptive models in production systems
Experience managing data science projects and mentoring data scientists / analysts
Proficiency with Python, SQL, Excel, and a data visualization tool (Tableau, Power BI, etc.)
Ability to manage multiple projects and deadlines
Experience communicating strategy and results to different audiences
Ability to work cross functionally and influence others
A lifelong learner that is excited to learn new data science technologies and apply those to technologies to our business
Ability to be objective, follow the facts, cut through noise and create a story with data
Thrives in a fast-paced environment that is constantly changing
What’s in it for you:
Medical, dental, vision, paid time off/holidays, 401(k), and bonus opportunity
Frequent office events and outings
Employee development programs, conference and training reimbursement
Work remote flexibility
Joining a growing and exciting team making a big impact on the business!
EOE, including disability/vets",3.7,"TRANZACT
3.7","Raleigh, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
112,Senior Operations Engineer - Capital Equipment,$77k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"This is a technical, hands-on Operations Engineering position that is responsible for the design, development, manufacturing, quality, cost, and word wide delivery of electromechanical medical systems. This role functions as an integral member of product development teams, utilizes data to identify opportunities, leads projects and implements changes focused on improving product performance and reliability, product enhancements, component obsolescence, increasing capacity, process capability and meeting our commitments. This individual will nourish collaborative relationships, mentor and transfer knowledge and experience to others, contribute to the creation and management of operations engineering budget, and may perform some personnel functions. All work will be done in accordance with Regulatory Requirements and Quality Management System.

Product Development & Operations Support

Performs work in accordance with Regulatory Requirements (i.e. FDA, MDR, UL, CE and other governing bodies) and Quality Management System (QMS), including development and maintenance of documentation
Supports compliance to Regulatory Requirements
IEC 60601 Electrical Safety Testing
Uses data, product application (use-cases), internal and external information, knowledge of healthcare and sound engineering judgment to make decisions
Utilizes appropriate problem solving and continuous improvement tools
Develops, maintains & communicates project plans, coordinates project activities, sets / adheres to milestones and action list
Partners with cross-functional team to actively manage contract manufacturers and suppliers in support of business strategies
Provides process & product line support from prototype to manufacturing (may occur at ACIST or at one of our global contract manufacturers), product end-of-life support and customer usage
Supports daily manufacturing activities
Ensures new product designs are resilient and manufacturing processes are capable
Frequently acts as a key resource / subject matter expert (SME)
Daily ownership of product lines and processes
Enhances and utilizes metrics to identify opportunities, prioritize, lead projects and implement necessary changes focused on; supporting daily production; improving product performance and reliability; product enhancements; component obsolescence, increasing capacity and process capability; reducing lead-times, scrap, rework and operating costs; enhancing customer experiences; and meeting our commitments
Works as an integral member of new product development teams, helps to define requirements, creates processes and test systems, identifies suppliers and ensures products meet customer and market expectations
Implements ergonomic processes to preserve a safe work environment for our employees

Works closely with assemblers and technicians (at ACIST) or with global contract manufacturers to provide guidance and share knowledge

People Leadership

Works collaboratively with other departments (product development, supply chain, manufacturing, quality, customer support, field services, finance, sales and marketing)
Provides transparent communications and encourages active exchange of ideas and information
Provides work direction to less-senior operations engineers and technicians
Mentors, coaches and develops others
Collaborates with others who have supplemental knowledge and skills required to complete projects
Provides recognition to others
Utilizes motivational techniques / tools to drive high levels of employee engagement and performance
Transfers knowledge and experiences to others
May perform some personnel functions, including identifying resource needs, hiring, on-boarding, performance evaluations, terminations, promotions and salary decisions

Contributes to creation and managing operations engineering budget, plans for future resources (human, equipment, etc.), addition of capabilities and future growth projections to support a growing business

This position has supervisory authority for up to one report.

Qualifications (Knowledge, Skills & Abilities):

Minimum:
B.S. in Engineering or equivalent degree (i.e. Physics)
5 – 7 years relevant experience in a Manufacturing environment
4+ years medical device experience
Demonstrated continuous improvement experience
Understand system requirements (i.e. GMP, QSR, GLP, CE, CSA, ISO, etc.)
Passion and commitment to learn and improve to achieve personal and company goals
Work collaboratively with all ACIST team members, including; product development, supply chain, manufacturing, quality, customer support, field services, finance, sales and marketing
Experience in project leadership (including writing and executing project plans) with flexible approach and ability to influence others
Assertive self-starter with excellent organizational, interpersonal, critical thinking, verbal and written communication skills
Use creativity and accepted engineering practices to design, develop, prototype, verify, validate and implement product and process improvements
Familiarity with some manufacturing and secondary processes (i.e. sterilization, PCBAs, electrical circuits, motors, sensors, switches, control systems, molding, machining, extruding, forming, welding, 3D printing, conformal coating, anodizing, passivation, electo-polishing, painting, etc.), test fixtures and assembly operations (design for manufacturability)
Ability to identify required data, collect, consolidate and analyze for assessment, decision making and reporting utilizing problem solving and continuous improvement methodologies (i.e. PDCA, DMAIC, A3, 8D)
Knowledge of how to properly analyze data sets using statistical software (i.e. Minitab, JMP, LabVIEW, etc.)
Understand some statistical methods, problem solving and continuous improvement tools (i.e. regression analysis, ANOVA, reliability, equivalence tests, histograms, pareto charts, trend charts, control charts, process capability, Process Flow Diagrams, Process Maps, Value Stream Maps, RCA {5-why, fish bone diagram, cause mapping}, fault tree analysis, cause and effect matrix, prioritization matrix, FMEA, DOE, MSA, MTTR / MTBF, Poka-Yoke, control plans)
Ability to travel up to 25% (domestic and international)
Proven ability to mentor and develop technical team
Agile / SAP (or similar documentation control / MRP systems)
Experience supporting capital and / or consumable medical device products
Experience working with medical device contract manufacturers
Experience working with different global cultures
Technical project management skills / Project Management Professional (PMP)
Knowledge of how to use test instruments (i.e. multi-meter, oscilloscope, spectrum analyzer, logic analyzer, etc.)
Ability to model in SolidWorks or Altium (or similar)
Preferred:
Proven ability to mentor and develop technical team
Agile / SAP (or similar documentation control / MRP systems)
Experience supporting capital and / or consumable medical device products
Experience working with medical device contract manufacturers
Experience working with different global cultures
Technical project management skills / Project Management Professional (PMP)
Knowledge of how to use test instruments (i.e. multi-meter, oscilloscope, spectrum analyzer, logic analyzer, etc.)
Ability to model in SolidWorks or Altium (or similar)

Required Skills

Required Experience",3.3,"ACIST Medical Systems, Inc.
3.3","Eden Prairie, MN",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
113,"Software Engineer, Machine Learning",-1,"About Alpha Health
We’re on a mission to remedy the financial complexity crippling healthcare in America.

Our aim is to organize and use all healthcare information to reduce the cost of care and improve the patient experience.

As the first Unified Automation company for healthcare, we use the same machine learning approaches that made driverless cars possible to provide health systems with a single solution for revenue cycle management. Alpha Health’s Unified Automation brings together the best of people, data and technology to efficiently, accurately and autonomously navigate the complex state of medical reimbursement in the United States.

We are growing rapidly:
- The contracting process in healthcare typically averages nine months. Yet, in less than 12 months time, the team has landed multiple provider clients of all sizes across the US.
- The team has also deployed at several of these customers, providing meaningful and measurable value within 90 days.

We’ve built a cross-functional skill set deep into the DNA of the company. We have technology experts from the top Silicon Valley technology companies (Google, Facebook, etc) and machine learning PhD programs (Stanford, etc). We also have senior leaders from the frontlines of healthcare with decades of experience leading teams of medical billers at some of the most prominent healthcare institutions in the US. And we have a deep bench of talent from healthcare services firms like the Advisory Board, Optum and Triage Consulting.

Our founding team includes Silicon Valley leaders who have founded or been founding team members of multiple companies with successful exits, including in excess of $350 million.

We are expanding our team to support our work with existing customers as well as new customers. If you love to execute, we’d love to hear from you.

Alpha Health is based in South San Francisco. As a company we embraced remote work opportunities before COVID-19. We consider ourselves experts in working collaboratively wherever our team members happen to reside.

As a Software Engineer on the Machine Learning team, you'll be putting machine learning into practice so your code directly affects our customers immediately. You'll participate in developing state-of-the-art machine learning solutions to address large scale healthcare problems.
What You'll Do
· Write production-ready software with fast and efficient algorithms
· Design and build pipelines that collect, preprocess, and deliver data with a measurable quality
· Work with large proprietary medical and clinical datasets containing both structured documents, natural language and images
Skills & Qualifications
· Bachelor's degree in Computer Science or equivalent (Master's a plus) and/or relevant practical work experience
· 2+ years of work experience as a software engineer in a machine learning environment
· Strong proficiency in one or more programming languages such as Python and C++
· Hands-on development experience with big data technologies such as SQL and AWS/Cloud Platform
· Some knowledge of machine learning frameworks such as Scikit-Learn, Keras, Tensorflow
· Full-stack development experience for an end to end machine learning solution preferred
· Strong communication and interpersonal skills with meticulous attention to detail",5.0,"Alpha Health
5.0","South San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2018,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
114,Machine Learning Research Scientist,$113k-$210k (Glassdoor Est.),"Baidu Silicon Valley AI Lab (SVAIL) is advancing state-of-the-art AI with an emphasis on deep learning, speech, NLP (Natural language processing) and high-performance computing.

Responsibilities:
Conduct cutting edge research in speech and language technologies.
Research and develop novel algorithms and techniques to advance the state of the art in spoken language understanding.
Strengthen the position of Baidu as a leading company in AI research.
Publish peer reviewed articles in top conferences and journals.
Qualifications:
PhD in Computer Science or related field.
Basic knowledge in Information Theory, Digital Signal Processing and Linguistics.
In-depth understanding of deep learning algorithms, especially the Transformer architecture.
Hands-on experience with deep learning frameworks such as TensorFlow, PyTorch and Paddle.
Culture Fit:
Mission alignment: If you want to be part of a team to accomplish this great mission, we will provide you the best possible platform to do that.
Self­-directed: We work best with people that are driven, motivated, and aspire to greatness. Are you the sort of person that, if you had time on your hands, will independently find interesting and useful things to do?
Hungry to learn: We are eager to see you learn new skills and grow. But learning is hard work and this is something we hope you want to do.
Team orientation: We work in small, fast­-moving teams. We don't believe in lone wolves. We watch out for each other and go after big goals together as a team.",4.2,"Baidu USA
4.2","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
115,Manufacturing Engineer Manager,-1,"Manufacturing Engineer Manager (Flowood, MS)
Description: *
As the Manufacturing Engineering Manager, you will supervise manufacturing engineers and draftsmen to create, develop, implement, optimize and maintain routing, tooling/fixture, processes, and labor standards in a CNC machining and sheet metal manufacturing operation.

The Engineering Manager will work with production, quality, maintenance and operations to improve production procedures, to ensure work conforms to customer specifications, and to promote the highest possible degree of profit, assuring all products ship, meeting or exceeding, blueprint specifications, and support manufacturing time-lines for on-time delivery to the customer.

The Manufacturing Engineer Manager should possess a Professional Degree or extensive related experience, and at least 3+ years’ experience. Also:

Strong management skills to supervise activities of a group of professionals and otherwise direct their activities to improve the profitability and success of the company as a whole

Strong and detailed knowledge of various metal manufacturing processes and equipment

Strong ability to organize and write process control documentation

Structured problem-solving skills

ñ Ability to apply Lean Manufacturing techniques

Good working knowledge of Microsoft applications and experience with 2D and 3D CAD software and be able to teach and apply standard drafting practices as such to the company’s standards

Must have excellent communication and interactive skills both verbal and written

Must be experience in Metals cutting and folding
Duties include: *
Conduct economic analysis on new methods and equipment.

Define, propose, and implement capital equipment for process improvement.

Provide facility layout and design recommendations for methods and process flow improvement.

Participate in failure analysis teams and contribute to resulting solutions.

Participate in multidisciplinary teams in all facets of work.

Evaluate, approve and initiate engineering drawings and/or change requests.

Manage a small team of manufacturing engineers and technicians.

Provide guidance and mentoring, plan/coordinate staffing needs and resources as well as ongoing performance management.

Maximize product quality and minimize product liability exposure by utilization of manufacturing technology and quality control.

ñ Provide key inputs and drive DMFA (Design for Manufacturing and Assembly) during design reviews/changes.

Manage and facilitate transition of new product from engineering to production.

Establish objectives, schedules and priorities in Manufacturing Engineering activities, and review staff based on their accomplishments toward these directions.

Establish and meet schedules for the introduction of new methods, new products or cost reductions. Review the engineering change and release activity.

Define, develop, and implement standard operating procedures within the engineering department.
Learn and utilize company

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Metals Cutting Experience and folding: 4 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Language:
English (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Rockett Inc,"Flowood, MS",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Metal & Mineral Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
116,Data Scientist,-1,"About O'Reilly Media

OReillys mission is changing the world by sharing the knowledge of innovators. For the last 40 years, weve been helping people learn new skills, track significant new technologies, and build careers in technology and business. This extends to our employees: we have a long and proud history of encouraging and enabling the people who work here to take advantage of OReillys resources and network to keep learning, take on new challenges, and build careers. OReilly Media has two main offices, in Boston and Sebastopol (San Francisco Bay Area), with a large portion of our employees working remotely.

About your team

Data drives much of what we at OReilly Media do, making the Data Science Team central to how the company operates and continues to grow its influence. We provide business analysis and reporting, build machine learning models, develop prototypes for data-intensive components to the platform, and maintain data systems. We are a distributed team working remotely from home offices, but we place a strong emphasis on teamwork and collaboration: an ideal candidate is one that is both self-motivated and enjoys working with others. Team members are encouraged to learn new skills and technologies as they relate to our mission. We believe work should be fun and friendly, and we hold dear our core belief in maintaining a healthy work-life balance.

About the Job

We have an opening for a Data Scientist who will perform a variety of analyses and data tasks to support core business capabilities such as marketing, sales and product improvements.

Both quantitative and qualitative aspects of analysis are important to this role. The Data Scientists primary responsibilities include pulling, cleaning, transforming and analyzing both internal and external data, as well as performing more advanced modeling and machine learning tasks. Some of our projects are based on requests from other departments, others are driven by larger data science team goals. Often we are asked to look into fairly open-ended problems, which requires a degree of creativity, curiosity and research skill.

Crucial to this role is seeing the bigger picture: not just following the instructions of a JIRA ticket or request, but realizing the implications and actionable potential of an analysis. The Data Scientist must understand what data we have or need to obtain in order to provide significant insights and value to our learning customers and internal organization. This demands creativity and drive to figure out how to get the data, and how to use the data to keep OReilly at the forefront of learning.

The Data Scientist works on problems that are core to the companys mission. Our team is at the forefront of some of the businesss major challenges, for example, understanding and modeling how users progress through content and developing metrics that describe their learning experience. This role has a significant opportunity to positively impact the company through data-driven means.

Most of our analysis is performed in Python and SQL. Our primary data storage systems are based on Postgres, Redshift, MySQL, BigQuery and Google Cloud Storage. The Data Scientist will:
Extract, transform and analyze platform and customer data based on requests from product, sales, marketing and executive teams
Write code to automate processes for routine data reporting requirements
Undertake research to explore more open-ended data problems
Effectively present and communicate research results with coherent visualization and actionable recommendations
Work with product teams on platform features such as user-facing dashboards, personalization, topic organization, search and content discovery
Maintain our backend data ETL processes and automated reporting services
Drive the Data Science Teams impact in the company by taking the initiative with data-driven solutions for company problems
About You

You should have a strong foundation in Python programming for data-related tasks, including experience with data science packages such as numpy and scikit-learn, and strong SQL skills. The level of coding required will go beyond simple scripts and queries: we are always trying to automate the boring stuff with well-designed and efficiently engineered packages of code. Some knowledge of git, unix commands and big data / distributing computing solutions is highly valued.

Key skills and Experience
2+ years in data science / analytics, or equivalent
Excellent Python skills
Strong SQL skills
Personable and able to work with with others in a team
Significant experience combining and transforming data
Experience with wrangling dirty data
Excellent critical thinking skills and the ability to develop creative solutions to challenging problems
Ability to create effective data visualizations
Excellent written, verbal, and presentation skills
Experience with scientific computing and machine learning, especially numpy, scipy and scikit-learn
Experience working with unstructured text data and performing NLP tasks
Comfortable working on a Linux server
Self-motivated and ability to work independently when necessary",3.5,"O'Reilly Media
3.5",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Education Training Services,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
117,Sr. Software Engineer (Python),-1,"SENIOR SOFTWARE ENGINEER - Python/Node.js*
_(Top Secret - TS/SCI Clearance Required!)_
BigBear, Inc.* is an industry-leading provider of big data computing and analytics solutions. We help people make sense of their data using our cloud-based platform and big data processing algorithms. Each day, we crunch massive volumes of structured and unstructured data into usable and actionable information for our customers. We currently have offices in Reston, VA., Charlottesville, VA., and San Diego, CA.
REQUIRED: *
5+ years of professional software development experience (MINIMUM)*
Solid experience with Python/ Django, Node JS, or Flask.
Solid experience with PostgreSQL.
Solid experience in Linux environment.
Solid experience with data modeling, business logic, and RESTful APIs.
Experience with NGINX and SSL.
US Citizenship and TS/SCI US Security Clearance.
BS/MS in Computer Science or related field or equivalent military experience.
BONUS SKILLS: *
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum development process.
Experience with deployment automation in Amazon Web Services.
Experience with Django Framework.
Experience with geospatial toolkits including GDAL and PostGIS
Experience with high volume data flow.
Solid experience with Amazon Web Services (EC2, S3, SQS, RDS).
TECHNOLOGY WE USE: *
• ElasticSearch
• PostgreSQL
• Python - Django
• Java
• AWS
• Docker
• Git
• Angular, React
• Jenkins
Our Company: *
BigBear, Inc.* is a software development company with locations in San Diego, Washington DC, Charlottesville, and Reston, VA. Our mission is to enable big data computing and analytics for our customers at a low cost. We leverage capabilities such as machine learning, crowdsourcing, geospatial image processing, and Extract-Transform-Load (ETL) data processing using our on-premise cloud computing technology stack. Our solutions provide a unique offering of products, custom-built software, and services focused within Big Data Analytics, Geospatial Information Systems (GIS), Visualization and Cloud Computing to our Department of Defense, and Commercial customers. We currently have exciting and challenging career opportunities for talented, motivated individuals who want to be part of a fast-growing company.
Our Team: *
We like to play with new toys and technologies. We like to break things to see if we can put them back together again in a better way. Our tails wag when we hear the words Big Data, Geospatial or Machine Learning. Each team member provides a unique set of advanced technical skills and trade that contributes to our overall success.
Perks/Benefits: *
· 100% employer-paid for Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance (PPO)
· A competitive salary based on experience
· Flexible Spending Account (FSA) - optional
· 401(k) with dollar-for-dollar match up to 6%
· A warm, cozy office with actual chairs and tables
· Life and Disability Insurance 100% paid for by the company
· Education Assistance
· 529 College Savings Plan - optional
· Healthy Rewards Program
· Pre-paid Legal & Identity Theft Protection - optional
· Gym Reimbursement
· Pet Insurance - optional
· A shiny magical machine that does wonderful things
· Flexible Hours
· Unlimited Coffee, Drinks and Snacks
· 6 WEEKS of Paid Time Off (PTO) on top of 11 Paid Holidays!
BigBear is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled *
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $110,000.00 - $145,000.00 per year

Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Washington, DC 20032 (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Retirement plan
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Schedule::
Monday to Friday",4.4,"BigBear, Inc.
4.4","Washington, DC",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
118,DevOps Engineer,$61k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Echo we are committed to help our Associates grow their career. Apply today and grow with Echo!
-
Echo Global Logistics is a leading provider of technology-enabled transportation management services. As a third-party logistics provider, we simplify transportation management for our clients and carriers, handling crucial tasks so they can focus on what they do best. From coast to coast, dock to dock, and across all major transportation modes, Echo connects businesses that need to ship their products with carriers who transport goods quickly, securely, and cost-effectively.

Echo Global Logistics was recently ranked in 2020 by Crain's Business as a Top 25 Tech Company in Chicago and we are continuing to see increased growth in virtually all of our technical teams. We look forward to continued success with you as part of our team!

Position Overview:

As a DevOps Engineer, you will work closely with Echo’s Infrastructure teams to ensure smooth delivery and maintenance of developed applications into production. This role will assist and guide the Operations teams to learn and adopt continuous delivery practices and efficient use of tools to accomplish their goals. As technical problems arise, you will partner with Operations team to find solutions. Additionally this role will work with the Operations Engineers to refine and improve the tools that and procedures that Echo Global Logistics uses to improve operational excellence across all of IT.

Responsibilities:
Be the ambassador of build and deployment automation by helping development teams learn to get things done more efficiently. Use tools like Jenkins and Chef to as you show them the way.
Keep us running like a well-oiled machine by automating labor-intensive processes.
Shape the future of IT by defining the tools and best practices that our teams will adopt.
Be the hero we need by pitching in to troubleshoot problems and help with maintenance tasks that we haven’t automated yet.
Reduce complexity of configuration management so our infrastructure teams can recover fast from outages.
Use your scripting-ninja powers for good as you break down barriers for our teams.
Turbocharge our applications through performance testing and tuning, from source code to circuits.
Create server templates that have been approved by the Server and Security teams

Position Requirements

Required

Undergraduate Degree in Computer Science or related technical discipline or equivalent experience
2+ years of experience with scripting languages such as PowerShell, Ruby, Python, Bash, or similar
Excellent oral and written communication skills, including writing technical documentation
Basic knowledge of IP networking, VPN's, DNS, load balancing, firewalls, etc.

Beneficial Experience

Build, deployment, and orchestration technologies (such as SCCM, terraform, Kubernetes, Puppet, Chef, Salt, Ansible, Jenkins, Azure DevOps, Artifactory, Vagrant)
Open source middleware services (such as RabbitMQ, Kafka, Redis, Elasticsearch, Consul)
Understanding of object-oriented programming techniques (with .NET, Java, Ruby, or a similar language) throughout the software development lifecycle; including unit testing, debugging, compilation, integration, and deployment
Virtualization platforms such as Microsoft Hyper-V or VMWare ESXi
Experienced with administrative tasks on Windows Server and Linux

What we offer:

Competitive compensation package
Medical, Dental, Vision, Disability, Life Insurance, and 401K
Advancement Potential
Fun and energetic work environment
Volunteer opportunities

Work environment/physical demands summary:

This job operates in an office environment and uses a computer, telephone and other

office equipment as needed to perform duties. The noise level in the work environment is typical of

that of an office with an open seating floor plan. The employee may encounter frequent interruptions throughout the work day. The employee is regularly required to sit, talk, or hear.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, status as a qualified individual with a disability, or Vietnam era or other protected veteran.",3.6,"Echo Global Logistics
3.6","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2005,Company - Public,Transportation Management,Transportation & Logistics,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
119,Perception Engineer for Marine Autonomy,-1,"Sea Machines is a fast-growing startup specializing in autonomous technology for marine vessels. We’re passionate about applying practical A.I. to the massive global ocean transportation market. Our products provide ships and workboats the intelligence to work remotely and give maritime operators the tools to effectively communicate with them. Based in Boston and operating globally, the company is crewed by an experienced team of mariners, engineers, coders, and autonomy scientists. Our culture is dynamic, collaborative and biased towards execution.

Sea Machines is venture-funded, and we’ve introduced our first product, the Sea Machines 300. We’re located on the East Boston waterfront in historic Jeffries Point, with quick access to the T and water taxis.

We are seeking a Perception Engineer with deep learning and computer vision experience to actively push the next stage of perception R&D at Sea Machines which tackles the exciting challenges of moving the world’s fleets to the era of autonomous operations. This role will focus on developing state-of-art algorithms deployed on marine vessels to perform real time performance in conjunction with the existing perception team. A focus will be on object recognition, distance estimation, semantic segmentation, and sensor fusion from large scale data sets with multi-sensor data (AIS, Radar, LiDAR, visible cameras, thermal cameras, etc.).
Responsibilities*
Design, development and integration of high-quality perception technology related to machine learning, deep learning, computer vision and image processing
Develop state of art technology related to object classification, object recognition, distance estimation and semantic segmentation on SMR vessels
Perform machine learning and use image processing technology to analyze, cluster, clean real-world data as the preparation for further development
Explore and select state-of-art deep learning, machine learning framework to conduct training on real-world data
Deploy high quality algorithms/code/models on SMR vessels and customer vessels for better performance
Analyze real world data and perform performance evaluation of delivered technology
Maintain software documentation and assist in the development of user documentation
Participate as a multi-disciplinary engineering team member including team meetings, stand-ups & quality reviews in a mostly remote environment.
Work cross-functionally with technical teams deploying high quality perception system to support prototyping and product development.
Requirements and Skills*
Must be U.S. Citizen or Green card holder
Degrees in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, or related fields.
2+ years' experience in deep learning-based computer vision topics, related to detection, classification, tracking, recognition, segmentation.
Hands-on experience with developing, training, benchmarking and deploying deep learning models in real world data.
Experience in deploying deep learning models on real-world data in TensorFlow, Keras, or PyTorch
Familiar with Git, Python, Scikit-learn, Linux, Jupyter Notebook
Excellent analytical and program solving skills, excellent written and oral communication, self-starter and highly motivated.
Experience collaborating with other functional teams to seamlessly integrate software and hardware
Bonus*
Professional C++ programing and software design skills including debugging, performance analysis and test design.
Experience with large scale data collection, data cleaning, data analysis and regression test.
Publication record in top-tier computer vision or machine learning conferences
Understanding and appreciation of hardened industrial systems
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.1,"Sea Machines Robotics Inc.
4.1","Boston, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Shipping,Transportation & Logistics,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
120,ENGINEER - RESEARCH ENGINEER - EMBEDDED HARDWARE DEVELOPMENT,$57k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:


Join our Defense and Intelligence Solutions Division’s Ohio office to contribute to the embedded hardware development teams involved in developing requirements, designing, implementing, testing, and documenting embedded hardware applications focusing primarily in C/C++. Perform embedded design, development, prototyping, integration, and testing against customer requirements. Perform embedded design, development, coding, integration, testing, research, programming and documentation for systems, applications and/or Real-Time Operating Systems in conjunction with hardware design team; develop designs using UML Object Oriented design techniques. Develop technical documentation and reports based on investigations. Perform laboratory, field tests, and troubleshooting. Interact directly with technical customer to more fully understand requirements and constraints of the task objectives.


Education/Experience:


Requires a BS degree in Computer Engineering or Electrical Engineering with 0-5 years of experience. Must have at least a 3.0 GPA. 1 year of experience in C/C++ as well as testing for embedded hardware (FPGAs), experience in software, electronics and testing is preferred. Embedded firmware design, development, and/or test experience is strongly desired. Familiarity with configuration management tools such as AccuRev. Familiarity with Model Based System Engineering design using Enterprise Architecture preferred. Requires excellent interpersonal skills. Experience in hardware development is desirable. A valid/clear driver's license is required.


Special Requirements:


Work assignment is in Dayton, Ohio. Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: Dayton, Ohio


For more information about this division, visit the Defense & Intelligence Solutions home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.1,"Southwest Research Institute
4.1","Dayton, OH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
121,Data Scientist,$101k-$165k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is currently seeking multiple TS/SCI Data Scientists to fill immediate openings located in Springfield, VA. The selected candidate should have extensive experience in a relative field such as quantitative methods, statistics, or analytic methodologies. The selected candidates may be required to deploy forward up to 10% of the time into operational areas or other remote sites.

Responsibilities:
Responsible to support quantitative and qualitative integrated assessments of research questions across entire projects to assess the uncertainties (uncertainty includes work scope gaps, normal estimating, variability/error, and risk events) associated with integrated baseline activities and assists in the implementation of the risk mitigation actions
Qualitative simulations may be performed to forecast an accurate and realistic project schedule to anticipate potential areas of high risk and uncertainty
Perform advanced risk analysis across all government requirements, organizational missions, and activities
Explores data sets and verifies data quality to gain an understanding of relevant data, then identifies differences in data distribution that could affect performance when deploying the machine learning model in an operational environment
Identify data sets of machine learning tests and use cases
Develops and tunes machine learning model's hyper parameters
Basic Qualifications:
Function independently and can present/defend/communicate the results and ideas to key decision makers
Proficient with deep learning frameworks, and extensive experience with programming languages such as Python, R, MS SQL, MySQL, NoSQL, MongoDB, Tableau, Hadoop, Spark, and basic libraries (such as scikit-learn and pandas)
Experience in visualizing and manipulating big data sets, including leaflet, plotly, D3, and ggplot
Familiar with Linux / Red Hat platforms, and proficient with OpenCV
Demonstrated background in data mining and statistical analysis
Excellent pattern recognition and predictive modeling skills
Desired Skills:
Streaming device metadata understanding: Understand how to log and capture streaming device metadata
Modeling familiarity: Ability to understand how to optimize datasets for use in computational models
Network & Transport understanding: Should have an awareness of network architecture and ensuring low-latency database hookups and calls
Graph Indexing: Ability to develop logical connections between disparate data via indexing in an efficient manner, and building/understanding graph algorithms to maximize value of retained data
AWS familiarity: Ability to use and manage AWS instances as well as coding lambda functions (etc) to minimize expenditure while maximizing throughput
Security Clearance Requirements:
Active TS/SCI security clearance required
Willing to undergo polygraph examination
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","Springfield, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
122,Cloud Engineer,-1,"Cloud Engineer

Department: Information Systems

Location: Chicago, IL

Travel Requirements: N/A

Job ID: 322

LIFE AT NFA
NFA is committed to creating an exceptional work environment. Learn from staff how NFA fosters a culture of diversity, ongoing learning and development, and work-life balance.

APPLY NOW

Description: The Cloud Engineer is responsible for administering the design and configuration of Cloud based core services, such as Azure, Office 365 (Exchange, SharePoint, OneDrive, Teams, AzureAD) and Device Management. Additionally, the Cloud Engineer works closely with NFA leadership to understand business requirements, identify priorities and develop roadmap and implementation plans for cloud-based solutions.

Duties/Responsibilities:
Work closely with NFA's Security staff and other stakeholders to improve the security posture of the environment and secure data while adhering to security- and compliance-related processes and procedures.
Develop and improve solution standards and ensure standards are being met.
Provision and monitor the use of Cloud resources.
Establish business relationships to maximize use of collaboration solutions.
Keep up to date on new industry standards, research the latest technologies on the market and otherwise act as a technical subject matter expert.
Provide expertise and advice to teams tasked with building solutions on cloud platforms, including design, planning, management and maintenance.
Develop, implement, monitor and audit required back-up and recovery procedures to ensure requirements are being met.
Engage in capacity planning to implement, administer and troubleshoot Cloud solutions and tools.
Develop, implement and monitor machine learning and data science infrastructure.
Deliver training and technical support as needed.
Requirements:
Five or more years working experience in a virtualized, Cloud environment
Knowledge of CIS Benchmarks and Information Security Standards
Industry-recognized certification, such as Microsoft Azure Administrator
Accredited degree, such as a Bachelor's degree in information systems or computer science, preferred
Experience installing, customizing and maintaining Cloud based technologies
Experience and fluency with key networking elements (e.g. firewalls, VPNs, proxy servers, email systems, hypervisors, disaster recovery/business continuity practices and problem resolution tools)
Comprehensive understanding of network infrastructure/designs and performance/tuning strategies
Experience in project planning and management
Willingness to work off-hours",4.3,"National Futures Association
4.3","Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1982,Nonprofit Organization,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
123,Data Scientist II,$74k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Blucora has a bold aspiration: we are committed to giving all people the tools needed to lead healthy financial lives - tools often reserved for the wealthy.

We now turn to the next leg, developing the technological tools that make our vision of financial health for all a reality. Atypical for the financial services industry, we take a contemporary approach to strategy and product development that is founded in user insights, rapid testing and a singular focus on driving end-user value.

Since charting new territory on a daily basis is part of everyone's job at Blucora, we've attracted team members who thrive on the challenge, encourage each other, and are passionately committed to the goal. If you agree that problem- solving is a team sport, and feel energized by a good debate, deep dive research, or a fun night out with colleagues, we might be the right firm for you!
Position Summary

The Data Scientist II is responsible for providing data, analysis, statistical modeling, and machine learning capabilities to inform key business initiatives. This role will deliver models to optimize marketing spend, create personalized engagement, and drive customer retention across both our tax preparation and wealth management businesses.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

The major responsibilities of the position are listed below. To perform the job successfully, the individual must be able to execute each essential duty satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
The major responsibilities of the position are listed below. To perform the job successfully, the individual must be able to execute each essential duty satisfactorily. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Deliver statistical models to drive organizational insights and actions.
Partner closely with the business including the Marketing and Product teams to understand and optimize the customer journey.
Perform end to end statistical modeling with a high level of accuracy.
Assembling and cleaning of data for modeling purposes.
Write and interpret complex SQL queries.
Model selection, build, and testing.
Engage with the broader Data Science organization to support, refine, and test large scale data science projects.
Ability to deploy visualization techniques to deliver insights to end-user.
Summarize and report key analytical findings and recommendations in both oral and written forms to various technical and non-technical teams.
Other job duties as defined.
Education & Experience
Bachelor or Master’s degree in a quantitative discipline (e.g. statistics, physics, engineering).
Minimum of 3 years of hands-on experience in the analysis and modeling of large complex datasets.
Fluency in SQL and experience with Big Data.
Expertise in a programming language (Python, R, SQL) for statistical analysis.
Expertise with statistical modeling techniques such as regression, classification, hypothesis testing, and unsupervised learning.
Hands-on experience with optimization, data mining, or machine learning.
Strong Excel and data visualization skills.
The ability not just to retrieve and present data, but to draw conclusions and make recommendations.
Experience working for a technology or internet company.
Comprehensive Benefits



We offer a competitive salary, outstanding benefits package that includes medical, dental, vision, life insurance, paid vacation and sick days, paid holidays, tuition reimbursement, and 401(k) with company match. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to their race, color, religion, national origin, sex, or disability.

#Blucora

At Blucora, we believe our work benefits from the diverse perspectives of our employees. As such, Blucora welcomes and celebrates diversity and inclusion and is committed to equal opportunity employment. At Blucora, you can expect a supportive, open and inclusive atmosphere and a team that values your contributions.

Blucora, Inc. and its subsidiaries, Avantax Wealth Management, HK Financial Services, and TaxAct are committed to providing an environment of mutual respect where equal employment opportunities are available to all applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, physical and mental disability, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and any other status protected under federal or state law. Blucora, considers information gathered in the hiring process, including information on this application, confidential, and only shares it on a need-to know basis or as required by law. If you need assistance or an accommodation due to a disability, you may contact us at HR@Blucora.com or by calling 972-870-6000 to speak with a member of the HR Talent Acquisition team.",3.3,"Blucora
3.3","Dallas, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1996,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
124,Senior Software Engineer,$61k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"GeneDx is a rapidly growing CAP and CLIA certified diagnostic genetic testing laboratory for molecular genetics. Our historic mission has been to make clinical diagnostic testing available for people with genetic conditions and their families. We apply cutting edge technologies that provide a wide array of molecular genetic diagnostic tests, including whole exome sequencing and next-generation sequencing panels. We specialize in genetic testing for rare hereditary disorders, but also test for common disorders. To learn more about GeneDx, please visit our website at www.genedx.com.

Role: Sr. Software Engineer

Essential Duties include:

Creates analytic solutions for clinical genetic data, including NGS, WES, and WGS sequence data; copy-number and structural variant detection; genotype-phenotype correlation
Conducts projects in support of R&D and clinical production.

Qualifications include:

MS or PhD degree in Bioinformatics or a related field
5+ years bioinformatics development experience
Proficiency in a major scripting language (Perl, Ruby, or Python)
Basic knowledge of statistics (machine learning, data mining, hypothesis testing) and R
Working knowledge of relational databases (PostgreSQL, MySQL, or similar)
Working knowledge of command-line Linux, shell scripting, and grid computing (SLURM, SGE, LSF, or similar)
Experience with Git, SVN or other version control software preferred
Experience developing software in a team environment preferred
Software testing and validation experience preferred
Experience with NGS data and related tools (Samtools, GATK, etc.) and other genetic assay data (e.g. aCGH)

Benefits include:

Paid Time Off (PTO)
Health, dental, vision, life insurance, LT/ST disability plans
Flexible Spending Account (FSA)
Health Savings Account (HSA)
401K retirement savings plan with company match
Employee Discounts
Regular performance appraisals
Many promotions from within
Business casual dress code",2.8,"GeneDx
2.8","Gaithersburg, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
125,COMPUTER SCIENTIST - ENGINEER - DECISION TECHNOLOGIES,$43k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:


Join a team that develops creative solutions for a variety of commercial and military applications across the human performance domain; physical, cognitive, and social. Interface with technical clients and colleagues to understand requirements and constraints of the task objectives on a frequent basis. Work in various phases of the system lifecycle, including applied research, requirements generation, design, implementation, testing, integration, installation, and documentation. Apply aspects of systems engineering, an understanding of biomechanical and physiological systems, and the nature and limitations of hardware and software to ensure that the underlying systems work properly. Additional information about the type of work can be found at: https://hpi.swri.org.


Education/Experience:


Requires a BS degree in Software Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Mechanical Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Computer Engineering, Computer Science or closely related disciplines with 0-2 years of experience. Must have at least a 3.25 GPA. Must have coursework or experience in more than one of the following: image and video processing, network and routing protocols, and machine learning or neural networks. Strong software skills are required. Experience in C++, C#, and/or Python is preferred. Experience with Linux, real-time operating systems, user interface design, and/or multithreaded programming is a plus. Excellent verbal and written communication skills are required. Must be able to work in project team environments and independently. Must have excellent problem-solving skills, be self-motivated, and be driven by challenging problems. Must have good organizational skills and attention to detail with an aptitude for continuous learning and leadership potential. A valid/clear driver's license is required.


Special Requirements:


Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Intelligent Systems home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.1,"Southwest Research Institute
4.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
126,Senior Research Statistician- Data Scientist,$99k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Acuity is seeking a Senior Research Statistician- Data Scientist to use statistical knowledge and research skills to solve business problems. The Research Statistician will develop, implement, and interpret statistical models with a strong emphasis on data mining and statistical/predictive modeling. Provides work direction.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Identifies and acquires additional data sources, both internal and external, that can be used to enhance analyses.
Lead the development of analytical models to drive superior business outcomes.
Develop in-depth understanding of drivers for optimization by utilizing statistics and data mining techniques.
Using latest PC tools, develop, enhance and monitor reports and models for other business areas.
Evaluate and use Data Mining Tools.
Support, train, encourage, consult other areas in the company and provide actionable information to management.
Continually monitor database information and future needs.
Explore and acquire data from outside sources.
Use database tools to support other departments
Regular and predictable attendance.
Perform other duties as assigned.
EDUCATION:
Masters/PhD in Statistics, Mathematics, Economics, Operations Research or Computer Science
EXPERIENCE:
5 years P&C insurance, modelling and project leader experience. Programming skills including SAS and R.
OTHER QUALIFICATIONS:
Strong interpersonal, quantitative, problem-solving, computer and conceptual skills.
Aptitude in predictive modeling, multivariate analysis, statistical modeling, data mining techniques and mathematical statistics.
Ability to apply strong programming and data management skills.
Knowledge of and experience with at least one major computer programming language or advanced syntax in a major statistical package.
This job is classified as exempt.",4.9,"Acuity Insurance
4.9","Sheboygan, WI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1925,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
127,Senior Data Scientist,$89k-$149k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Senior Data Scientist independently develops statistical models that will enable future growth and profitability for our book of business through appropriate pricing and underwriting of risk. He/she is responsible for the formulation of statistical models and direct application of models to address insurance business issues. You will start your Senior Data Scientist role at home and then transition to working in our Woodbridge, NJ office when it reopens.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Produces complex predictive models which enable the creation of rating plans and evaluation of risk and profitability.
Develops studies that evaluate new business models for customer retention and growth initiatives as well as estimate the lifetime value of customer segments.
Identifies drivers of insurance costs, understanding the economics of customers’ behavior and estimating the expected losses for segments of risks using advanced statistical and analytical techniques on large data sets.
Develop or participate in the development of the overall analytical framework to support the company’s strategy for growth
Communicates analysis, strategy and recommendations to diverse audiences, including technical and non-technical.
Collaborates with upper management to assess the potential effects of proposed solutions and incorporates these considerations into recommendations.
Manages projects of high complexity.
Perform other job-related duties as assigned.
Advanced skills and training in predictive modeling, data mining and other quantitative and research analytics (Non-Linear Regression Analysis, Multivariate Analysis, Bayesian Methods, Generalized Linear Models, Decision Trees, Non Parametric estimations, etc.).
Ability to apply various predictive modeling techniques to develop solutions to various real-world problems.
Hands-on experience developing and delivering structured, methodology projects.
Exceptional programming ability in SAS, SQL, R or other programming languages.
Excellent written and oral communication and presentation skills.
In-depth understanding of database principles and experience working with large databases.
Ability to influence and guide across departmental boundaries.
Qualifications and Education
3 or more years of experience developing and implementing multivariate predictive models using GLM and other statistical methods. PhD in economics, statistics, or related field required.
Or in the alternative, a Master’s degree in Statistics, Engineering, Mathematics, Economics, or a related field (foreign educational equivalent accepted) and five (5) years of experience as indicated above.
High level of organizational and project management experience handling multiple projects simultaneously
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.6,"Plymouth Rock Assurance
3.6","Woodbridge, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
128,Digital Signal Processing Engineer,-1,"Digital Signal Processing Engineer

Due to security requirements, all positions require US Citizenship and the ability to obtain and maintain a US Government Security Clearance of Top Secret or higher.

At Expedition Technology, we push the boundaries of what is possible every day. Our engineers excel in tackling traditional signal processing problems and creating novel solutions using machine learning/deep learning algorithms. We are one of a very few companies that has been successful in employing deep learning to traditional signal processing. Our collaborative culture is conducive to researching and developing the cutting-edge solutions our DOD and IC customers seek.

We are currently seeking like-minded engineers and developers to join our growing team. A successful candidate will have the privilege of driving research and development activities to enable automated machine learning techniques to detect, demodulate and exploit signals in complicated environments. Emphasis includes software defined radio design and development, spectrum analysis and channelization, adaptive beamforming, channel equalization, waveform analysis, signal coding and decoding.

Position Requirements:
Experience and understanding of Detection & Estimation Theory
In depth understanding of spectral estimation, digital communication theory and/or information theory (need not have all three)
Prior experience with adaptive filtering and interference mitigation in challenging environments
Interest in extending state-of-the-art machine learning and deep learning research to traditional signal processing problems
Experience with some or all of the following: C, C++, Python, MatLab (Python preferred)
Bachelors degree or higher in Electrical Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Computer Engineering, Mechanical Engineering or similar
Candidates holding active US Government clearances are highly desired- must at least be eligible to obtain a TS/SCI or higher
US Citizenship is required
Interested in joining our team? Lets explore together!

Expedition Technology is an IBA company that offers self-directed, company-paid, comprehensive medical, dental and vision insurance, PTO, 401k with up to 12% company match, equity shares (SARs), student loan repayment options and a generous tuition reimbursement program. Most importantly, we offer an environment where we are encouraged to push boundaries, take risks and enjoy the rewards.

EXP is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer that believes a diverse range of talent creates an environment that fuels creativity and innovation. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, national origin, genetic information or protected veteran status.

Powered by JazzHR",5.0,"Expedition Technology, Inc.
5.0","Herndon, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
129,DevOps Engineer,$52k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you interested in a career opportunity with a growing software company? P2 Energy Solutions is dedicated to providing a positive culture where the ability to learn, collaborate, and make a difference is rewarded. We have a fast-paced, innovative culture where employees are empowered to provide a superior experience for internal and external customers.
Upstream oil and gas professionals who are focused on solving tough challenges rely on P2 software, data and analytics solutions to optimize their business performance. We are currently developing our solutions on mobile and in the cloud! More than 1,600 companies from around the world use P2 solutions every day to manage their land assets, measure and process financial information, optimize production, and manage their reserves. With more than 80 years of experience in data and 30 years in software, P2 has offices around the world, and employs approximately 600 people.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Participate in the development and support of new automated environment infrastructure, tools, and processes under the oversight of a more senior engineer.
Implement frameworks for automated deployment using selected toolsets under the oversight of a more senior engineer.
Provide effective communication of deployment environments, system and infrastructure status.
Qualifications Include:
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, or related discipline.
Minimum of 2 years of relevant work experience in Development Operations Engineering, Network Virtualization or Systems Engineering.
Working experience an agile team environment.
Experience working in an Agile team environment.
Experience in analyzing/identifying environment and deployment requirements.
Experience/demonstrates ability to clearly and accurately communicate with technical and non-technical personnel both written and verbally.
Experience in the creation and execution of effective scripts.
Experience in identifying, isolating and resolving machine and networking issues.
Experience in provisioning and administering virtual machines and operating systems.
Experience in following installation guides and installing software packages/prerequisites.
Demonstrates an understanding of concepts of software development and tools used to implement these concepts.
Preferred Tools:
Visual Studio Team Services (general, Build, TFVC, GIT and Release Management)
Powershell, Bash, Ansible
Azure/AWS Console
Windows, Linux, Oracle, SQL Server, IIS, VMWare, PostgreSQL

Always be learning.
When in doubt, talk it out.
Show up and follow up.
Create positive
Think beyond…
Please note: Assessment testing may be required for this position.
We offer a casual work environment, comprehensive benefits plan, generous PTO, and a competitive compensation structure. We have a positive culture designed around the philosophy of mutual respect and the challenge of contributing to the continued success of our organization. P2 is dedicated to individual and corporate growth opportunities, and we would love to talk to you further!
P2 Energy Solutions and its affiliated companies is an Equal Employment Opportunity employer. We also participate in the E-Verify program, a service of DHS and SSA.",3.4,"P2 Energy Solutions
3.4","Houston, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
130,FCC Data Scientist,$73k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary: The FCC Analytics group is responsible for the development and management of the BSA/AML, Fraud and Quality Control analytics functions. The group tunes the financial crimes models dedicated to the detection of suspicious activity and fraudulent transactions as well as those designed to risk rate customers and screen against OFAC designated lists. Additionally, the group manages application related implementations, maintenance and enhancements and the development of reporting and visual analytics used for investigations, KPI tracking, quarterly reporting and annual risk assessments.

The primary purpose of this position is to assist with the management of the Fraud and BSA/AML models related to transaction monitoring, customer risk rating, OFAC fuzzy logic filtering, and transactional fraud mitigation strategies. The individual that fulfills this position must understand the general dynamics of model risk management as set forth by OCC guidelines. Furthermore, the candidate must also have experience with SQL, quantitative stat based analytics (such as standard deviation, percentile distributions, k-means, clustering, etc.), model forecasting and reporting analytics (including visual and flowchart modeling) amongst other skill sets around management of information systems. Requires basic commercial awareness.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES: While other duties and special projects may be assigned, the primary duties and responsibilities include the following:
Conduct assessments of models and provide reports detailing the current state of data feeds, rule output at current settings, and alert outputs at alternative settings.
Utilize Oracle SQL to the extent of simulating model output.
Identify potential logic deficiencies in model outputs through cross validation of external analyses
Assist with the identification, evaluation, and development of controls to mitigate FCC risk and operational impacts.
Research, develop, prototype and test new models and their related inputs.
Assist with annual FCC model tuning and optimization efforts in line with regulatory expectations to meet false-positive and detection rate criteria; performs quantitative analysis on the alert output of each tuning cycle (able to prepare reports detailing forecast results).
Perform model management reviews for the ongoing assessment of model suitability against emerging risk.
Assist with data integrity and validation testing on FCC projects including software implementations, operational enhancements related to efficiency gains, and other special projects as needed including the coordination of software updates in collaboration with the Bank's IT Department and or Project Management Office.
Support manager with resolving of open issues and/or defects involving applications used by the FCC Department including the identification of issues, tracking, escalation, testing, and resolution.
Maintain business definitions in the form of a data dictionary for all department managed models.
Prepare reports in a manner that is clear and comprehensible to FCC supervisors/managers, internal auditors and regulatory examiners.
Communicate production issues with key stakeholders such as business lines, FCC management team, and the IT Department.
Create documentation and provide technical training to business users as needed (this includes training post model tuning deployments and on new enhancements).
If necessary, effectively communicate with the business lines in order to obtain the necessary information and documentation to complete model improvements.
Handle a large workload with the ability to complete the tasks correctly and efficiently within the designated timeframes exercising discretion in setting priorities.
Communicate effectively to different audiences, including both business and technical parties.
Possess a general understanding of banking with respect to BSA/AML and Fraud risks.
Perform any other assignments as directed by manager.
EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Management Information Systems or related field.
At least 3 years working with data modeling, software implementation, enhanced reporting analytics or related experience preferably with a financial institution.
Advanced experience with data mining/analytical tools such as R and Python
Strong knowledge of Structured Query Language (SQL), Oracle programming language, data mining techniques, and Business Intelligence Tools
Strong database skills, including working with advanced data sets, pivot tables, advanced database and statistical functions and methods
Experience visualizing data using tools such as Tableau
Experience with developing and implementing Fraud and BSA/AML risk strategies in decision engines, detection tools and onboarding platforms.",3.0,"BankUnited
3.0","Miami Lakes, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
131,Sr. Data Scientist,$71k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Medifast is seeking a full-time Senior Data Scientist to join our team.
The Senior Data Scientist will be responsible for anticipating future business needs, solving real-time business questions, and identifying new applications for complex analysis.
The candidate focus will be using Machine Learning for the following use cases at Medifast:
Demand Forecasting, Recommendation Engines, Sentiments Analysis, Survival Analysis, Natural Language Processing, AB Testing, and Customer Segmentation (Unsupervised Learning).

Employ machine learning and statistical modeling to generate new features to feed into our data core. Key Models include: Demand Forecasting, Recommendation Engines, Sentiments Analysis, Survival Analysis, and Customer Segmentation
Use storytelling to bring out the insights derived from machine learning and statistical modeling making the complex easy to follow and digestible
Perform automated market analyses to dynamically react to changing market conditions
Discover new predictive insights in our datasets and design measures that compute new predictive models while using data visualization methodology
Assist the Insights Center Manager in using Data Science to enhance the Insights Roadmap and assist in the selection of Data Science products to help enable and maintain the Data Science stack
Create measures that monitor inputs and performance on a real-time basis to inform the insights council when unexpected changes arise.
Be active in communications with business users and data management resources to collaborate through a project lifecycle as data changes occur
Aid and train end super users to effectively use the Data Science platform
Coordinate with offshore technical resources

PHD degree or equivalent preferred in Applied Statistics, Mathematics or a related data field
5-8 years related experience
Executing solutions to business problems using advanced statistics, testing methods, data analysis, data mining, predictive modeling, optimization, and machine learning techniques;
Design and run end-to-end experiments with statistical rigor for test and learn, apply appropriate sampling methods and probabilistic simulations to hypothesis testing and parameter estimation including bootstrapping
Perform data exploration and visualization (using Tableau and other visualization tools), apply machine learning and statistical inference to seed hypotheses, identify opportunities, define metrics, provide interpretability to multi-dimensional scoring, regressor and classifier models, and decision tree learning, using novel methods;
Employ statistical programming through, Python, R, Dataiku, and toolkits (Scikit-learn, Pandas, Numpy, Scipy, PySpark, Jupyter Notebook and kernel, Macro) across disparate environments including Linux/Unix command line and shell scripting, virtual and clouds
Execute and automate data preprocessing via relational systems (AWS, Redshift, SQL Server, MySQL, Postgre, and, Oracle), and parallel computing for big data, using analytics engine and cluster computing frameworks: Apache Spark and Hadoop MapReduce, Apache Tez, and Yarn.
#LI-JP1",3.0,"Medifast, Inc.
3.0","Baltimore, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1980,Company - Public,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
132,Senior Software Engineer - Machine Learning,$100k-$173k (Glassdoor Est.),"What will you do?

At realtor.com, we process terabytes of data every day, and transform that data into information that powers decisions for millions of home buyers, renters, dreamers, and real estate professionals. We aim to radically simplify home buying/selling and help more people achieve the American dream on our realtor.com website and mobile apps. You'll engage with some of the best and the brightest co-workers and leaders, learn and contribute, and have a great time. We work hard, play hard, and recognize achievement rewarding passion for innovation, creativity, and quality. If you enjoy working in a fast-paced, dynamic, cutting-edge work environment and desire to make a meaningful contribution to the business, then make the move!

Responsibilities:
Collaborate closely with data scientists, product managers and other cross-functional teams.
Build end-points, pipelines and supporting infrastructure to productionize Machine Learning models.
ML Ops (monitor inference performance, scalability, availability etc).
Take on complex problems, learn quickly, iterate, and persist towards good scalable, production grade solutions.
Help recruit, mentor and support growth of engineers within the team
Work collaboratively in an Agile/Scrum team to plan and execute at high velocity, and across teams throughout the organization to reuse existing components and architect shared functionality
Take ownership and responsibility for team practices and processes and their continuous improvement.
What will you bring?
Requirements:
Degree preferred in engineering or computer science.
BS and 5+ years/MS and 3+ years of working on complex, scalable backend systems.
2+ years of industry experience deploying Machine Learning models to production at scale.
Proficient in Python, Node.js and / or Java.
Experience working with public cloud stack preferably in AWS.
Experience with AWS stack - at least a few of the following - S3, Athena, EC2, ECS, Lambda, SageMaker, SQS, SNS, Kinesis, MongoDB, and DynamoDB
Exposure to Docker and Containerization
Knowledgeable of core CS concepts such as: structured and unstructured data, data management and querying, common data structures and algorithms
Strong communication, analytical, and people skills
Preferred Requirements:
Prior experience of working with Data Scientists and Machine Learning projects
Familiarity with Machine Learning processes is a plus
Experience with GraphQL, API Gateway, Microservices is a plus
Experience with ML platforms is a plus
About realtor.com

At realtor.com®, we believe that everyone deserves a home of their own. We're a community of nearly 2,000 employees that work hard to ensure that from the moment someone starts dreaming about a new home, to the moment they walk in the door and beyond, we're there to lend a helping hand. Every month, 70 million people trust us with their journey home by visiting our site and mobile apps, and we'd love to have you join our team to help.

We've got great offices across Canada and the US and lots of sweet jobs to choose from, so we're hoping you'll join us on our journey to make home buying and selling easier, and more rewarding for everyone.

Let's make a difference, together. For Real.

#LI-IH1",2.9,"realtor.com
2.9","Santa Clara, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
133,Data Engineer,$59k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Description

This role is for experienced Data Engineer that will be responsible for designing and building the foundational components required for our customer. This includes bringing disparate sources into our Hadoop data lake and creating data products that will be used by the analytics and reporting teams. Data engineers will work in small, cross-functional teams. They will collaborate directly and continuously with product managers, designers, and product owners to release early and often.
Work with data scientists and software engineers to support data acquisition activities, data solution ideation, and implementation
Work with technical and business leads to transfer global business requirements into sound solutions and implementation
Share support responsibilities for implemented components
Technical Skills Required
3+ years of experience with R, Python, SAS, MATLAB, Java, etc.
3+ years of Hive, Spark, JavaScript, SQL, HTML
3+ years of experience with PCF cloud services
Experience with Hadoop, Spark, Kafka
Familiar with big data and machine learning tools and platforms
Experience with BI tools, such as Informatica, Data Stage, QlikView, Tableau, etc.
Design data pipelines and data robots, take a vision and bring it to life
Master data engineer; teaches others; works closely with IT architects to set strategy and design projects
Lead a team of Associate Data Engineers and Data Engineers
Provide extensive technical, strategic advice and guidance to key stakeholders around the data transformation efforts
Redesign data flows to prevent recurring data issues
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Possess excellent oral and written communication skills, as well as facilitation and presentation skills, and engaging presentation style.
Ability to work as a global team member, as well as independently, in a changing environment and managing multiple priorities.
Ability to establish and maintain cooperative and effective working relationships with application implementation teams, IT project teams, business customers, and end users.
Ability to deliver work within deadlines.
Nice to Have
Experience with agile/lean methodologies
Experience working independently and with minimal supervision
Experience with a global team
Experience with Test Driven Development and Software Craftsmanship
Other
Strong Communications skills
Ability to illustrate and convey ideas and prototypes effectively with team and partners
Presence demonstrating confidence, ability to learn quickly, influence, and shape ideas
OneMagnify is an equal opportunity employer.
OneMagnify is an Equal Opportunity Employer.",4.7,"OneMagnify
4.7","Dearborn, MI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1967,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
134,Full Stack Engineer - Digital Innovation Team,$48k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Every day, Global Payments makes it possible for millions of people to move money between buyers and sellers using our payments solutions for credit, debit, prepaid and merchant services. Our worldwide team helps over 3 million companies, more than 1,300 financial institutions and over 600 million cardholders grow with confidence and achieve amazing results. We are driven by our passion for success and we are proud to deliver best-in-class payment technology and software solutions. Join our dynamic team and make your mark on the payments technology landscape of tomorrow.

Global Payments is the parent company for TSYS, Netspend, Heartland, TouchNet, OpenEdge, Xenial, Greater Giving, ACTIVE Network, and AdvancedMD. Headquartered in Georgia with over 24,000 employees worldwide, Global Payments is a member of the S&P 500 with worldwide reach spanning over 100 countries throughout North America, Europe, Asia Pacific and Latin America. For more information, visit globalpaymentsinc.com and follow Global Payments on Twitter (@globalpayments), LinkedIn and Facebook.

Full Stack Engineer, Digital Innovation Team

At TSYS, we’re building the future of payments. As a member of the Digital Innovation team, you’ll be part of a team passionate about technology and using it to modernize payments, and the overall banking experience. We build a wide variety of solutions from automated infrastructure and cloud-based systems, to machine learning and user experiences for web, mobile and IoT. We’re looking for people who want to join our team of designers, engineers and enthusiasts and be a part of what’s happening.

Example products that you’ll be working on as a part of the TSYS DI team...

Create open API’s and content for TSYS Developers ( developers.tsys.com ), our client hub for open technology (API’s, SDK’s and much more) developed by TSYS.
Mobile and mobile web cardholder experiences that leverage open technologies like react.js and react native, node, swift2, java, springboot, . Net and others.
Campaign, content and push notification systems that leverage things like Kafka, javascript, java9 and spring to deliver content to multiple channels.
Our industry leading fraud engine that leverages ML to learn and detect fraud patterns.
Our hybrid cloud application infrastructure that’s based on docker, kubernetes, microservices and postgres.

Everyday you’ll do these kinds of things…

Collaborate with engineers across the Digital Innovation team to create technical designs, develop, test and solve complex problems that drive the solution from initial concept to production.
Contribute to our automated build, deploy and test processes for each solution.
Work with a wide range of systems, processes and technologies to own and solve problems from end-to-end.
Transcend the traditional boundaries of Frontend and Backend, designing and delivering performant, maintainable, and scalable features.
Think in terms of components and systems while considering a holistic user experience.
Work in an engineering focused, iterative team that’s composed of people with a wide range of skills.
Demo your work for colleagues and members of the business team.
Conduct research on new and interesting technologies that help to progress our products and platforms.

To qualify, you’ll need to have:

Highly Preferred

Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience in computer science, information technology or business information systems or related field.
Full-stack experience in one or more of the following: Java, Springboot, Javascript, SQL, Reactjs, Redux, scripting languages, unix and the confidence to easily pick up others.
Working experience in modernizing .Net applications to Java, Springboot microservices
Exposure to architectural patterns of a large, high-scale applications (e.g., well-designed APIs, mobile apps, data integrations, and/or large mobile web applications).
Exposure to devops tools like Jenkins, Docker, Kubernetes, ELK stack, etc.
Fluent, open communication style – speaking, writing, collaborating.
Demonstrated understanding of user experience, user centered design and responsive web design.

Preferred

Minimum two years relevant experience with advanced coding skills.
Experience designing and developing large distributed, mobile, machine learning, responsive web or API software systems.
Experience working in a team-based, start-up or agile development environment.
Track record of pursuing self-directed side projects, research, or open source projects.

TSYS Minimum Requirements

BS in Computer Science, Information Technology, Business / Management Information Systems or related field
Typically minimum of 2 years - Professional Experience In Coding, Designing, Developing And Analyzing Data.

What’s it like to work in our Team?

Our Digital Innovation Team is a team of advanced technical experts in a variety of fields who work together to incubate new capabilities in a rapid, prototype-oriented environment that emphasizes “product over process”. We’re huge advocates of open source and as a member of the Digital innovation team, you’ll not only create innovative user experiences, massive data sets and infrastructure at scale, but you’ll also be working with a team of people who represent some of the best and brightest minds in payments. We have a growth culture that emphasizes learning and adoption of technologies that push the envelope. We have sessions designed each week to bring the team together to learn and discuss topics that are critical to our industry and the evolution of our systems. Add to that our open work environment that emphasizes collaboration across teams.

So, what will your first day look like? First off, you’ll get a mac laptop and work with a mentor to pull the latest project from Git. Your assigned mentor is someone who stays with you throughout your first 90 days to help you gain familiarity with our teams, tools and environment. After that, we’ll have you meet with different members of the team and get to know their specialties, current projects and nuances of the job. By the end of day one, you’ll create and commit your first code push to git. We call this our “pilot push” and it promotes our culture of rapidly iterating and making progress.

Not Ready to Apply? Join Our Talent Community!!

US Applicants:
TSYS is an equal opportunity employer (EOE) committed to employing a diverse workforce and sustaining an inclusive culture.",3.0,"TSYS
3.0","Alpharetta, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,1983,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
135,Machine Learning Software Engineer – Model Optimization,$87k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Machine Learning Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

Artificial Intelligence is changing the world for the benefits of human beings and societies. QUALCOMM, as the world's leading mobile computing platform provider, is committed to deliver power-efficient cognitive computing technologies for enabling the wide deployment of intelligent solutions on all possible devices. Be a part of the R&D and Software team, you will be involved and participate in various development phases of the state-of-the-art technologies for next generation machine learning system. In this role you will design, develop & test software for machine learning frameworks that optimize models to run efficiently on edge devices. The candidate is expected to have strong interest and deep passion on making leading-edge \""deep learning\"" framework and algorithms working on mobile/embedded platforms for the benefit of end users.

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's, Computer Engineering and/or Computer Science and/or Electrical Engineering
Programming experience using C/C++ & Python.
Preferred Qualifications
Strong object oriented design and development skills.
Experience at both the firmware (RTOS) and system level (Linux) in SOC
Knowledge of neural networks, with hands-on experience using ML frameworks such as TensorFlow or PyTorch
Experience with enhancements to Training Frameworks and/or backends.
Experience developing CUDA kernels.
Knowledge of Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs), RNN/LSTMs
Familiarity with any of the deep learning compiler frameworks TVM, Glow or XLA
Experience leading teams in developing software from inception to delivery
Experience with TDD development solutions like GoogleTest etc.
Experience with Source Code and Configuration management tools, such as Git
Strong debugging and analysis skills, for root causing complex issues
Experience of profiling software and optimization techniques
Good understanding of multi-dimensional data movements and processing
Experience developing embedded software, preferably on-device ML
Previous experience working in an Agile environment, and collaborating with multi-disciplinary teams
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm Incorporated
4.0","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
136,"Software Development Engineer, Cloud-Scale Machine Learning Acceleration",$81k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"· Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field with 2+ years of related work experience or Master’s / PhD with 1+ years of related work experience
· 2+ years of experience developing Linux device drivers
· 2+ years of experience in multi-threaded and concurrent programming with C and C++
· Computer Science fundamentals in object-oriented design, data structures and algorithm design, complexity analysis, scalability and availability
· Experience with professional software engineering practices and best practices for the full software development life cycle, including coding standards, code reviews, source control management, and continuous integration and testing

Amazon Web Services provides a highly reliable, scalable, low-cost infrastructure platform in the cloud that powers hundreds of thousands of businesses in 190 countries around the world. AWS has the broadest and deepest set of machine learning and AI services for our customers’ businesses. We are seeking experienced Senior Software Engineers to build the next generation of our cloud server platforms. Our success depends on our world-class infrastructure; we’re handling massive scale and rapid integration of emergent technologies.

As a member of the Cloud-Scale Machine Learning Acceleration team you’ll be responsible for the design and optimization of Software in our data centers including technologies such as AWS Inferentia which is a machine learning inference product designed to deliver high performance at low cost.

You’ll provide leadership in the application of new technologies to large scale deployments in a continuous effort to deliver a world-class customer experience. This is a fast-paced, intellectually challenging position, and you’ll work with thought-leaders in multiple technology areas. You’ll have high standards for yourself and everyone you work with, and you’ll be constantly looking for ways to improve our products' performance, quality and cost. We’re changing an industry, and we want individuals who are ready for this challenge and want to reach beyond what is possible today.

· Experience with API architectures to provide services from devices
· Domain experience in an area related to high-scale data center technologies such as compute, storage, networking, or accelerators
· Experience with one or more modern scripting languages like Python
· Familiarity with AWS services
· Experience with Git source control

Amazon is an Equal Opportunity Employer – Minority / Women / Disability / Veteran / Gender Identity / Sexual Orientation / Age",3.9,"Annapurna Labs (U.S.) Inc.
3.9","Austin, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
137,Integrative Data Scientist - Bioinformatics,$93k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"By clicking the “Apply” button, I understand that my employment application process with Takeda will commence and that I agree with Takeda’s Privacy Notice, Privacy Policy and Terms of Use.

Job Description

Are you looking for a patient-focused, innovative-driven company that will inspire you and support your career development? If so, be empowered to take charge of your future at Takeda. Join us as Integrative Data Scientist at our Cambridge office.

At Takeda, we are transforming the pharmaceutical industry through our R&D-driven market leadership and being a values-led company. To do this, we empower our people to realize their potential through life-changing work. Certified as a Global Top Employer, we offer stimulating careers, encourage innovation, and strive for excellence in everything we do. We foster an inclusive, collaborative workplace, in which our global teams are united by a wavering commitment to deliver Better Health and a Brighter Future to people around the world. Here, you will be a vital contributor to our inspiring, bold mission in Cell Therapies.

You will have the opportunity to apply your knowledge and partner with industry-leading professionals in oncology, drug discovery, translational research, quantitative systems pharmacology, engineering, analytical and process development as you engage in cutting-edge therapeutic programs. The successful candidate will have extensive experience working with high-dimensional datasets using best practices in statistical data analyses to provide scientific insights and inform translational strategies.

POSITION OBJECTIVES:

The Cell Therapy Pharmaceutical Sciences team is pursuing several programs in human clinical studies, in addition to management of Takeda’s commercial cell therapy assets. This position’s primary role is to provide hands-on support, computational leadership and statistical guidance in bringing these therapies to patients, with a focus on nonclinical and clinical data integration, visualization, and analyses. In this role you will contribute to Takeda’s Cell Therapy platform strategies, working cross-functionally with discovery and development, translational sciences, pharmacology, data sciences, and in silico modeling teams.

POSITION ACCOUNTABILITIES:

Integrate and interpret high-dimensional data from a variety of high-throughput platforms and multidimensional data sources (internal or public) to derive insights and data-driven program strategies
Evaluate novel algorithms and approaches for data analysis, visualization and exploration in collaboration with academic partners and/or external associates
Work cross-functionally among R&D teams, workstreams, and programs to provide statistical support and expertise across the Cell Therapy portfolio.
Perform exploratory data analyses, static and dynamic data visualizations to communicate quantitative results enabling data-driven program decisions.
Provide bioinformatic and/or computational biology support to characterize disease mechanisms, mechanism of action for therapeutic interventions, and identify clinical biomarkers.
Actively communicate with nonclinical leads, scientists, analytical, and clinical teams to inform data analyses, data engineering, and machine learning that drives drug discovery and development.

EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE, AND SKILLS:

PhD – or MS with 2+ years of work experience, or BS with 5+ years of relevant experience – in Bioinformatics, Computational Biology, Computer Science, Engineering, or a related field and/or experience in systems biology
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills
Knowledge of high-level computing languages: R, C/C++, Java, Python, Perl, and willingness to learn other(s)
Strong knowledge in statistical software and language (e.g., R, SAS, MATLAB)
Familiar with distributed computing, database (e.g., SQL), and Amazon Web Services. Database programming or dashboard experience is a plus.
Demonstrate experience and willingness to utilize state-of-the-art bioinformatic tools for genome-scale or big data derived from Next Generation Sequencing including: DNA, RNA, Epigenetics, and Single Cell sequencing platforms and assays.
Proficient in applying concepts in descriptive and multivariate statistics; Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning knowledge and application is a plus. Evaluation of (non)clinical datasets in cell therapies preferred.
Experience in data integration, algorithm development, programming, and evaluation of analytical tools
Self-motivation and excellent time management skills
Excellent written and verbal communication, organizational skills, and be a strong team player.
Ability to drive initiatives, and excel in a matrix environment

WHAT TAKEDA CAN OFFER YOU

401(k) with company match and Annual Retirement Contribution Plan
Tuition reimbursement Company match of charitable contributions
Health & Wellness programs including onsite flu shots and health screenings
Generous time off for vacation and the option to purchase additional vacation days
Community Outreach Programs

Empowering Our People to Shine

Discover more at takedajobs.com

No Phone Calls or Recruiters Please.

Locations

Boston, MA

Worker Type

Employee

Worker Sub-Type

Regular

Time Type

Full time",3.7,"Takeda Pharmaceutical
3.7","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1781,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
138,"Senior Manager, Machine Learning Engineering",$153k-$252k (Glassdoor Est.),"This Senior Manager role will oversee two main product lines. Resale ML and Underwriting ML.

This is a high visibility, high impact role reporting to the Director of Machine Learning Engineering. This role will manage a small, but growing team of 5 engineers. Position will start remotely due to covid19.

We are seeking a passionate, self-starter leader who is equally proficient at mentoring developers and setting engineering strategy. Ideally, you are interested in growing your management experience inheriting a team of 5, and enjoy being in a fast-paced, ambiguous environment.

Required Skills:
4+ years of relevant software development experience
2+ years in a management position
We largely use Python, but fluency in Scala, Java, and/or C++ is also acceptable
Familiarity with Python scientific stack (e.g., numpy, pandas, matplotlib, scikit-learn)
Experience building data pipelines with distributed processing frameworks (e.g., Apache Spark)
Experience working with cloud platforms (e.g., AWS, GCP, Azure) and service-oriented architecture (Docker, Airflow, Argo, etc.)
Passion for machine learning engineering.
Self-starter who takes initiative, receives feedback well and has a positive attitude
Nice-to-Haves
Experience supporting and collaborating with scientists
Experience working with product managers, real estate partners (asset management, broker partners, premier agents) and/or platform teams (infrastructure, data engineering, etc.)
Experience working at a large technology company with various stakeholders and decision makers
Experience managing both SDE and MLE type engineers
A Bachelors degree or higher is required for this role.
Status: Full time role
Location: Seattle, WA – Will start as a REMOTE role

Job Id : MS2163

Since 2000, Akvelon has specialized in placing top software engineering talent at Fortune 500 Companies and start-ups alike. We were ranked in Comparably’s 2018 list of Top 15 Best Companies in Seattle, and were voted one of the Puget Sound Business Journal’s fastest growing companies for several years.

Akvelon is an Equal Opportunity Employer - All qualified applicants will receive consideration. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, or any other factor determined to be unlawful under applicable law.

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.2,"Akvelon, Inc.
4.2","Seattle, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
139,Data Scientist,$80k-$132k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Job Description:

We are seeking a Data Scientist. The position requires an active TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance. The Scientist will be expected to build statistical models, test hypotheses, interpret, summarize, visualize, and succinctly report on data findings. The Data Scientist will perform research on various data sources, to include unstructured data using quantitative and qualitative content analytics. The Scientist will construct and perform complex database search queries in multiple databases using SQL and API interfaces. The Scientist will perform web scraping and apply various techniques for processing unstructured data. The Scientist will leverage automation and machine learning to manage data, predict scenarios and make recommendations. The Data Scientist will contribute to building new analytical tools and packages across the enterprise and will be expected to collaborate with team members in a highly technical environment. The Data Scientist will be expected to learn and leverage emerging technologies including AWS and Git.

Requirements:

Bachelor’s degree in a highly quantitative subject or related field ( for example, statistics, mathematics, economics, or related field) and 8 years of experience
TS/SCI clearance with polygraph required
Strong experience working with Python or R programming languages
Experience working with data manipulation, analytic/business insight tools, and data visualization experience
Experience with SciPy stack or Tidyverse packages
Experience constructing and performing complex database search queries
Experience/ knowledge of computer science concepts, data architecture, and experience/knowledge of statistics
Demonstrated experience using statistical and machine learning techniques including supervised and unsupervised learning and natural language processing
Experience /familiarity with frequentist statistics and probability including predicative modeling
Experience with visualizing data using popular packages including Tableau, ggplot or Matplotlib
Ability to communicate technical findings to non-technical audiences

Preferred:

Experience/knowledge of social network and link analysis tools is desired (e.g. Palantir, i2 Analyst’s Notebook, or Proton)
Experience working with Amazon Web Services (AWS) is desired
Experience with front end web development is desired but not required
Experience designing and implementing neural network architectures

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.7,"Leidos
3.7","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
140,DevOps Lead Engineer - TS/SCI Required,-1,"General Duties:
Lead a highly motivated engineering team to design and implement a new DevOps pipeline for the National Geospatial Intelligence Agency (NGA). This technical leadership role is responsible for the day-to-day execution of a contractor DevOps scrum team that provides a stable application environment for development, testing and operational activities. The objective is to fully automate the software processes that build, test, harden, package and deploy applications across multiple networks. Work will include researching new technologies, implementing new solutions, and providing recommendations to reduce program risk / cost.

Beyond the DevOps pipeline itself, the team will implement new functionality on an Amazon Web Services (AWS) platform using Container-based solutions. This functionality must operate over clusters of distributed servers (nodes) using parallelization techniques and modern data center practices.

Recurring responsibilities include:
Overseeing builds, deployments, packaging, integration, automation and releases
Continuously evaluating the Monitoring and Performance of the environment
Providing standards and practices around Infrastructure as Code
Ensuring automated processes for builds and deployments are streamlined
Participating in technology, architecture and design discussions
Developing the architecture and automation templates for infrastructure provisioning, and configuration / change management
Providing day-to-day technical leadership to the application engineers and being an expert of DevOps principles to the team
Building and optimizing an architecture for supporting production applications
Level-3 support for a production environment
Required Experience:
10+ years implementing DevOps (Continuous Integration, Build, Deployment)
5+ years administering Red Hat Enterprise Linux (master level expertise expected)
3+ years administering common Linux applications (e.g. Tomcat, PostgreSQL, Git)
3+ Experience with Agile (Scrum) processes and tools including Confluence and Jira.
2+ years with automation technologies such as Puppet, Ansible, Chef and Salt
2+ years with Git, Maven, Nexus and Jenkins
2+ years scripting or coding in BASH, Python, Ruby or Perl
1+ years working with containers (i.e. Docker) and orchestration (i.e. Kubernetes)
1+ years supporting operational environments on Amazon Web Services (AWS)
1+ years supporting AWS native services (S3, SQS, SNS, IAM)
Must possess ability to work independently in a fast-paced, dynamic environment
Must be a team player and a leader who understands the importance of teamwork, collaboration, and open communication, including a willingness to occasionally work in a pair-programming environment
Must possess strong analytical and technical documentation skills
Must possess ability to effectively present information and respond to questions
Must have hands-on experience with design and development best practices
Understanding of SDLC automation concepts such as CI / CD
Desired Skills:
Familiarity with the Defense Intelligence Information Enterprise (DI2E) DevTools
Familiarity with the DoD Risk Management Framework (RMF)
Familiarity with industry standard commodity hardware for information systems (servers, storage, network devices)
Familiarity with industry standard software products (operating systems, hypervisors, databases, and web servers)
Education/Experience Level:
Bachelors Degree in computer science, related field, or equivalent work experience
Certifications Required: None, but AWS certifications are highly desirable
Must have an active security clearance (TS/SCI with Polygraph) for this position
Clearance:
US Citizenship Required - TS/SCI with Polygraph

BENEFITS OFFERED:
Medical, Dental, Vision Insurance - 100% Company-Paid Premiums
STD, LTD, and Life Insurance - 100% company paid
401K Additional 10% salary contribution immediately vested
Performance-Based Bonuses
PTO - 4 weeks/year
Holidays - 10 paid/year
Birthdays off with pay
Upfront and Recurring Referral Bonuses
Education Reimbursement
Paid Parental Leave
ABOUT PHOENIX OPERATIONS GROUP:
Phoenix Operations Group is a high-end engineering services company dedicated to advancing our national intelligence, defense and scientific interests. As a small start-up operating out of the Washington DC area, we rely on innovation to continually advance our employees' skills and provide game-changing solutions to our customers.

Our technical competencies include Big Data analytics, Cloud Computing infrastructure, Machine Learning, Multi-INT visualization, and enterprise architectures. We believe in open-source initiatives, agile development processes, and arming analysts with amazing capabilities. For more information, visit us at: https://phoenix-opsgroup.com

Phoenix Operations Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Phoenix Operations Group does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, non-disqualifying physical or mental disability, national origin, veteran status or any other basis covered by appropriate law. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.",5.0,"Phoenix Operations Group
5.0","Springfield, VA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
141,Staff Software Engineer - Machine Learning,$104k-$181k (Glassdoor Est.),"What will you do?

At realtor.com, we process terabytes of data every day, and transform that data into information that powers decisions for millions of home buyers, renters, dreamers, and real estate professionals. We aim to radically simplify home buying/selling and help more people achieve the American dream on our realtor.com website and mobile apps. You'll engage with some of the best and the brightest co-workers and leaders, learn and contribute, and have a great time. We work hard, play hard, and recognize achievement rewarding passion for innovation, creativity, and quality. If you enjoy working in a fast-paced, dynamic, cutting-edge work environment and desire to make a meaningful contribution to the business, then make the move!

Responsibilities:
Collaborate closely with data scientists, product managers and other cross-functional teams.
Build end-points, pipelines and supporting infrastructure to productionize Machine Learning models.
ML Ops (monitor inference performance, scalability, availability etc).
Take on complex problems, learn quickly, iterate, and persist towards good scalable, production grade solutions.
Help recruit, mentor and support growth of engineers within the team
Work collaboratively in an Agile/Scrum team to plan and execute at high velocity, and across teams throughout the organization to reuse existing components and architect shared functionality
Take ownership and responsibility for team practices and processes and their continuous improvement.
What will you bring?
Requirements:
Degree preferred in engineering or computer science.
BS and 7+ years/MS and 5+ years of working on complex, scalable backend systems.
2+ years of industry experience deploying Machine Learning models to production at scale.
Proficient in Python, Node.js and / or Java.
Experience working with public cloud stack preferably in AWS.
Experience with AWS stack - at least a few of the following - S3, Athena, EC2, ECS, Lambda, SageMaker, SQS, SNS, Kinesis, MongoDB, and DynamoDB
Exposure to Docker and Containerization
Knowledgeable of core CS concepts such as: structured and unstructured data, data management and querying, common data structures and algorithms
Strong communication, analytical, and people skills
Preferred Requirements:
Prior experience of working with Data Scientists and Machine Learning projects
Familiarity with Machine Learning processes is a plus
Experience with GraphQL, API Gateway, Microservices is a plus
Experience with ML platforms is a plus
About realtor.com

At realtor.com®, we believe that everyone deserves a home of their own. We're a community of nearly 2,000 employees that work hard to ensure that from the moment someone starts dreaming about a new home, to the moment they walk in the door and beyond, we're there to lend a helping hand. Every month, 70 million people trust us with their journey home by visiting our site and mobile apps, and we'd love to have you join our team to help.

We've got great offices across Canada and the US and lots of sweet jobs to choose from, so we're hoping you'll join us on our journey to make home buying and selling easier, and more rewarding for everyone.

Let's make a difference, together. For Real.

#LI-IH1",2.9,"realtor.com
2.9","Santa Clara, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1993,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
142,AI/ML Engineer,-1,"Now Hiring an AI/ML Engineer

As an AI/ML Engineer, you will get hands on with translating the vision from solution architects and work with data scientists, date engineers, loT specialists, and software developers to build complete end-to-end solutions. This is a remote position.
Knowledge and Experience in designing and implementing AI applications using Microsoft Azure Cognitive Services, Azure Bot Service and Azure Machine Learning
Analyzing requirements for AI solutions
Experience recommending the appropriate tools and technologies for AI solutions
Experience in designing and implementing AI solutions that meet scalability and performance requirements
Understanding when a custom model API should be developed to meet specific requirements
Experience in understanding of programming language such as Python
Ability to work autonomously and collaboratively as part of a team to both teach and learn every day
Continuously looking for opportunities to learn, build skills and share learning.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Must have experience in application development
Profile of Success
Understanding of ML frameworks
Proven experience as a Machine Learning Engineer or similar role
Experience with setting up DevOps for Machine Learning to enable data science teams and IT teams to collaborate
Desirable Skills
Demonstrated ability and problem solving skills to develop innovative machine learning applications
About AIS

AIS, Dedicated to Our People

AIS employees can spend their entire career at AIS doing challenging, rewarding work and reach their desired level of achievement and responsibility. We offer the opportunity to move up, without the obligation to move out of a position where one excels. We are committed to our employee's success; however, they define it.

It's our dedication to our employees that inspired our leadership to invest in our future and become partially employee-owned through an Employee Stock Ownership Program (ESOP).

Our employees are our greatest strength, and we do all that we can to serve them. We invest in technology as early adopters, allowing us to create transformative and innovative solutions for our customers while exposing our team to cutting edge technology.

We hire outstanding individuals who are committed to curiosity, passionate about emerging technology, and who are excited to find innovative solutions for the biggest tech challenges facing international brands and government agencies today.

We Invest in Individuals Committed to Innovation

AIS is seeking professionals of a certain character and level of excellence. People that we can learn from and that we can help grow to achieve their personal career goals. We are looking for:
Smart people with a passion for technology
Strong technical capabilities with a consultancy mindset
Close involvement with local technical communities
A willingness to think outside of the box to provide innovative solutions to clients
Ability to solve challenging technical business problems
Self-directed professionals
Our Core Values
Client Success
Continued Learning and Technical Excellence
Strong Client Relationships
Citizenship and Community
AIS is an Equal Opportunity Employer

Applied Information Sciences is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, national origin, religion, color, gender, sexual orientation, age, disability, protected veteran status or any other basis covered by law. Employment decisions are based solely on qualifications merit, and business need.",4.5,"Applied Information Sciences
4.5",Virginia,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
143,Data Scientist for Detector Physics,$56k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311174

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Signature Science and Technology Division

Group: Detection Physics
*Job Description**
The Detection Physics Group within the National Security Directorate at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is seeking a research scientist who will focus on studies of radiation detection physics using Artificial Intelligence/ Machine Learning (AI/ML) techniques. The Detection Physics Group includes research ranging from low background and high energy fundamental particle physics to radiation detection related to non-proliferation and national security applications. This position will focus on the expanding role of AI/ML within the group. It will provide the opportunity to perform analysis of data from existing experimental setups, and to propose, develop, and demonstrate relevant techniques on new data sets for advanced applications.

Major duties and responsibilities: Contribute to the development of the analysis of a variety of types of radiation detectors and experiments. Perform, analyze, and interpret detector characterizations for detectors of interest, including semiconductor detectors, scintillators, proportional counters, silicon photomultipliers, and others. Develop a detector-physics-focused AI/ML strategy with an eye toward fostering new funding streams and research directions. Engage in research activities with the broader AI/ML community at PNNL.
*The hiring level will be determined based on the education, experience and skill set of the successful candidate based on the following:**
*Level 2:** Works on problems of moderate scope where analysis of situations or data requires a review of a variety of factors. Exercises judgment within defined procedures and practices to determine appropriate action. Builds productive internal/external working relationships. Works under general supervision. Follows established procedures. Infrequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts on routine matters.
*Level 3:** A seasoned, experienced professional with a full understanding of area of specialization; resolves a wide range of issues in creative ways. This job is the fully qualified, careeroriented, journey-level position. Independently determines and develops approach to solutions. Frequent interorganizational and outside customer contacts.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with 2 years of experience, or Masters degree with 0-2 years of experience, or PhD with 0 years of experience.

+ Programming capability with languages such as C/C++, Python, MatLab, and R.

+ Experience with ""standard"" and AI/ML data analysis techniques.

+ Experience with particle detection software and hardware.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Bachelors degree with at least 5 years of well-aligned prior experience or a masters degree with 3 years of relevant experience or a PhD degree with at least 1 year of experience.

+ PhD in experimental nuclear or high energy particle physics, or related fields.

+ Experience with software tools such as PyTorch, Tensorflow, and Keras.

+ Experience with data analysis and simulation packages such as ROOT, Geant4, and MCNP.

+ Implementation experience with high-performance parallel codes and/or accelerators (FPGAs/GPUs).

+ High level of motivation and ability to work with, form, and lead collaborative research teams.

+ Adaptability to thrive in a rapidly evolving, multitasked, research environment.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Scientists/Scientific Support_

_Group:_ _Detection Physics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-09-09_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-12-08_",4.0,"PNNL
4.0","Richland, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
144,Cloud Data Engineer/Architect at ConsumerMedical,-1,"Cloud Data Engineer/Architect

ConsumerMedical

Norwell, MA or Bloomington, MN

COMPANY PROFILE

ConsumerMedical (www.consumermedical.com) is a leading healthcare decision support and clinical concierge company serving over 4 million individuals through some of the nation's largest employers, health plans and private exchanges. As a Medical Ally, ConsumerMedical (CM) guides participants throughout their healthcare journey with compassionate, high-touch support and deep clinical expertise.

ConsumerMedical offers a fully integrated suite of solutions including Medical Decision Support, Expert Medical Opinions, Claims Advocacy and more, helping individuals and families navigate the healthcare system while reducing unnecessary elective surgeries and driving patients to the highest quality providers. The result is better care for patients, more empowered healthcare decisions for employees and their families, and a better bottom line for business. The company is headquartered outside Boston in Norwell, MA.

We offer an opportunity to contribute immediately, have a voice that’s recognized, and make decisions that have impact while building a career with a fast-growing organization. ConsumerMedical offers a healthy work-life balance and is an inclusive employer seeking to foster a diverse and collaborative culture. We are currently seeking a full time Cloud Data Engineer/Architect to join our growing team.

GENERAL SUMMARY

Our data analytics/engineering teams are looking for a Cloud Data Engineer/Architect who wants to bring our platform(s) to the next level, expanding into new market opportunities. In undertaking this challenge, you will be working with data scientists, software engineers, and data providers to lead/maintain data models and transformations of that data. In this role, you will lead and be responsible for creating and maintaining end to end data pipelines for healthcare application(s) developed and managed in Azure Cloud Services. The pipelines include big data primarily from commercial healthcare claims, provider data, CMS and other proprietary quality and clinical data sources. All data and pipelines are used for machine learning and artificial intelligence to advance to and enhance applications which help ConsumerMedical maintain its leadership position in the 5 drivers of quality. This is a key role to a team who are at the forefront of the latest technologies and immersed in development on cloud services with new and emerging healthcare data sources.

Our team of industry experts work in a fast-paced, rapid-learning environment in software development, working with massive data sets, and healthcare data analytics. In our environment, everyone is encouraged to make a difference without experiencing the fixed ways of doing business in larger, bureaucratic organizations.

Cloud Data Engineer/Architect Job Responsibilities:

Data engineering leadership and architecture responsible to collect, aggregate, store, and reconcile data to Azure in support of healthcare business decisions.
Design and build data pipelines, data streams, and data services on Azure which drive data driven, qualitative, quality insights and application enhancement / search results.
Build / architect processes supporting data transformation, data structures, metadata, dependency and workload management.
Architect / deliver modern data solutions leveraging components like Azure functions, Azure Data Factory, Data Flows, Azure Data Lake, Azure SQL, Azure Data Bricks, Streaming Analytics and related
Enable data pipelines between structured and unstructured data sources and company’s Enterprise Data Warehouse on Azure through a continuous process of data scrapping, structure transformation cleansing and formatting in SQL / Python
Working with Data Scientists, Engineering and Physicians to build an enhanced data ecosystem and build new integrated solutions to provide a holistic set of industry-leading data and analytic capabilities including Artificial Intelligence (AI), Machine Learning (ML), and real-time insights
Support business users on functional and data requirements to enhance data models and pipelines
Technologies include:
SQL
Python
JavaScript
Elasticsearch, Kibana, Logstash
Azure Data Technologies, specifically Databricks, Data Factory, Blob storage
Snowflake Data Warehouse
Prepare, clean, aggregate and interpret big data (billions+ rows) in support of advanced analytic projects across the organization
Ideal candidate will have a knack for big picture/critical thinking, as well as enjoy being very hands-on in a fast paced, innovative environment.

Cloud Data Engineer/Architect Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Data Science, or related field
3+ years of experience architecting and building Azure Big Data architecture, Enterprise Analytics Solutions, and optimizing 'big data' data pipelines, architectures and data sets.
Experience with Design and Architecture of Azure big data frameworks/tools: Azure Data Lake, Azure Data Factory, Azure Data Bricks, Azure ML, SQL Data Warehouse, HDInsight
Strong background in Big Data and Cloud technologies:
Preferred: Azure (Azure Functions, Azure SQL Database, Azure Data Lake, Azure Data Factory, Azure Blob), Snowflake Data Warehouse);
Similar: Hadoop, PySpark, Hive, Big Query, AWS (EC2, RDS, CloudFormation, S3), Google Cloud Platform.
Strong background in distributed data processing and software engineering, can build high-quality, scalable data products.
Deep technical knowledge of data architectures, databases, data modeling and data infrastructure in the cloud (i.e.- Azure, AWS, Google Cloud)
Experience designing and developing data cleansing routines utilizing typical data quality functions involving standardization, transformation, rationalization, linking and matching
Deep hands-on experience with SQL including ability to write, analyze, and debug SQL and Python
Highly skilled in areas of structured data (e.g. join types, inner, outer), understanding of when tables should/shouldn’t have duplicates (many to many; 1 to many joins)
Experience with Artificial Intelligence, Machine Learning, Computer Vision and/or Conversational/NLP applications
Ideal candidate has healthcare, pharmaceutical or biomedical data experience with a focus on improved patient care, quality of care, patient engagement, provider experience, and system efficiency
Experience with code deployment in Azure Databricks environment preferred.
Knowledge of data, master data and metadata related standards, processes and technology
Strong hands on experience with data core modernization and data ingestion
Preferred experience with Snowflake Data Warehouse systems
Experience in designing and implementing scalable, distributed systems leveraging cloud computing technologies like Microsoft Azure, AWS EC2, and AWS Elastic Map
Familiarity with DevOps tools like Azure DevOps, Jenkins, Maven etc.
Experience working with Azure data integration techniques & self-service data preparation.
Assist business users on functional and data requirements to enhance data models and pipelines

Please submit resume and cover letter for consideration.

Disclaimers:

Applicants, as well as position incumbents, who become disabled as defined under the Americans with Disabilities Act must be able to perform the essential job functions (as listed) either unaided or with the assistance of a reasonable accommodation to be determined by management on a case by case basis.

ConsumerMedical is committed to the principle of equal employment opportunity. Applicants for employment and employees are reviewed on their individual qualifications for a position. Under no circumstances will ConsumerMedical discriminate against qualified persons on the basis of race, color, religious creed, retaliation, national origin, ancestry, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity/expression, disability, mental illness, genetics, choice of health insurance, marital status, age, veteran status, or any other basis prohibited under applicable law.",3.7,"Insight Performance
3.7","Minneapolis, MN",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
145,Deep learning Software Engineer,$91k-$145k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

If you are looking to make a huge impact for Intel across Discrete GPUs for AI, software products including oneAPI and win worldwide AI software ecosystem on our Data Center targeted Discrete GPUs, then read ahead .This is a leadership engineering role in AI within Ecosystem Engineering team in IAGS. The role spans working with customers across multiple internal and external stakeholders and customers As Deep Learning software engineer, you will be involved from early enabling activities to actually undertaking performance tuning and optimization of deep learning models based on TensorFlow and Pytorch for successful deployment by our customers. Additionally, you will be expected to influence Intel Discrete GPU hardware capabilities for AI as well as AI software stack for oneAPI. This is a high impact role working with customers and driving their success, while making Intel a world leader in AI by influencing our discrete GPU and software products.

We are in startup-up environment, you should love ambiguity, be able to juggle multiple-tasks and able to make forward, demonstrable progress that delivers impact. You will have an opportunity to collaborate with Engineering Leaders across Intel and be able influence technical leaders.

An ideal candidate would exhibit behavioral skills that indicate:

Excellent verbal and written skills are required. Ability to develop high-quality externally publishable collaterals is a plus.
Ability to work in a dynamic environment and ability to think on your feet is required

Qualifications

You must possess the below minimum qualifications to be initially considered for this position. Preferred qualifications are in addition to the minimum requirements and are considered a plus factor in identifying top candidates.

Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor’s with 9 + years or Master’s with 6+ years or Ph.D with 4+ years in Electrical Engineering or Computer Science or Computer Engineering or Physics or Mathematics or a related relevant Engineering discipline
5+ years or more experience working in Machine Learning or AI in one of the following roles: Developing, architecture, implementing or performance bench marking AI workloads
2 years or more experience in one or more of the following areas: Python, Tensor Flow, Caffe, Pytorch, MXNet
2+ years' experience in deploying/optimizing distributed training on CPU/GPU clusters

Preferred Qualifications

2+ years of knowledge/experience in Artificial Intelligence solutions applied to segments such as HPC, Cloud, Visual Computing and/or Enterprise.
Prior experience in deployment strategies , performance optimization, multi node, multi GPU scaling big plus
Prior experience in Cloud deployment strategies, Cloud Developer Environments and having any cloud certification is a definite plus.
Knowledge of Intel MKL libraries like MKL-DNN highly desired
Develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to available data sets, test it and then deploy on big data also help for artificial intelligence is a plus
Good presentation skills at conferences, industry events, labs, and customer workshops are a plus.
Experience or training in one or more of the parallel programming methodologies: SYCL, C++, OpenMP*, MPI, Intel Threading Building Blocks, OpenCL, CUDA is highly desired
Soft skills needed to work with customers and/or prior engagement with customers is a big plus!

Inside this Business Group

Intel Architecture, Graphics, and Software (IAGS) brings Intel's technical strategy to life. We have embraced the new reality of competing at a product and solution level—not just a transistor one. We take pride in reshaping the status quo and thinking exponentially to achieve what's never been done before. We've also built a culture of continuous learning and persistent leadership that provides opportunities to practice until perfection and filter ambitious ideas into execution.

Other Locations

US, California, Santa Clara

Posting Statement

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, religious creed, sex, national origin, ancestry, age, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, military and veteran status, marital status, pregnancy, gender, gender expression, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by local law, regulation, or ordinance....",4.1,"Intel
4.1","Hillsboro, OR",-1,10000+ Employees,1968,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
146,Mechanical/Electrical Engineer for Process Engineering Firm,-1,"Established Process Engineering Firm is looking to add a degreed mechanical or electrical engineer with practical hands-on experience to its team.

The Firm is a leader in its industry and provides design, build and maintenance services to its client base. We bring together many different aspects of engineering, including equipment fabrication, chemical process analysis, software and robotics to address project demands.

Many applicants we have received for this position have experience with performing a narrow function related to the design or manufacturing of a small machine or machine-part in large scale. In contrast, our company affords the right applicant the rare opportunity to perform a broad function related to the design and manufacturing of large machines at a custom scale. This position is well suited to an individual who has the natural inclination to apply fundamental physical principles to design and construct custom solutions.

This position is for the company's Rochester, PA Location. The Company handles projects all over the United States. Periodic domestic travel may be required.
-- Position Summary ---
The candidate will be involved in the design, construction and maintenance of a process units, which vary by industry.

Requirements include:
Background in Chemical, Electrical or Mechanical Engineering. Associates Degree or Bachelor's Degree or other technical degree from an accredited college or University strongly preferred. Company will evaluate relevant work experience in place of required degree for exceptionally strong candidates.
Practical hands-on mechanical, electrical, chemical, fabrication or construction experience required.
Ability to produce engineering designs and drawings in CAD.
Ability to understand CAD drawings and be able to learn how to fabricate the specified components as part of a team.
Strong team and communication skills.
Excellent oral and written communication skills and lead men in the field.
Compensation will be based on experience and applicable skills. Candidate will have the potential to grow based on individual performance. Please submit resume in PDF format.

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
relevant: 5 years (Required)
Electrical Engineering: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Associate (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.amsaxtech.com
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Amsax Technologies,"Rochester, PA",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
147,Data Scientist,-1,"About Triplebyte

Triplebyte is transforming the way software engineers are hired. Our mission is to build an open, valuable and skills-based credential for all engineers and data scientists. This is important because millions of people have skills (and deserve good jobs), but don't fit the profile that recruiters seek. We aim to cut out that noise by matching opportunities to people who have the skills to succeed in them - regardless of their background.

Companies like Apple, Dropbox and American Express trust Triplebyte's technical assessment to identify the best engineers for their open roles and reduce the time and effort it takes to hire them.

We raised a $35 million Series B and our team of 64 is growing! We're building out the leadership of our team to help us scale to the next phase.

Press Links:

You can read more about our company and hear from our founders in the press here:

Triplebyte raises $35M for its online coding test and credentialing service for hiring engineers

Triplebyte incubates ColorStack to increase Black and Latinx representation in CS programs

CNBC (Your Next Job Interview Could be with a Robot)

Building an Engineering Team - Harj Taggar and Ammon Bartram

Role Description

As a data scientist at Triplebyte, you'll have the opportunity to work on a variety of challenges to help us scale. You'll be part of a small team, who are leveraging data to fix technical hiring. Your day to day, will include a mix of dataset acquisition, statistical modeling, exploratory data analysis, and software engineering. You'll report directly to Triplebytes' Head of Machine Learning and will work alongside a team of 6-8 machine learning engineers and data scientists.Fields your work will touch on
Psychometrics
Recommender systems
Time series analysis
Survival analysis
Bayesian inference
Probabilistic programming
This is an ideal role for a data scientist who wants the scope and responsibility to own features/products from the inception and research phase through to measuring real-world results.

Compensation and Benefits

Competitive salary and stock options package

Open vacation policy

Employer paid health, vision and dental insurance

401(k) plan with matching

Pre-tax commuter benefits

Daily catered lunches

The Company is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions on the basis of merit and business needs. The Company does not discriminate against employees or applicants (in any aspect of employment, including, but not limited to recruiting and hiring, job assignment, compensation, opportunities for advancement, promotion, transfers, evaluation, benefits, training, discipline, and termination), on the basis of any characteristic protected under applicable federal, state, or local laws.",3.2,"Triplebyte
3.2",California,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
148,Data Scientist,$78k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Klaviyo is growing fast and we have openings for all skill levels across data science. Listen to our data science team podcast at https://medium.com/klaviyo-data-science and learn more about our technical culture at https://klaviyo.tech

Our data science team takes ideas from inception to new machine learning-powered features that ship to our hundreds of thousands of users. You'll be central to creating features that help our customers learn and grow from their data. For this role, we're looking for people who are strong at math, modeling, experimental design and putting themselves in the shoes of customers. We look for people who are interested in all aspects of what it takes to go from idea to generally available feature, even though your strengths and experience may fall primarily in one area.

The ideal candidate has a background in data science, statistics and machine learning and has done work ranging from exploratory analysis to training and deploying models. We use a wide variety of data mining and machine learning algorithms. The right candidate will have both a solid fundamental understanding and deep practical experience with at least a few modeling and machine learning techniques.

You should have experience building models that are used by people to make better decisions. We're focused on shipping early and often. We prefer iterative solutions that are incrementally better to the perfect solution.

How you will make a difference:
Analyze large data sets (we're collecting billions of individual actions every month).
Build models and ship products that enable businesses to grow faster and communicate with their customers.
Democratize and open up that technology to everyone.
Match the right assumptions and models to the right problem.
Measure and know what impact your models had on the decisions people made -- e.g. did they outperform the previous best model or a human decision maker?
Who you are:
Possess a strong fundamental understanding and deep experience with at least some machine learning algorithms (e.g. regressions, decision trees, k-means clustering, neural networks).
Understand Bayesian modeling techniques.
Are capable of analyzing data and making rigorous statements about what can or cannot be concluded.
Have experience designing and implementing model performance/validation assessments.
Have a background in statistics and understand different distributions and the conditions under which they're valid.
Know how code and have used data science tools and packages.
Have demonstrated a measurable impact based on the models you've created. It's not always easy getting a model correct and we love talking about places we got stuck and working as a team to think through ideas that could unblock us.
Have a desire to ship features powered by data science (in other words, you're excited by both upfront research and actually getting models into production at cloud scale).
Bachelor's or advanced degree in statistics, applied mathematics, computer science or other relevant quantitative discipline, or equivalent industry experience.
Get to know Klaviyo
Klaviyo is the world's leading owned marketing platform known for accelerating revenue for online businesses using the channels they own like email, web, and mobile. Enabling companies to leverage these owned marketing channels, Klaviyo makes it easy to store, access, analyze and use transactional and behavioral data to power highly-targeted customer and prospect communications. And unlike other marketing platforms, Klaviyo doesn't force companies to compromise between advanced functionality or ease of use - so companies of all sizes are able to maximize their sales quickly. That's why over 50,000 innovative companies like Unilever, Custom Ink and Eventbrite sell more with Klaviyo.",4.8,"Klaviyo
4.8","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
149,Software Engineer,-1,"Requisition ID 169546BR
Date updated 10/02/2020
CE38/CE39: Software Engineer II/Sr Software Engineer I; G07/G08

Note: This is a position for experienced professionals. If you have completed your degree within the last 18 months please apply to RTX College jobs: https://jobs.raytheonmissilesanddefense.com/college-jobs

Check us out on YouTube: https://youtu.be/kfHlc8GCzoU
At Raytheon Technologies (RTX), we are defining the future of aerospace and defense with ambitious technologies that push the limits of known science. Our technologies help our customers take on the world's biggest challenges.

Job Summary:
We are currently seeking a Software Engineer to join the Missile Defense & Surveillance Software Department in Huntsville, Alabama.

Our software teams employ disciplined software processes (CMMI Level 5) across the Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC). We use a variety of development methodologies and tools to produce high quality products for our customers. We strive for technical excellence by drawing upon a diverse workforce whose knowledge base covers the complete spectrum of modern computing languages and platforms. The successful Software Engineer will be integrated into a small to medium-sized team performing software development, integration, and testing of real-time systems. As the Software Engineer, you will be responsible for hands-on technical work including designing, implementing, debugging, and resolving problems with real-time software applications, as well as supporting software verification efforts.

Our software applications are developed using C++, Java, and Ada programming languages executing on a variety of computing platforms running Linux/Unix operation systems.

This position will require an Interim secret clearance or above to start. Except in rare circumstances, only US Citizens are eligible for a security clearance.

Required Skills/Experience:

•2+ years of prior object-oriented software development experience using C++, Java, and/or Ada as well as Linux/Unix operating systems.
•Established verbal and written communication skills. Works within a team construct to achieve program success.
•Experience in the code and test phases of Software Engineering. Familiarity with the Software Development Life Cycle.

This position will require an Interim secret clearance or above to start. Except in rare circumstances, only US Citizens are eligible for a security clearance.

Required Education (including Major):
•BS or MS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Mathematics, Software Engineering, or relevant engineering discipline

Desired Skills/Experience:

•4+ yrs of prior object-oriented software development experience using C++, Java, and/or Ada as well as Linux/Unix operating systems.
•Real-time OS, preferably WindRiver Linux or LynxOS
•Scrum Master / Product Owner experience
•SBCs and BIOS update experience
•UML and preferably Model Driven Development using Rhapsody
•Agile software development
•Automated testing, continuous integration
•Standard MS-Office tools for word processing, spreadsheets, and presentations
•SEI CMMI model
•Machine Learning, Cyber, and/or Artificial Intelligence techniques
•Active Security clearance at the Secret level

KEYWORDS: software, engineer, object-oriented, java, ada, linux, unix, c++, real-time, uml, code, test, agile

At Raytheon Technologies, we innovate to create solutions and solve complex challenges across all domains: from land and sea to air, space, and cyberspace. In doing so, we embrace the talent, expertise and perspectives of our diverse workforce, each bringing their skills, ideas and dedication to the work we do. We pride ourselves on our commitment to our customers, industry partners and our teammates, making a positive impact not only to our business, but also in our communities where we live and work. Our constant innovation is made possible by a strong culture, investing in our people, and an unwavering vision that is shared by Raytheon Technologies employees across the globe a vision of one global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place.

What We Offer: Whether you are just starting out on your career journey or are an experienced professional, Raytheon Technologies offers a robust total rewards package that goes beyond with compensation; healthcare, wellness, retirement and work/life benefits; career development and recognition programs. Some of the superior benefits Raytheon Technologies offers include parental (including paternal) leave, flexible work schedules, achievement awards, educational assistance and child/adult backup care.

All these job responsibilities are to be executed in harmony with Raytheon Technologies' Code of Business Ethics and Conduct policy which sets the standard by which we operate and how we treat others.
Raytheon Technologies is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, or Vietnam era, or other eligible veteran status, or any other protected factor.
This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.

169546

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Huntsville, AL",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
150,Principal Systems Engineer - Radar Simulation,-1,"One global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place..
Raytheon Technologies (RTX) offers an innovative and inclusive culture; welcoming diversity and collaboration and providing numerous opportunities for career growth.

The Algorithm & Simulation (A&S) Directorate is responsible for algorithm development including radio-frequency (RF) and electro-optical/infrared (EO-IR) Signal Processing; Guidance, Navigation, and Control; and missile-and-sensor-level Modeling and Simulation for RMD's broad portfolio of projects, programs and products. The MSA teams within the A&S Directorate provide, develop, and maintain high fidelity performance simulations (including multiple sensor channels, scene generation capability, control hardware, physical environment, and embedded software), execute system performance analysis (including pre-flight prediction, post flight matching, and verification and validation), support new business initiatives and develop & execute technology roadmaps. Our portfolio includes surface Navy, undersea Navy, missile defense sensors, interceptors, command and control, integrated air and missile defense systems and space surveillance systems.

Join this highly visible team and perform technically challenging assignments, which will directly contribute to protecting our nation and our war fighters.

Job Description:
The candidate will develop and analyze radar algorithms in the context of a high fidelity digital simulation supplemented by field measurements. The systems engineer will work collaboratively to extend and validate the digital simulation, assess radar performance in complex multi-mission scenarios by reviewing detailed data from individual runs and across broad sets of runs, and investigate and resolve issues identified during analysis. The systems engineer will support updating and developing new requirements for implementing and verifying refined and new radar algorithms in tactical radar software. The engineer will develop and present briefings and reports on performance assessments, new and modified radar algorithms, scene modeling approaches, and issue investigations. The engineer will support integration of the high fidelity radar simulation into federations managed by other US Government organizations.

Required Skills:
8+ years of radar modeling and/or analysis experience
Experience using Matlab for data analysis
Experience with a compiled programming language
Ability to work both independently and in a team environment
Commitment to work on-site in a classified environment
Active DoD SECRET clearance, or interim SECRET clearance required prior to start date.
Desired Skills:
Understanding of radar signal processing, radar tracking, and electronic protection
Understanding of environmental clutter and RF propagation phenomenology and modeling
Experience with classification and machine learning techniques
Experience with Java programming
Basic understanding of Linux (from a users point of view)
MS or PhD in Engineering, Science or Mathematics
Required Education (including Major):
Minimum Bachelors Degree in Engineering, Science, or Mathematics area
Keywords:
Radar Systems, RF, radar, simulation, M&S, federated simulation, algorithm development, systems engineering, research and development, Java, Matlab, radar tracking, signal processing, electronic protection, classification, classifier, machine learning, clutter, propagation, mathematics, software, engineer, algorithm, DoD, V&V
170033

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Marlborough, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
151,Machine Learning Software Engineer – Training Frameworks,$90k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Machine Learning Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

AI is moving from cloud to the edge devices. QUALCOMM, as the world's leading mobile computing platform provider, is committed to enable the wide deployment of intelligent solutions on all possible devices. Be a part of our Deep Learning research project in Corporate R&D, where you will be involved and participate in building best-in-class solutions and tools needed to enable state-of-the-art technologies for next generation mobile/embedded machine learning platforms for smart phones, autonomous vehicles, robotics and IOT devices. In this role, you will work in a dynamic research environment, be part of a multi-disciplinary team of researchers and software developers, collaborate with internal teams, work with popular neural network frameworks, and understand the architecture of Qualcomms SOC compute and ML HW accelerators. You will design, develop & test software for machine learning frameworks that optimize models, training frameworks for distributed/federated learning, that enable models to run and learn efficiently run on edge devices. The successful applicant should have a strong software background, passion to work on neural network frameworks/libraries, and ability to lead teams in developing leading-edge software frameworks.

Minimum Qualifications
Bachelor's, Computer Engineering and/or Computer Science and/or Electrical Engineering
8+ years of Software Engineering experience.
Extensive programming experience using C/C++ & Python.
Hands-on experience with machine learning libraries such as TensorFlow, PyTorch.
Preferred Qualifications
Strong object oriented design and development skills.
Knowledge of neural networks, with hands-on experience using ML frameworks such as TensorFlow or PyTorch
Experience with enhancements to Training Frameworks and/or backends.
Experience developing CUDA kernels.
Knowledge of Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs), RNN/LSTMs
Familiarity with any of the deep learning compiler frameworks TVM, Glow or XLA
Experience leading teams in developing software from inception to delivery
Experience with TDD development solutions like GoogleTest etc.
Experience with Source Code and Configuration management tools, such as Git
Strong debugging and analysis skills, for root causing complex issues
Experience developing embedded software, preferably on-device ML
Previous experience working in an Agile environment, and collaborating with multi-disciplinary teams
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm Incorporated
4.0","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
152,Senior Image Processing Engineer,-1,"Senior Image Processing Engineer*
Cellino Biotech is a venture-backed company that is building a transformative platform for cell-based therapies. We use a combination of large-scale time series imaging, machine learning, and algorithmically-driven high-speed laser editing at the single-cell level to achieve unrivaled consistency and yield in human cell production, at scale. Our team consists of an interdisciplinary mix of entrepreneurs with experience in laser physics, biology, software engineering, optics, precision instrumentation, and business.

Cellino is seeking an exceptional full-time image processing engineer with extensive experience building production-quality image processing pipelines and infrastructure.
Responsibilities*
Design and implement cloud-based microscopy imaging pipelines for large-scale:
Illumination and optics correction, geometric transformation, registration, stitching
multiresolution storage and retrieval
processing including filtering, segmentation, semantic feature extraction
visualization and annotation
Requirements*
6+ years professional experience designing and implementing image processing algorithms and systems
Experience building software for large-scale 2D or 3D image pre-processing, geometric transformation, registration, filtering, segmentation, semantic information extraction and visualization
Extensive experience with at least one of OpenCV, scikit-image, and ITK
Proficiency in Python and its numerical stack (NumPy, SciPy)
Comfort with Linux environments and cloud-based compute & storage platforms
Nice to Have*
Experience with large-scale image data formats (e.g. image pyramids, Zarr, HDF5) with progressive retrieval, processing and visualization
Experience parallelizing processes at high level (e.g. dask, Spark)
Experience with machine learning frameworks (e.g. scikit-learn, Tensorflow)
Experience with C/C++, CUDA
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $150,000.00 - $200,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"Cellino Biotech, Inc.","Cambridge, MA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Unknown,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
153,Data Scientist - Risk,$77k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: Data Scientist (Risk)

Location: Orlando, Florida

Manager: Head of Data Science

About LSQ

LSQ is a technology-driven provider of accounts receivable financing to companies who need working capital but may not be able to obtain sufficient financing from their bank. Our focus is to help businesses release the liquidity tied up in their accounts receivable. With financing from LSQ, a business can purchase more inventory, fill more orders, and take advantage of new growth opportunities. Our technology and data driven approach to providing working capital, along with our accounts receivable management services, allows our clients to driving business success.

Job Overview

LSQ is searching for a Data Scientist (Risk) to join our growing team of analytics experts. The hire will be responsible for building data driven tools to automate and scale risk decisions decision points include, fraud detection, commercial credit analysis, and invoice payment behavior. The ideal candidate is an experienced researcher and data wrangler who enjoys applying complex theories to solve real world business problems. The Data Scientist will need to collaborate effectively with both technical (engineers, data experts) and non-technical (business users) colleagues to bring the data to life.

Responsibilities of Data Scientist (Risk)
We have 20+ years of real-world commercial data weve observed businesses and their interactions with other businesses across market cycles, industries, and catastrophic events. Build risk tools that optimize for velocity and scale.
Build risk tools that optimize science & art you will work with risk experts who have been in the trenches (and learned from losses). Augment human decisions with machine.
Lay the foundation for scale. A data science framework for optimal data acquisition, model training and deployment. Dont take short-cuts. Bring quantitative and statistical rigor to your body of work.
Lead by example. You are joining a data team at ground-level. Building and inserting a data team, into a 20+ year old company (organism) will be hard, but rewarding.
Qualifications for Risk Data Scientist
Curiosity, Grit, and Humility
5+ years of experience of hands-on data science role
Previous experience of building commercial finance risk tools should be beneficial, but not required
Bachelor or Masters degree in Data Science, Operations Research, Computer Science, Industrial Engineering, Statistics, or another quantitative field
A toolkit of modern data science techniques
Experience with any data science tools/packages: Python, R, SAS, XGBoost, TensorFlow, NLTK
Experience with any big data tools: Hadoop, Spark, Kafka, Data Bricks
Experience with any reporting tools: Tableau Server, Power BI, SSRS, Excel
Experience with any AWS cloud services: EC2, EMR, RDS, Redshift, Aurora, S3
Experience with any Stream-processing systems: Storm, Spark-Streaming
Position Type and Expected Hours of Work:

This is a full-time position. Days and hours of work are Monday through Friday, 8:00 a.m. to 5 p.m. Occasional evening and weekend work may be required as job duties demand.

Physical Demands:

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and use hands to finger, handle, or feel. The employee is frequently required to reach with hands and arms and talk or hear. The employee is occasionally required to stand; walk and stoop, kneel, crouch.

Travel:

There will be minimal travel required for this position.

LSQ is an Equal Opportunity Employer that does not discriminate on the basis of actual or perceived, race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy and gender identity), sexual orientation, parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service, any other non-merit based factor or any other characteristic protected by applicable federal, state or local laws. Our leadership team is dedicated to this policy with respect to recruitment, hiring, placement, promotion, transfer, training, compensation, benefits, employee activities and general treatment during employment. If youd like more information about your EEO rights as an applicant under the law, please click here http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/poster.cfm",4.5,"LSQ
4.5","Orlando, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
154,General Software Engineer,$72k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are looking for junior software engineers for the AI innovation team in Baidu USA. Our AI innovation team targets the next generation of multimedia production with the help of AI. We've released our first production Vidpress, which gained lots of attention from the public. We evolved from a research project to a commercial online service provider. As we move along, we need more passionate engineers to join our dev force. Here are some perspectives we are looking for:

Qualifications:
1 to 2 years of experience as a software engineer or related experience
Solid coding skills in Python/C++ or both
Masters or higher degree in CS or related field
Experience with containers (docker) a plus
Experience with Kubernetes or other cluster operation system a plus
Experience with machine learning a plus
Experience with NLP/CV a plus
Mandarin speaker a plus
You will be working on:
Video production platform's stability and scalability
Online service architecture update and enhancement
Debug cluster issues
Continually discover, evaluate, and implement new ways to maximize development and execution efficiency
Culture Fit:
Mission alignment: If you want to be part of a team to accomplish this great mission, we will provide you the best possible platform to do that.
Self­-directed: We work best with people that are driven, motivated, and aspire to greatness. Are you the sort of person that, if you had time on your hands, will independently find interesting and useful things to do?
Hungry to learn: We are eager to see you learn new skills and grow. But learning is hard work and this is something we hope you want to do.
Team orientation: We work in small, fast­-moving teams. We don't believe in lone wolves. We watch out for each other and go after big goals together as a team.",4.2,"Baidu USA
4.2","Sunnyvale, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
155,Radar System Analysis Engineer,-1,"*Radar System Analysis Engineer* SEG is seeking a Radar System Analysis Engineer to be part of a team providing support for U.S. Surface Navy (e.g. Aegis Baseline) programs and Missile Defense Agency (MDA) Ballistic Missile Defense System (BMDS) projects *Responsibilities*: * Characterize sensor performance against threat ballistic and cruise missiles through modeling, simulation and analysis using digital simulations. * Develop, integrate and use analytical models and tools to test new threat data and software products, assess system capability, and drive system requirements and design. * Define technical approach and plan studies based on understanding of engineering community and appreciation of customer need. Define study measures of performance and effectiveness, design experiments, and demonstrate analytical skills. Conduct individual analyses, and contribute to team technical studies. * Communicate with external customer and internal technical staff, via correspondence and briefings. * Support technical leadership for internal project and contribute in external customer forums. * Author technical details of statements of work * A majority of the work is based out of our Columbia, MD office. Travel is occasionally required to participate in technical forums and reviews. * Local travel anticipated at 10 percent and occasional overnight trips at 5 percent time. *Required Skills: * * Ability to obtain and maintain a US DoD SECRET clearance * Bachelor’s Degree: Systems Engineering, Electrical, Physics, Applied Math or related technical degree. * 5-7 years work experience * Systems engineering experience * Experience with sensors, seekers, or remote sensing in RF and IR bands. * Strong analytical skills * Programming and scripting experience in a Linux environment * Communication, documentation and briefing via Microsoft office products (Outlook, Powerpoint, Excel, Word) *Desired Qualifications: * * Active US DoD SECRET or TOP SECRET Security Clearance * Masters or PhD degree preferred with relevant research project experience * MATLAB for the visual display of quantitative information, and prototyping M&S codes * Python for modeling and simulation development, data analysis, etc. * Facility working with C++ API and creating test drivers * Self-starter – Demonstrate independent ownership of tasking. Position affords opportunity to define path and lead tasks based on technical understanding of engineering community and appreciation of customer needs * Modeling and analysis experience and capability in one or more of the following areas: * RF Sensors / EO-IR Imaging / Remote Sensing Systems – Signal Processing, Detection and Track Filtering * Multi-Sensor Data Fusion, Target Classification and Discrimination (Machine Learning / AI applications) * Missile Systems (Aerodynamic, Ballistic, Space) * Defense Weapon System Performance (e.g. Navy Surface systems, Ballistic Missile Defense systems) * Ground Test and Field Test Events (missile flight and sensor track pre-event prediction and post-mission assessment) * Familiarity with version-control (Git), issue tracking (JIRA), collaboration software (Confluence), and cross-language software integration tools (SWIG). * Familiarity with high-performance computing environments *Systems Group Overview: * * Candidate will be part of a team responsible for weapon system simulation and performance analysis. The team develops and integrates individual system models for analysis (threats, weapons, sensors) to include multiple interacting systems. This team contributes to defining, leading and performing analyses for requirements feasibility, sensitivity studies for threat variability and fidelity, asset planning and what-if scenarios, flight-test mission (requirements, planning, and analysis) support and certification efforts. * The group provides independent verification and validation support for internal system-level products. This offers opportunities to work with SEG sensors, vehicles, phenomenology products and engineers integrated within our simulation software development environment to view the battle environment scenes through the eyes of combat systems. * The group includes subject matter experts and technical leads providing direct technical support to various defense programs as a contributing member of broad cross-functional and technical subject-specific integrated product teams. * We bring threat and weapons knowledge together to support concept definition, threat driver assessments, system requirements, design reviews, test planning, and defining road maps for future development *Company Overview* Systems Engineering Group, Inc. (SEG) is a highly regarded and leading provider of missile systems engineering and analysis. Principal customers include the U.S. Navy, Missile Defense Agency, AEGIS Ballistic Missile Defense Program, and Program Executive Offices for Integrated Warfare Systems and Ships. SEG is headquartered in Columbia, MD and is convenient to routes 32, 29, and 95. SEG is a wholly owned subsidiary of Telephonics Corporation. SEG provides excellent benefits, work environment and outstanding growth opportunities. We are an Affirmative Action / Equal Employment Opportunity Employer (M/F/D/V). All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, gender, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status or any other protected characteristic. Reasonable accommodations may include but are not limited to that which may enable individuals with disabilities and special disabled veterans to perform the essential functions of this position. Job Type: Full-time Benefits: * 401(k) * 401(k) matching * Dental insurance * Flexible spending account * Health insurance * Life insurance * Paid time off * Referral program * Tuition reimbursement * Vision insurance Schedule: * Monday to Friday Experience: * systems engineer: 5 years (Required) Education: * Bachelor's (Required) License: * Secret Clearance (Preferred) This Company Describes Its Culture as: * Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused * Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture * Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative Benefit Conditions: * Waiting period may apply Work Remotely: * No",-1,Systems Engineering Group,"Columbia, MD",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Commercial Equipment Repair & Maintenance,"Construction, Repair & Maintenance",Less than $1 million (USD),-1
156,Data Scientist,Employer Provided Salary:$80k-$120k,"About ClearCut Analytics
ClearCut was founded in Chicago with the mission of revolutionizing strategic decision-making by the world's leading brands through data-powered business intelligence. With a focus on the Amazon marketplace, ClearCut provides a vast array of sales analytics to equip brands with the information they need to maximize their value.


Data Scientist Job Description
ClearCut Analytics is looking for an innovative, solutions-oriented Data Scientist to join our fast-paced company and growing Analytics & Product Development team. The Data Scientist will play a key role in our company’s growth through building a highly scalable infrastructure that allows our team to develop data-driven solutions to solve complex business challenges. The ideal candidate is passionate about technology, loves collaborating to solve a wide variety of challenges and interesting use cases. This role will report to ClearCut’s Chief Technology Officer.
Responsibilities
Helping to build and drive the Data Science and Analytics roadmap
Leveraging data to drive business solutions for clients that are presented through ClearCut’s SaaS platform
Performing data collection, as well as developing custom models and algorithms to apply to data sets
Using predictive modeling to increase and optimize business operations, customer experience, revenue generation, and other business outcomes
Processing, cleansing, and verifying the integrity of data used for modeling and analysis, while enhancing processes and tools used to monitor model performance and input data
Developing machine learning models and productizing AI-based solutions alongside product and development team
Ideating new data-related concepts and applications then overseeing projects through deployment
Taking end-to-end ownership of problem domains and continuously improving upon quantitative solutions
Requirements
MS or Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, CS/Engineering, or similar field
4+ years of professional experience in an analytics and data science environment utilizing quantitative analytics methodologies, experience in a SaaS or eCommerce environment a plus
Experience writing programs/queries with data analysis tools and languages such as Python, R, SAS, AMPL, SQL, or Alteryx
Hands-on experience with multivariate analytic techniques: linear and logistic regression, decision tree, cluster and factor analysis, time-series forecasting methods, SVM models, and/or neural networks
Understanding of broad business principles and the ability to create solutions for real-world challenges
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment
Eagerness to learn and grow",4.8,"ClearCut Analytics
4.8","Chicago, IL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
157,COMPUTER SCIENTIST - ENGINEER - RESEARCH ENGINEER - PERFORMANCE METROLOGY,$58k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:


Join our Intelligent Systems Division! As a member of the team, you will help develop creative solutions for existing and next-generation technologies for healthcare applications using advanced modeling, artificial intelligence and machine learning. This role entails frequent interaction with technical clients and colleagues to understand requirements and constraints of the task objectives. Operate in various phases of the system lifecycle, including applied research, requirements generation, design, implementation, testing, integration, installation, and documentation.


Education/Experience:


Must have a BS, Masters or Ph.D. in Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, Biomedical Engineering, Aerospace Engineering, Mechanical Engineering or other related disciplines. Must have at least a 3.25 GPA. Must have course work or experience in more than one of the following: image and video processing, high performance computing including GPUs, network and routing protocols, logic programming and knowledge representation, machine learning/artificial intelligence, software development, signal processing; communications and RF. Strong software skills required. Experience in C++, C#, and/or Python preferred. Experience with Linux, real-time operating systems, multithreaded programming, and/or networking/socket programming is a plus. An interest and/or experience in working with hardware a plus. Excellent verbal and written communication skills required. Must be able to work in project team environments and independently. Must have excellent problem-solving skills, be self-motivated, and be driven by challenging problems. Must have good organizational skills and attention to detail with an aptitude for continuous learning and leadership potential. A valid/clear driver's license is required.


Special Requirements:


Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Intelligent Systems home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.1,"Southwest Research Institute
4.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
158,Data Scientist in Artificial Intelligence - Intermediate,$59k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"*Organization and Job ID**
Job ID: 311093

Directorate: National Security Directorate

Division: Computing and Analytics

Group: Data Sciences and Analytics
*Job Description**
Do you want to create a legacy of meaningful research for the greater good? Do you want to lead and contribute to work in support of an organization that addresses some of todays most challenging problems that face our Nation? Do you want to work with engaging and collaborative teams? Then join us in the Data Sciences and Analytics Group at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL)!

For more than 50 years, PNNL has advanced the frontiers of science and engineering in the service of our nation and the world in the areas of energy, the environment and national security. PNNL is committed to advancing the state-of-the-art in artificial intelligence through applied machine learning and deep learning to support scientific discovery and our sponsors missions. Help us advance this frontier and protect our nation!

Data science at the Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) addresses critical national and global issues by applying scientific and mathematical techniques to multiple data sources and communicating the finding to our sponsors and the academic community. This position requires thought leadership and technical depth to support the sponsors of PNNLs National Security Directorate in the development and advancement of data science and deep learning research. Research of interest includes the development, implementation, and resulting analyses of national security capabilities related to geo-spatial analytics, AI assurance, adversarial machine learning, human language technologies, computer vision, disaster response and recovery, health security, and other related fields.

The data scientist in artificial intelligence should have the following attributes:

+ Familiar with existing deep learning libraries (e.g., TensorFlow, PyTorch, Caffe2) and machine learning packages (i.e. sklearn)

+ Experience applying machine learning and artificial intelligence to domain specific applications, such as geospatial intelligence, natural language processing, few-shot learning, adversarial machine learning, social computing, computer vision, etc.

+ Ability to contribute that knowledge to the academic and research strength of PNNL and have experience writing scientific publications demonstrating their insight and discovery.

+ Publication record in scientific conferences such as NIPS, ICML, ICLR, KDD, CVPR, ICCV, ECCV, ACL, ICWSM, EMNLP, NAACL, EACL, COLING, and SIGIR is preferred

This position will require interactions with Government, military, and industry officials nationwide for a variety of programs, projects, and tasks, including technical and programmatic concept development, planning, coordination, integration, and execution that can be supported by data science and deep learning techniques.
*Minimum Qualifications**
+ Bachelor's degree with 2 years of experience, a Masters degree with 0-2 years of experience, or a PhD with 0 years of experience is required.
*Preferred Qualifications**
+ Active Federal Q Clearance and ability to maintain such clearance.
*Equal Employment Opportunity**
Battelle Memorial Institute (BMI) at Pacific Northwest National Laboratory (PNNL) is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and supports diversity in the workplace. All employment decisions are made without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, marital or family status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or genetic information. All BMI staff must be able to demonstrate the legal right to work in the United States. BMI is an E-Verify employer. Learn more at jobs.pnnl.gov.
*_Please be aware that the Department of Energy (DOE) prohibits DOE employees and contractors from participation in certain foreign government talent recruitment programs. If you are offered a position at PNNL and are currently a participant in a foreign government talent recruitment program you will be required to disclose this information before your first day of employment._**
*Other Information**
This position requires the ability to obtain and maintain a federal security clearance.

Requirements:
U.S. Citizenship
Background Investigation: Applicants selected will be subject to a Federal background investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified matter in accordance 10 CFR 710, Appendix B.
Drug Testing: All Security Clearance (L or Q) positions will be considered by the Department of Energy to be Testing Designated Positions which means that they are subject to applicant, random, and for cause drug testing. In addition, applicants must be able to demonstrate non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for the 12 consecutive months preceding completion of the requisite Questionnaire for National Security Positions (QNSP).
Note: Applicants will be considered ineligible for security clearance processing by the U.S. Department of Energy until non-use of illegal drugs, including marijuana, for 12 consecutive months can be demonstrated.

_Directorate:_ _National Security_

_Job Category:_ _Computation and Information Sciences_

_Group:_ _Data Sciences & Analytics_

_Opening Date:_ _2020-08-23_

_Closing Date:_ _2020-11-21_",4.0,"PNNL
4.0","Seattle, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1965,Government,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
159,"Software Engineer, Ads",$94k-$179k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

Wish is a mobile e-commerce platform that flips traditional shopping on its head. We connect hundreds of millions of people with the widest selection of delightful, surprising, and—most importantly—affordable products delivered directly to their doors. Each day on Wish, millions of customers in more than 160 countries around the world discover new products. For our over 1 million merchant partners, anyone with a good idea and a mobile phone can instantly tap into a global market.

We're fueled by creating unique products and experiences that give people access to a new type of commerce, where all are welcome. If you’ve been searching for a supportive environment to chase your curiosity and use data to investigate the questions that matter most to you, this is the place.

Job Description

Wish is looking for smart, curious and analytical Software Engineers to join the Ads Engineering team. The Ads Engineering team is data-driven and moves extremely fast to solve interesting and unusually challenging problems across the stack. The ideal candidate has experience shipping high quality code and designing systems that work with large amounts of data to make huge impact. You will have opportunities to implement your own ideas and ship code on a daily basis to maximize the efficiency of Wish's billion dollar ads marketing budgets through rigorous design and analysis. Join our team and learn more about why Wish is one of the world's top 10 largest advertisers on Facebook and Google.

What you'll be doing:
Write code that impacts how Wish spends millions of dollars everyday
Be involved in Python development across the stack, whether it’s improving our bidding algorithms, ad recommendations, deployment and monitoring systems, or data pipelines
Tightly integrate with APIs and build tools to bulk update, create, delete and pull data for hundreds of thousands of ads
Explore huge data sets, write SQL and perform data analysis in order to validate and implement your own ideas
Perform attribution, design A/B tests, and measure the effectiveness of the code you write
Partner with Product Engineering and Operations teams to identify trends and opportunities and build solutions.
Have the opportunity to work full stack with an emphasis on the projects that are interesting to you while still producing meaningful impact for the business and our KPIs
Qualifications
Excited to learn and grow despite your many years of experience
Smart, curious, rigorous and diligentBS in computer science or equivalent degrees with industry experience.
Excellent software design skill with experience in Python, Go, and/or Java
Experience in SQL or other query languages.
Strong background in one or more of the following areas: machine learning, recommendation system, search ranking, or data mining
Passionate about working with large amounts of data and ability to translate insights into business recommendations.
Experience with different big data frameworks, including Hadoop, Presto, MapReduce, and/or distributed systems.
Ad tech experience is a plus
Additional Information

Wish values diversity and is committed to creating an inclusive work environment. We provide equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees. We do not discriminate based on any legally-protected class or characteristic. Employment decisions are made based on qualifications, merit, and business needs. If you need assistance or accommodation due to a disability, please let your recruiter know. For job positions in San Francisco, CA, and other locations where required, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Individuals applying for positions at Wish, including California residents, can see our privacy policy here.",3.5,"Wish
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Other Retail Stores,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
160,"Machine Learning Engineer, Marketing Analytics",$50k-$91k (Glassdoor Est.),"Ibotta is seeking a Machine Learning Engineer to help build a targeted, personalized, high performing Marketing engine that drives our company's mission to make every purchase rewarding for millions of consumers. We're looking for a machine learning engineer who has a passion for building scalable machine learning solutions using technologies such as Python, Spark, AWS, Airflow, Sagemaker, PyTorch, etc. Every member of the team has input into our analytics strategy and will have a real impact on Marketing decisions and performance.

What you will be doing:
Embrace and uphold Ibotta's Core Values: Integrity, Boldness, Outhustle, Teamwork, Transparency & A good idea can come from anywhere
Design, develop and deploy large scale, big data-driven machine learning models that are integrated with key product features. Some examples of potential projects include:
Building/scaling ML related infrastructure to help streamline the development, evaluation, deployment, and re-usability of core ML features and services
A/B testing. Ability to distinguish the signal from the noise in order to drive business decisions, and iteratively improve performance from new/existing marketing campaigns
Using experiments to build uplift models that decide optimal treatments at the user level
Collaborate with Engineering and Analytics leads to establish analytic standards and platforms that scale and can be leveraged in various initiatives throughout the organization
Deliver world class products in partnership with cross functional teams (Product Managers, Data Engineers, Software Engineers, etc.)
Communicate complex machine learning solutions, concepts and the results of analyses in a clear and effective manner to business stakeholders and technology leaders to maximize the effectiveness of machine learning initiatives
What we are looking for:
2+ years of professional experience as a Machine Learning Engineer, Data Scientist, or equivalent role, focusing on machine learning, statistical modeling, and/or ML infrastructure
Proficiency in Python
Experience working with machine learning frameworks (e.g. scikit-learn, xgboost, PyTorch, TensorFlow) and distributed big-data tools (Spark, Hive)
Experience working with version control systems (e.g. git) and CI/CD for machine learning pipelines
Ability to communicate complex, technical machine learning implementations to diverse audiences
Ability to think critically and leverage domain expertise to build machine learning powered applications that help to achieve high-level business objectives
About Us:

Built in Denver, CO, Ibotta (""I bought a..."") is a free mobile shopping app that gives users cash back on groceries and more. Through our partnerships with brands and retailers like Procter & Gamble, Kraft Heinz, Kellogg, Amazon, Walmart, Target and Uber, we've delivered over $750 million in cumulative cash rewards to our Savers. Guided by our values and our mission to make every purchase rewarding, we come to work energized by the business problems we get to solve, the technology we get to build, and the people we get to innovate (and have fun) with. Ibotta made Inc.'s 2020 list of the 5000 fastest-growing private companies in the U.S. for the third consecutive year. In 2019, we became the first mobile consumer technology company in Colorado to achieve $1B in valuation.

To learn more about what our Tech teams are doing day to day, visit Building Ibotta on Medium.com.

Additional Details:
This position is located in Denver, CO and includes competitive pay, benefits package (including medical, dental, vision), 401k, and equity.
Ibotta is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Ibotta's employment decisions are made without regard with race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other legally protected status
Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States on a full-time basis.
For the security of our employees and the business, all employees are responsible for the secure handling of data in accordance with our security policies, identifying and reporting phishing attempts, as well as reporting security incidents to the proper channels.",3.6,"Ibotta
3.6","Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
161,Machine Learning Engineer,$54k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Machine Learning Engineer
10835
Phoenix, AZ
7/13/2020 11:11:00 AM

IT
Contractor - W2

Job Description
Job Description – Python/ML – Senior Engineer/ Architect

Site Reliability engineering portfolio consists of several mission critical americanexpress.com applications. Web engineering enterprise applications are highly available applications, maintains high (~99.999%) availability in an extremely high throughput transactional system with strict performance requirements. Primary focus of the Site Reliability Engineering team is to conceptualize, design, develop and implement observability related frameworks/common components, instrumenting observability tools for enterprise that will ensure high application reliability, scalability, availability and performance of the Web applications. Site reliability team is embarking on a transformation journey to implement “Automation first” approach in Service Delivery and Site Reliability Engineering space.

What you will be doing:
Conceptualize and implement Machine Learning driven Site Reliability Engineering Framework/Components to improve predictive monitoring and driving SRE team’s journey towards “Automation First” approach
Research latest technology, concepts, conceptualize solution and develop proof of concept that will improve resiliency and performance of the production infrastructure. Design and implement innovative solution/framework that will improve software engineering velocity, infrastructure resiliency and security, and data availability
Develop observability related common framework components (to be leveraged by enterprise applications), define standards for configuration, monitoring, reliability and performance engineering


Qualifications:
A BS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, other Technical discipline, or equivalent work experience
5 + years of experience in Python with emphasis on machine learning
Hands on experience with – Spark, Splunk, Pandas, Numpy, and Scikit-learn
Experience in designing mission critical highly available enterprise applications
Strong knowledge of Linux internals and experience managing Linux systems in high traffic environments
Strong knowledge of machine learning, mathematical modeling, R, and statistics
Strong interpersonal communication skills and the ability to work well in a diverse team-focused environment
5+ years of experience with building Rest APIs, API Integration, and Web Services is preferred
Knowledge of server-side technologies such as WebSphere, JBose, NodeJS is preferred

Job Requirements
Job Description – Python/ML – Senior Engineer/ Architect

Site Reliability engineering portfolio consists of several mission critical americanexpress.com applications. Web engineering enterprise applications are highly available applications, maintains high (~99.999%) availability in an extremely high throughput transactional system with strict performance requirements. Primary focus of the Site Reliability Engineering team is to conceptualize, design, develop and implement observability related frameworks/common components, instrumenting observability tools for enterprise that will ensure high application reliability, scalability, availability and performance of the Web applications. Site reliability team is embarking on a transformation journey to implement “Automation first” approach in Service Delivery and Site Reliability Engineering space.

What you will be doing:
Conceptualize and implement Machine Learning driven Site Reliability Engineering Framework/Components to improve predictive monitoring and driving SRE team’s journey towards “Automation First” approach
Research latest technology, concepts, conceptualize solution and develop proof of concept that will improve resiliency and performance of the production infrastructure. Design and implement innovative solution/framework that will improve software engineering velocity, infrastructure resiliency and security, and data availability
Develop observability related common framework components (to be leveraged by enterprise applications), define standards for configuration, monitoring, reliability and performance engineering


Qualifications:
A BS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering, other Technical discipline, or equivalent work experience
5 + years of experience in Python with emphasis on machine learning
Hands on experience with – Spark, Splunk, Pandas, Numpy, and Scikit-learn
Experience in designing mission critical highly available enterprise applications
Strong knowledge of Linux internals and experience managing Linux systems in high traffic environments
Strong knowledge of machine learning, mathematical modeling, R, and statistics
Strong interpersonal communication skills and the ability to work well in a diverse team-focused environment
5+ years of experience with building Rest APIs, API Integration, and Web Services is preferred
Knowledge of server-side technologies such as WebSphere, JBose, NodeJS is preferred",3.8,"IntraEdge
3.8","Phoenix, AZ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
162,SQL Engineer Tier 3,-1,"SQL ENGINEER – TIER 3

Join one of the fastest growing companies in America.

US Cloud added to the Inc 5000 List – ranking of private companies with the most proven track records.

To see our US Cloud blog page, click here.

Our 100% USA-based, never-outsourced Microsoft Premier Support engineers are the engine that drives US Cloud. And if you want to be recognized and work with the best of the best, our Premier Support team is for you. Engineering at US Cloud isn’t a cost center, it’s a profit center. New engineers coming over from the enterprise or MSP’s are surprised at how different it feels to be the lifeblood of a company vs. an ancillary support service. Simply put, our engineers are corporate IT’s first-responders and we give them the credit and respect they deserve each time they save the day for one of our clients.

US Cloud engineers get the most challenging questions from savvy clients like NASA, Garmin, American Cancer Society, L.L.Bean, Bayer, and the US State Department, to name just a few -- all of them depending on us to underpin their Microsoft environments and keep them running. When they can’t fix it, they call US Cloud.

ABOUT US CLOUD

Our simple mission is to liberate businesses shackled to mediocre, overpriced, and monopolistic Microsoft Support. As a Microsoft Certified Partner for 20+ years, Fpweb.net and CyberVault, now US Cloud, has supported 1,000’s of Microsoft clients in over 80 countries.

With recent and dramatic changes in Microsoft’s strategy, the demand for high-quality, cost-effective 3rd-party product support has erupted. Simply put, we need more hands-on deck to help manage our current growth and to make the most of this intensifying trend.

WHY JOIN US CLOUD?

Snacks, coffee and gym memberships are great, but what typically gets our engineers excited is learning new things. By design we team folks across technologies, so they cross-pollinate and share information daily – no product silos here. We move engineers in and out of team pods so they don’t get stale. Our engineers knowledge-share via catered lunches and training seminars on hot technologies like Cloud, Artificial Intelligence, and Machine Learning.

Plus, opportunities to progress in your career go hand-in-hand with rapidly growing companies. Our team members have more opportunities to shift concentrations, tackle new technologies, or step into leadership roles as our business continues to expand. And because our engineers are at the apex of our company’s focus, you also have a voice – to weigh in and make US Cloud the future you want.

*Must be a subject matter expert in: all things SQL server, On-Prem and Cloud, Administration and Development.

RESPONSIBILITIES
As a Premier Support Engineer, your focus will be to represent US Cloud in communications via onsite, phone, email, and web to assist clients and partners in deploying, operating and troubleshooting Microsoft technologies such as Windows server and desktop, Office 365, Azure, SharePoint, Exchange, SQL, Skype, System Center and Dynamics. You will have the opportunity to foster positive client relationships while effectively managing challenging situations and driving client success.

Your key business metrics will be to:
Obtain high client and partner onboarding and ticket satisfaction
Drive client success and adoption of Microsoft technologies
Reduce time/cost to onboard and resolve tickets
Provide high quality data to help drive service improvement
Support Management – 50%
Serve as an escalation point for client tickets.
Participate in proactive account management, spot performance issues, analyze problems, develop solutions to meet client needs, represent them.
Provides the most effective method of service delivery by analyzing trends and common themes across clients.
Create deliverables to address common Premier client needs & support mobile-first, cloud-first strategy, share intellectual property with others.
Engages in strategic service delivery planning to strengthen targeted client relationships.
Gathers client impressions of products and services and integrates this feedback into decision making.
Seeks information about the underlying needs of clients.
Allocates and aligns resources to optimize the client experience.
Develops and communicates realistic performance goals and standards.
Builds plans that consider potential obstacles and immediate and long-term consequences.
Demonstrates expertise in a specific solution, or several products, feature functions, or services.
Provides stakeholder assistance throughout deployment to avoid/resolve technical issues.
Support Execution – Deliver Results through Teamwork & Optimizing Business Results – 35%
Seeks opportunities to drive business results by collaborating with multiple team members.
Identifies opportunities to articulate business value and grow client/partner relationships in alignment with US Cloud business priorities.
Provides and drives actionable feedback across groups about the client/partner experience and competitor threats.
Modifies existing intellectual property (IP) or, where applicable, creates new content.
Leadership and Growing the Business - 15%
Consistently apply “lessons learned”, model personal accountability & teamwork.
Demonstrates an understanding of his or her role and contribution to client change management and adoption initiatives.
Understands client requirements and can map the adoption and optimization of Microsoft technology solutions accordingly.
Contribute & participate with meetings to articulate Premier offerings to all clients; share knowledge thru communities, adapt for clients.
Cultivates relationships, credibility, and loyalty with clients and partners intentionally by sharing relevant business expertise.
Demonstrated self-learner.
QUALIFICATIONS

Experience:
5+ years’ supporting Microsoft SQL databases systems (on-premise and cloud)
2+ years’ supporting/maintaining SQL Server Database system (RDMS technologies and/or SQL language)
Proficient in SQL Server, Azure Database, Azure Managed Instance, Azure Virtual Machines
Experience with SQL Reporting Services. Experience with Power BI Report Server and Power BI Paginated Reports a plus
Strong knowledge of hypervisor and infrastructure API technologies, private and public infrastructure solutions (Azure, VMware, Hyper-V)
Skilled in Performance tuning, high availability (HA) and Disaster Recovery (DR) options
Scripting experience (Powershell, Power CLI, Javascript)
8+ years’ experience in Microsoft technologies
5+ years’ experience in Windows Server
Experience in Active Directory/Azure AD, and DNS
Relevant certifications in Microsoft technologies
Technical proficiency in and learning attitude towards Microsoft and related technologies
Proven ability to work virtually
Communication Skills – Spoken and written English (including technical writing)
Analytical problem solving
Education: Bachelor’s degree in computer science, engineering, math, or equivalent.

Prior Roles: Technical consulting experience, or support experience in a second or third tier.

What it’s Like to Work at US Cloud:

US Cloud has the personality of a high-growth start-up, but we’re built on 20+ years as a successful Microsoft service provider. That brings financial stability and consistency of purpose not seen in most entrepreneurial organizations.

At US Cloud, we focus on fostering a happy place for you to thrive. Besides offering full benefits (medical, dental, etc.), we provide things like:
Flextime
Paid gym membership
Dog friendly offices
Free Starbucks, soft drinks, and snacks
Fun company events
We are also getting ready to move into our new home –50,000 sq.ft. of office space in Des Peres we own and are building out as a state-of-the-art tech services hub and US Cloud HQ. We are all working from home right now but anticipate being in our new digs this winter.

US Cloud is an equal opportunity employer and we value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, dietary preferences, gender, sexual orientation, age, fashion sense, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or political leanings. Come as you are.",4.1,"US Cloud
4.1","Town and Country, MO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1996,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
163,Data Scientist active TS/SCI,$83k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are currently seeking an innovative, experienced, and highly-skilled Data Scientist to join our growing Advanced Analytics team in Ft. Belvoir, VA. In this role, you will create and develop custom solutions for our users in a collaborative, fast-paced, state-of-the art environment. To be successful in this role, you will be thorough, creative, and exceptionally well-skilled in all phases of the development lifecycle, with a passion for continued learning and collaboration.
*This position is located in Ft. Belvoir, VA and requires an active TS/SCI clearance*

The Data Scientist will:
Demonstrate the ability to frame and scale data problems to analyze, visualize, and find data solutions.
Manipulate common data formats, including comma-delimited, text files, and JSON.
Transform data and analysis into informative visualizations and interactive dashboards using open-source and commercially available tools.
Derive insights and analytic narratives from data and visualizations for effective storytelling and clear communication in response to client research questions.
Establish data science pipelines.
Develop, train, test, deploy, and sustain AI and machine learning models.
Leverage data patterns and other development methods to optimize code and reduce computational cost.
Develop front-end interfaces to facilitate usage of developed AI/ML solutions
Work in a fast-paced, solutions-oriented environment focused on client deliverables, analysis, and reporting.

Active TS/SCI clearance
Bachelor’s degree in data science, mathematics, statistics, economics, computer science, engineering, or a related business or quantitative discipline strongly preferred. Master's degree in these disciplines preferred.
Experience working with Scala, Python, Java
5-10+ years of related experience required
Advanced data science experience required
Significant experience with databases
Experience and familiarity with Agile-Scrum software development
Experience gathering and decomposing requirements
Proven record of solution development and deployment
Familiarity with web based application development
Experience with testing, use case, and user stories
Outstanding communication skills, written and verbal
Highly-organized and able to manage multiple projects simultaneously
Team-player mentality with a positive attitude
Keen attention to detail and solid analytical skills
Able to articulate complex, abstract concepts concisely and effectively
#LI-SH1

LMI is an Equal Opportunity Employer-all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin.",4.3,"LMI
4.3","Fort Belvoir, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1961,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
164,Lead Software Engineer,-1,"Senseye is revolutionizing the interface between technology and human cognition. Through breakthroughs in computer vision, we are pioneering new human-machine interfaces and making the impossible possible. We are a diverse group of people with a broad range of backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives who have a lot of work ahead of us to realize our vision.

What we’re looking for:

We are looking for a Lead Software Engineer who likes to learn new technologies and write clean, testable code for a wide variety of applications. You enjoy creating programs, but are thorough in your design and documentation, and can easily communicate to the rest of the team how your code works. You’re looking for a position where you’ll be solving problems that are important in an environment that supports you and gives you the freedom to identify how you want to grow in your career in order to achieve it.

Responsibilities
Mentor and coach other engineers
Execute sprint planning and organize all aspects of the agile workflow
Use your Python knowledge to write and maintain safe, clean, and testable code.
Design unit/ functional tests and documentation for your code
Submit pull requests for new features and bug fixes and review other team members requests before integration
Learn and assist in the integration and delivery of our software
Stay sharp by finding ways to grow your knowledge and help us to continually improve.
Find ways to apply your adaptability and flexibility. We're a small group and need all the teamwork we can get to reach our goals.
Any other duties needed to help drive to our vision, fulfill our mission, and abide by our organization's values
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in engineering, computer science, mathematics, or alternate education & experience showcasing software engineer specific skills
Bonus: experience in three or more of the following: OpenCV, gRPC, NumPy, FFmpeg, Flask, React, CI/CD, AWS, Docker, K8s
Experience mentoring & teaching others
Experience building software in a collaborative team environment using version control such as Git, GitHub, Bitbucket, etc.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We are currently remote due to Covid-19.",4.8,"Senseye Inc.
4.8","Austin, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
165,Data Scientist,$60k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"We have an opportunity for a Data Scientist to join our talented Data Analytics team. The successful candidate will work with customers and the engagement team to support the project management, project data analysis, process improvement, data conversion, and integration needs of our federal customer.

Typical responsibilities include
Collecting large sets of structured and unstructured data from disparate sources.
Cleaning and validating data to ensure accuracy, completeness, and uniformity.
Analyzing data to identify patterns and trends.
Developing solutions and integrating, extending, and contributing to Open Source software
Devising and applying models and algorithms to mine the stores of big data.
Interpreting data to discover solutions and opportunities.
Requirements
Active Secret Clearance
Strong client engagement skills
Experience with languages such as Python, R, SAS, and SQL
Experience with version control systems, including Github or Gitlab
Experience with designing, developing, and deploying analytic software and algorithms
BS degree in Physics, Computer Science, Mathematics, or another quantitative discipline
Desired skills
Experience with open source Big Data tools including Apache Spark or Apache NiFi
Experience with entity resolution
Experience with Natural Language Processing using modern deep learning techniques
Benefits

Perks of working at NetImpact Strategies:
Your health comes first – we offer comprehensive medical, dental, & vision insurance that starts the first of the month after you join the team
Invest in your future – 401(k) Plan – Immediately vested employer contributions; no matching required
Work hard, play hard – we offer a generous Paid Time Off (PTO) policy and observe ALL ten (10) federal holidays
Pawsitively pawesome – Pet Insurance (because our little critters are part of our families, too!)
Invest in your education – Tuition reimbursement, internal training programs, & company-sponsored industry certifications
Be part of a dynamic and collaborative work environment recently ranked by The Washington Post as a Top Work Place in 2019!
Have fun and celebrate and give back – Team building activities, community volunteering, quarterly HQ days, & an offsite annual awards banquet
ABOUT US

NetImpact Strategies specializes in Strategy and Business Transformation, IT Modernization, Data-Driven Intelligence, Cloud Services, and Cybersecurity. We are a team of skilled Consultants who listen to our clients’ needs. We design and implement comprehensive, tailored solutions that are both mindful of the client's culture and organizational dynamics. As mission needs change, new priorities emerge, technologies advance, and methodologies evolve; NetImpact stands out as a trusted advisor that can solve the challenges of today while looking for the opportunities of tomorrow. Our professionals stay abreast of these changes to provide agile, outcome-focused results for federal agency strategic and tactical needs. Approaching engagements as a partner, we provide solutions that empower our clients to achieve results that align with their mission and strategic vision.

ACCESSIBILITY NOTE

NetImpact Strategies is committed to complying with all applicable provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act, as amended (“ADA”), and applicable state and local laws. It is NetImpact’s policy not to discriminate against any qualified person or applicant with regard to any terms or conditions of employment on the basis of such individual’s disability. Consistent with this policy of non-discrimination, NetImpact will provide reasonable accommodations to an individual with a disability, as defined in the ADA or applicable law, who has made NetImpact aware of his/her disability, unless doing so would cause undue hardship to NetImpact. If you are an applicant and need a reasonable accommodation when applying for job opportunities within NetImpact, or request a reasonable accommodation to utilize NetImpact’s online employment application, please contact careers@netimpactstrategies.com.

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

NetImpact is committed to the development of a creative, diverse, and inclusive work environment. In order to provide equal employment and advancement opportunities to all individuals, employment decisions at NetImpact will be based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. NetImpact does not discriminate against any person because of race, color, creed, religion, sex (including gender identity, sexual orientation, and pregnancy), marital status, national origin, disability, age, veteran status, genetic information or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, and local laws (referred to as ""protected status"").",4.2,"NetImpact Strategies
4.2","Vienna, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
166,Senior Data Scientist,$136k-$225k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview

Imagine if we could match patients with the treatments that prove the most effective for them . . .
GNS Healthcare applies a powerful form of AI called causal machine learning to predict which treatments and care management programs will work for which patients, improving individual patient outcomes and the health of populations while reducing the total cost of care.

Headquartered in the biotechnology and health IT center of Cambridge, MA, our patented REFS technology is based on recent breakthroughs in causal machine learning and AI that transforms massive quantities of patient data into computer models of disease at molecular, patient, and health system levels. These computer models power up solutions, products, and services that health plans, biopharmaceutical companies, health systems, and patient foundations utilize to slow disease progression, reduce adverse events and hospitalization, and improve therapeutic effectiveness. Our platforms and solutions have been validated across more than 45 diseases including oncology, cardiovascular and metabolic disease, autoimmune diseases, neurology, etc. and have appeared in over 50 peer-reviewed publications.

Position Summary

The Senior Data Scientist will join a dynamic team responsible for start-to-finish work on the analysis and interpretation of real-world datasets using GNSs powerful cloud-based analytics platform. We are looking for someone who thrives working in a fast-paced, exciting, and collaborative environment in one of the most cutting-edge industries where big data analytics meets healthcare. You will help manage real world data, as well as create and interpret data-frames for modeling and analysis. You will collaborate with our research scientists to carry out analysis projects using our proprietary, supercomputer-powered Bayesian network modeling and simulation platform, and will synthesize these results into meaningful reports for clients and product development.

Responsibilities
Collaborate with internal research teams and clients to evaluate study design, define research questions, design data frames, write statistical analysis plans/study protocols, conduct analyses, and participate in the full research process, including client presentation and publication
Communicate highly technical results and methods clearly to clients, discuss how to incorporate information into their processes, and achieve high client satisfaction
Troubleshoot with clients and internal stakeholders to refine and optimize models
Provide scientific communications to peer-reviewed journals and publications
Develop data frames of high complexity while adhering to a project-based timeline
Perform data manipulations and develop algorithms on multi-data sets that create the analytic files necessary to support analyses.
Consult on how to use data to perform predictive and causal modeling using both proprietary and off-the-shelf tools.
Qualifications

Minimum Qualifications:
Masters Degree in a quantitative discipline or equivalent practical experience
3-5 years of experience working with advanced ML techniques, probability theory, Bayesian analysis, or causal inference methods
Experience working with biomedical data/ population health data, EHR or claims data
Demonstrated experience working with programming languages R and SQL
Strong written and verbal communication; an ability to communicate technical material to non-technical audiences simply and clearly and collaborate well on a team
Strong drive for problem solving, especially around data frame construction and interpretation
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience working with large, complex, or unstructured data requiring post-processing to use effectively
Familiarity with the UNIX and cluster computing environment
Company Culture

Our philosophy at GNS is simple: we cannot transform healthcare with anything less than an all-star team. We are seeking smart, driven people who are experts in their field, have a track record of success and a passion for creating change. We believe that strong teams supercharge the performance of individuals, create a fun and dynamic workplace and great results for our clients and the people they serve.

We are passionate about our work and believe in the ability of our technology to change the world. Our core values of integrity, collaboration, value, diversity, and game-changing guide our behaviors with each other and our clients.

GNS offers competitive salaries, stock options, unlimited vacation, health, dental and vision insurance, life insurance, long-term disability, 401(k), generous parental leave, tuition reimbursement, professional development, subsidized parking and gym membership, tasty food, volunteering opportunities, social gatherings, and more.

Equal Employment Opportunity

GNS Healthcare provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender, gender identity or expression, age, veteran status, disability, pregnancy or conditions related to pregnancy, or genetics. In addition to federal law requirements, GNS Healthcare complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities.

Powered by JazzHR",3.0,"GNS Healthcare
3.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
167,Senior Software Engineer,$56k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"Senior Software Engineer

Rome, NY

Top Secret

National Security

Job Description

ENSCO, Inc., is seeking a Technical Lead (Senior Software Engineer) who has worked at or with the Air Force Research Laboratory in Rome, New York. Candidate must be willing to take a leading role to coordinating with the customer and lead the technical team to tackle challenging problems within the RF/Cyber domain. Responsibilities includes, but not limited to leading and/or conducting rapid Research & Development (R&D), design, prototyping, demonstration, scenario development, experimentation and evaluation, integration, testing, analyzing results/data, technical installation, and transition of software/hardware products.

Qualifications Required (Skills)

BS or equiv; min 5 yrs related exp
Must have experience working with the AFRL customer
Must have technical lead experience
Must have strong cyber background (analyze, prevention, and exploitation)
Must be comfortable with conducting oral presentations
Must have strong understanding of software development processes
Must have experience overseeing a software lifecycle
5+ years of software engineering experience
Extensive knowledge with RF and Cyber signal characteristics
Extensive experience in developing/delivering quality software using object-oriented languages
Experience in developing real-time signal processing algorithms
Experience full stack developer
Position requires applicant to work on site in Rome, NY
AN ACTIVE TOP SECRET SECURITY CLEARANCE IS REQUIRED TO BE CONSIDERED FOR THIS POSITION
Qualifications Desired

PMP
Familiar with machine learning and artificial intelligence methodologies
Experience in automated builds tools
Worked on and/or lead Agile development teams (Scrum, Kanban)
#LI-KM1

Req ID

1948BR

Internal Position Title

Sr. Software Engineer

Employment Status

Regular Full-time

General Education/Years of Experience

BS or equiv; min 5 yrs related exp

U.S. Citizenship

Yes

Background Check Type

7 year

Drug Screen Type

None

Export Control and Licensing

None

Contract Award Contingency

Yes

Recruiter

Kierra McDonald

Division Description

The National Security Solutions (NSS) Division provides security solutions for the United States government. NSS employees offer a multi-disciplinary approach to solve some of the most challenging technical problems in complex operational environments. Our areas of expertise are in sensor development and integration; chemical, biological and geophysical phenomenology; software applications and modeling; and operational applications of technology.

Key customers include the Department of Homeland Security, the Department of Defense, and the Intelligence Community.

Strength in Diversity

ENSCO, Inc. and its wholly owned U.S. subsidiaries are equal opportunity/affirmative action employers, committed to diversity in the workplace. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status, or any other protected characteristic under state or local law.",3.6,"ENSCO, Inc.
3.6","Rome, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
168,Artificial Intelligence/Machine Learning Data Scientist,$68k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The Aviation Safety & Analysis department is individuals with interest in applying their data science skills to deep and challenging problems in the aviation domain. We have a treasure trove of data including time series, text and sensor data and challenging problems to solve. We are seeking skills in machine learning, deep learning, text mining, big data and software/application development.

If Sklearn, pyTorch, Keras,TensorFlow, LSTM, LDA, anomaly detection, entity extraction, summarization mean something to you, we want to talk to you. You are not required to have skills in all of these but should have hands-on skill in at least one area and the ability to dive deep in the data, and learn the necessary skills to get the job done.

The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging one of the largest repositories of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system.

The candidate will be responsible for supporting a team of more senior AI/ML staff and Data Scientists in the following tasks:
Leveraging AI/ML techniques and solutions to identify complex patterns for predicting safety hazards
Increasing the efficiency and quality of the vulnerability discovery process by tightly integrating automated processes, AI/ML techniques and human SME/analyst expertise
Develop and prototype AI algorithms and software tools.
Enhance and maintain current analysis tools, including automation of current processes using AI/ML algorithms.
Conduct quantitative data analysis using a variety of datasets, including developing retrieval, processing, fusion, analysis, and visualization of various datasets
Develop techniques that make use of both digital flight data, text-based safety reporting, and a variety of other aviation data sets both in a silo and in a fused environment to identify potential safety vulnerabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related fields
Hands-on Software Development Skills (Python-Preferred)
Experience or educational courses/projects in Machine Learning, and/or Text Mining Algorithms.
Ability to work closely with Domain experts to develop tools/algorithms needed to answer research questions in their studies
Excellent Communication Skills (with the abilty to explain developed tools and ML algorithms to a non-technical audience)
Ability to formulate operational problems in aviation domain as technical problems that allows for reuse of leading research in the area.
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems
Strong analytic, inferencing, critical thinking, and creative problem-solving skills
Self-starter with ability to work both independently and with a team

Preferred Qualifications:
1 to 2 years of relevant experience
Experience with Deep Learning Frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch,Mxnet etc. Ability to apply these frameworks to real problems in the ‘time -series’ domain
Experience with interpretability of deep learning models
Big Data Skills (Hadoop, Spark, recent deep learning platforms)
Visualizations/Web Development Skills (e.g. Tableau, MEAN stack - MongoDB, ExpressJS, AngularJS, NodeJS).
Practical experience with statistical analysis
Experience with text mining tools and techniques including in areas of summarization , search (e.g. ELK Stack) , entity extraction, training set generation (e.g. Snorkel) and anomaly detection
Expert software development skills lifecycle including developing and maintain good production quality code
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
169,Machine Learning Software Engineer – Qualcomm AI Research,$87k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company:
Qualcomm Technologies, Inc.
Job Area:
Engineering Group, Engineering Group > Machine Learning Engineering
Job Overview:


Qualcomm is a company of inventors that unlocked 5G ushering in an age of rapid acceleration in connectivity and new possibilities that will transform industries, create jobs, and enrich lives. But this is just the beginning. It takes inventive minds with diverse skills, backgrounds, and cultures to transform 5Gs potential into world-changing technologies and products. This is the Invention Age - and this is where you come in.

Artificial Intelligence is changing the world for the benefit of human beings and societies. AI is moving from cloud to the edge devices. QUALCOMM, as the world's leading mobile computing platform provider, is committed to enable the wide deployment of intelligent solutions on all possible devices. Be a part of our Deep Learning research project in Corporate R&D, where you will be involved and participate in building best-in-class solutions and tools needed to enable state-of-the-art technologies for next generation mobile/embedded machine learning platforms for smart phones, autonomous vehicles, robotics and IOT devices. In this role, you will work in a dynamic research environment, be part of a multi-disciplinary team of researchers and software developers, collaborate with internal teams, work with popular neural network frameworks, and understand the architecture of Qualcomm’s SOC compute and ML HW accelerators. You will design, develop & test software for machine learning tools and frameworks that enable making models smaller and run efficiently on all edge devices. The successful applicant should have a strong software background, and passion to work on neural network frameworks/libraries.

We are looking for motivated engineers at various levels who possess experience in some of the areas below:
Extensive programming in Python, C/C++
Object-oriented software design and development
Experience in debugging complex software issues
Knowledge of neural networks, with hands-on experience using ML frameworks such as TensorFlow or PyTorch
Knowledge of Convolutional Neural Networks (CNNs), RNN/LSTMs
Familiarity with any of the deep learning compiler frameworks TVM, Glow or XLA
Experience with compiler frameworks such as LLVM or GCC
Knowledge Qualcomm Hexagon DSP is a plus
Experience developing embedded software, preferably on-device ML
Experience with CI/CD tools like Jenkins, Docker, and Cloud technologies
Previous experience working on machine learning data pipelines
Previous experience working in an Agile environment, and collaborating with multi-disciplinary teams
Applicants: If you are an individual with a disability and need an accommodation during the application/hiring process, please call Qualcomm’s toll-free number found here for assistance. Qualcomm will provide reasonable accommodations, upon request, to support individuals with disabilities to be able participate in the hiring process. Qualcomm is also committed to making our workplace accessible for individuals with disabilities. Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer and supports workforce diversity.

To all Staffing and Recruiting Agencies: Our Careers Site is only for individuals seeking a job at Qualcomm. Staffing and recruiting agencies and individuals being represented by an agency are not authorized to use this site or to submit profiles, applications or resumes, and any such submissions will be considered unsolicited. Qualcomm does not accept unsolicited resumes or applications from agencies. Please do not forward resumes to our jobs alias, Qualcomm employees or any other company location. Qualcomm is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes/applications.

EEO Employer: Qualcomm is an equal opportunity employer; all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, Veteran status, or any other protected classification.",4.0,"Qualcomm Incorporated
4.0","San Diego, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1985,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
170,Principal Radar Systems Engineer,-1,"Principal Radar Systems Engineer

One global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place..
Raytheon Technologies (RTX) offers an innovative and inclusive culture; welcoming diversity and collaboration and providing numerous opportunities for career growth.

The System Design & Architecture Team is the central focus for Mission Systems Integration activities within Raytheon Missiles & Defense (RMD). The more than 2,100 employees provide requirements definition and design at the system, subsystem and component level every day in a collaborative environment which is characterized by respect for the individual, problem solving in a team setting, consensus oriented solutions, and results based recognition. Supporting this mission are teams providing domain expertise and creative solutions in surveillance, naval and missile defense based radar system design, sonar and undersea sensor system design, integrated air and missile defense systems engineering, command and control/battle management system design, combat system and platform architecture design and integration, software intensive system engineering, cyber solutions and algorithm development for signal processing, tracking and discrimination systems. The team welcomes you to join our tradition of achieving excellence through thought and team work while leveraging individual diversity conducive to a flexible work schedule and environment.

Join this highly visible team and perform technically challenging assignments which will directly contribute to protecting our nation and our war fighters.

Are you interested in joining a dynamic, inclusive, and growing professional organization? Integrated Defense Systems is looking for a Radar Senior Systems Engineer to support the Missile Defense and Sensor Systems (MDSS) department. The MDSS department provides subject matter expertise for concept development, architectural design, requirements generation & flow down, modeling and simulation, systems analysis, integration, test and evaluation of world-class Missile Defense & Sensor Systems to be achieved through our people, processes, technology and performance.

Required Skills:
Minimum of 8 years of experience in the field of engineering or related technical discipline
Experience with developing, documenting, and maintaining processes, methods and tools
Proven ability to develop technical solutions to complex issues
Strong analytic, technical and problem solving skills
Experience with MS Office Suite
Active DoD Security Clearance (U.S. Citizenship status is required) or obtain within 1 year from start date.
Desired Skills:
Experience with Battle Management Command, Control. Communications, Computers, and Intelligence (BMC4I) systems, Radar Systems, or signal processing techniques
Experience with system level requirements development, documentation and maintenance and/or requirements development and design of system level software architecture.
Experience with radar system concepts; detection, discrimination, track and signal processing algorithms and their behaviors and performance
Experience with the development and coding of system models, algorithms, test vectors and analysis tools in support of analyzing radar requirements and performance
Experience and interest in Information Assurance/Cyber Engineering requirements, determination, development, and implementation
Experience working with Matlab, C/C++, Java, or DOORS
Previous military service
Excellent communication, technical writing, oral presentation, and interpersonal skills
Proven ability to interface with customers and lead technical solutions to complex user needs
Strong analytic, technical and problem solving skills
Active DoD Secret Clearance or greater
Required Education:
Bachelors Degree in Engineering, Science, Mathematics or related discipline.
Keywords: systems engineering, software, architecture, Artificial Intelligence, Computer Science, Computer/Management Information Systems, Cyber Jobs, Distributed Systems, Information and Knowledge Systems, Machine Learning, Mathematics, Research & Development

This position requires the eligibility to obtain a security clearance. Except in rare circumstances, only U.S. citizens are eligible for a security clearance.

At Raytheon Technologies, we innovate to create solutions and solve complex challenges across all domains: from land and sea to air, space, and cyberspace. In doing so, we embrace the talent, expertise and perspectives of our diverse workforce, each bringing their skills, ideas and dedication to the work we do. We pride ourselves on our commitment to our customers, industry partners and our teammates, making a positive impact not only to our business, but also in our communities where we live and work. Our constant innovation is made possible by a strong culture, investing in our people, and an unwavering vision thats shared by Raytheon Technologies employees across the globe a vision of one global team creating trusted, innovative solutions to make the world a safer place.

Raytheon Technologies has been recognized as a respected employer and valued corporate citizen for our employment practices, programs and community support by a number of highly-regarded organizations. The list includes: Forbes, Glassdoor, National Veterans Small Business Association, Corporate Responsibility Magazine, Environmental Protection Agency, Affinity Inc. and many more.

What We Offer: Whether youre just starting out on your career journey or are an experienced professional, Raytheon Technologies offers a robust total rewards package that goes above and beyond with compensation; healthcare, wellness, retirement and work/life benefits; career development and recognition programs. Some of the superior benefits Raytheon Technologies offers include parental (including paternal) leave, flexible work schedules, achievement awards, educational assistance and child/adult backup care.

All these job responsibilities are to be executed in harmony with Raytheon Technologies' Code of Business Ethics and Conduct policy which sets the standard by which we operate and how we treat others.

Raytheon Technologies is an equal opportunity employer and considers qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, creed, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, age, disability, or Vietnam era, or other eligible veteran status, or any other protected factor.

This position requires either a U.S. Person or a Non-U.S. Person who is eligible to obtain any required Export Authorization.
167633

Raytheon is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, age, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or protected Veteran status.",3.8,"Raytheon Missiles & Defense
3.8","Woburn, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,2020,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
171,Atlassian Software Engineer,$66k-$110k (Employer Est.),"COMPANY SUMMARY

Since 1992, Kingland's managed solutions have helped data-intensive, highly-regulated clients connect and protect their businesses. Kingland develops and manages enterprise-class software solutions using its Kingland Platform and teams of data and technology experts. Clients in the banking and capital markets, public accounting, insurance, and retail industries look to Kingland to create solutions to manage data, risk, compliance, customer insight and more. The Kingland Platform is a highly secure, cloud-optimized software platform that includes enterprise data management, text analytics, artificial intelligence and machine learning, and workflow and compliance management capabilities.

Kingland is unique. While we are based in Iowa, our clients are not. We are an Iowa company with a significant global reach. We provide our employees with the opportunity to ""live locally and work globally"", combining the Iowa quality of life that we all love, with exciting opportunities to travel the world and work on large projects for large clients.

Kingland is growing. We’re looking for individuals who like to tackle big challenges, want to work on mission-critical solutions, as well as desire to make a difference in the world — and be rewarded for their efforts. Explore all the ways that quality of work meets quality of life at Kingland, and launch yourself on an exciting new adventure.

POSITION SUMMARY

Kingland is looking for an experienced JIRA/Confluence Engineer or Administrator to join our team as an Atlassian Software Engineer. The ideal candidate has an analytical mindset, a passion for continuous improvement, and drive to deliver quality solutions. As an Atlassian Software Engineer, your responsibilities will range from tier-1 internal support, Atlassian maintenance and upgrades, and front-end customization to solutions design, and comprehensive application and system administration.

MAJOR RESPONSIBLITIES AND DUTIES
Be a subject matter expert in all things Atlassian, including JIRA project, workflow, plugin, and integration configuration, Confluence administration, user and permissions administration
Help to ensure our teams are using the Atlassian products effectively for a rapidly growing organization
Evaluate software updates, plugins, add-ons, and changes to JIRA and Confluence
Write, build, or update scripts and workflows all while maintaining Atlassian best practices
Collaborate with multiple functional areas and leaders (Engineering, Project Management, DevSecOps, IT, HR, Accounting, Facilities, etc), external vendors, and the Process and Reporting teams, to gather requirements for new implementations and to create and deliver solutions
Drive multiple projects (sometimes simultaneously) from start to finish, making a profound impact on the productivity and efficiency of our business
Triage and resolve Atlassian administrative requests, enhancements, access, and performance issues
Supports business strategy by supporting and enabling tooling and process integration between Atlassian applications, as well as other target applications as needed
POSITION REQUIREMENTS
3+ years or equivalent of JIRA and Confluence Administration experience
Intermediate level Linux experience
Entry Level AWS experience desired
Bachelor’s degree or applicable background experience
BENEFITS
Included in the Kingland Career Development Program – a guided program consisting of targeted learning opportunities and mentorship to assist you in career growth, personal development and opportunity for promotion and advancement at Kingland Systems.
Generous vacation and paid holidays
401(k) company match
8 hours of paid volunteer time annually
3 weeks paid parental leave after the birth or adoption of a child
Wellness reimbursement for gym memberships, equipment, and apparel
Access to free on-site fitness center in Clear Lake location
Company match of up to $1,000 annually for charitable donations
Free on-site parking
Access to company dining facility in Clear Lake location",3.8,"Kingland Systems
3.8","Clear Lake, IA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1992,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
172,Quality Engineer Technician,$37k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"Under direct supervision, the Quality Engineer Technician will assist with various quality projects starting from the project origination and carrying through the testing phase. Activities include planning, developing, and/or evaluating a new project or process. They will work with other QE’s and Process Engineering to assist in coordinating their contributions to the development of a required quality project.

• Experienced Programmer (CMM, Gear CMMs, Shaft machines, Automatic Surface Finish and Contour Trace Machines)
• Knowledge of MSA (GageR&R), and working knowledge of basic Statistical Tools and Analysis
• Proven ability to troubleshoot automated and mechanical gages and tooling
• Knowledge of non-conforming material issues and ability to make disposition decisions.
• Perform, document and understand machine and process capability studies.
• Perform regular machine calibrations and troubleshoot issues with inspection machines.
• Must work in compliance to IATF 16949 Procedures/Systems.
• Housekeeping and light maintenance of the quality assurance work areas.
• Maintain current certifications and engage in continuous learning in order to keep up with new developments in field. Learn continually on the job through meetings, working with others and reading work-related publications such as trade magazines and association newsletters, manufacturing reports and articles.
• Basic understanding of Quality softwares in use, (Minitab, QC Calc, MeasurLink)
• Proven ability to take direction from Quality engineering as a resource to meet quality goals and objectives.

Requirements:
• Associates degree preferred
• Green Belt Certification
• ASQ CQT Certification or ability to obtain the certification within one year.

Skills:

• Three year of proven Quality Inspector/Programming experience in a machine shop (preferably high volume environment).
• Ability to interpret machining drawings and diagrams and ability to express the meaning of callouts in question.
• Able to confirm dimensions of products using precise measurement tools such as micrometers, calipers, dial indicators and angle finders, or calculate mixture volumes and material composition ratios to ensure products meet specifications.
• Ability to evaluate the condition and reliability of production equipment to make purchasing and repair recommendations. Evaluate adequacy of procedures for isolating root cause factors for production deficiencies or decreased product quality.
• Possess excellent communication skills to interact with co-workers such as equipment operators, quality control managers and shop supervisors to share information on equipment set ups and defects found during audits.
• Ability to work independently when reviewing quality processes.
• Ability to work with team members such as engineers, production operators and quality control staff designing layouts, completing inspections, observing production processes and developing recommendations.",3.5,"Linamar Corp
3.5","Arden, NC",-1,10000+ Employees,1966,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
173,NLP Engineer,-1,"ForeSee Medical is a tech start-up with a legacy management team focusing on improving the patient care landscape. Are you a seasoned senior developer looking for a greenfield project? Do you want to work on a revolutionary platform to help improve healthcare efficiency? If so, keep reading.

ForeSee engineers develop the next-generation open platform, cognitive processing software solutions that place data in the hands of providers and care teams to empower them to positively influence health outcomes.

We’re looking for engineers who bring fresh, progressive ideas and the spirit of innovation as we embark on our journey. As a key member of a small and versatile team, you will design, test, deploy and maintain the ForeSee solutions.

As an engineer, you will work on projects critical to helping healthcare providers and patients as they navigate an ever-changing healthcare industry. We are seeking software engineers that want to be part of the creative process as well as versatile, display leadership qualities and passionate about working on revolutionary solutions to the problems facing the industry.

WHAT YOU WILL BE DOING

Design, implement and maintain libraries, and develop new algorithms and services for:
Named Entity Extraction, Language Detection
Emotion/Sentiment Prediction
Keyword and Topic Extraction
Deep-learning Chatbots and dialog modeling
Intent detection, Query Parsing, Semantic mapping
WHO YOU ARE
You’ll hold a PhD or Master’s Degree in Machine Learning, NLP, Statistics or Computational Linguistics.
You’ll have extensive experience in building and implementing NLP systems
Strong coding skills in Python
You are a seasoned developer.
You care about quality and you know what it means to ship high quality code. You practice TDD daily.
You enjoy experimentation and new ideas.
You enjoy learning and always improving yourself and the team around you.
You have a deep understanding of system design, data structures, and algorithms.
You are familiar with OOAD, SQL and NoSQL Concepts, Relational Data Modeling, REST and HTTP, MVC Architecture.
Your past projects include having worked in a team to develop large scale enterprise web applications dealing with millions of users serving a large user population which is currently in production.
REQUIREMENTS
4+ years of professional experience developing large scale enterprise application.
3+ years of experience with use of backend languages like Python, Java
Expert with use of SQL for data discovery
2+ years of Relational database experience",-1,"foresee medical, inc.","San Diego, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
174,Multi-skilled maintenance engineer,$43k-$86k (Glassdoor Est.),"C&W Services is the industry leader in Integrated Maintenance Solutions providing service to more than 600 companies worldwide and a sister company of Cushman & Wakefield.
Location: *Salt Lake City
Job Description*
As a Maintenance Technician, you will learn new skills as you support the Operations Maintenance team in repairing and maintaining material handling equipment and pneumatic systems throughout the building. You will have the opportunity to install, maintain and repair automated packaging and distribution equipment. We are committed to improvement; you will be encouraged to participate in career development opportunities as presented to progress your career. Responsibilities include, but are not limited to: Promote a safe working environment by following all safety procedures.

Complete preventative maintenance routines with proper documentation. Use of appropriate tooling to troubleshoot simple AC/DC circuits, basic troubleshooting of material handling equipment (MHE), and repairs to miscellaneous Operational equipment as needed. Maintain a positive working relationships across all of the Operations facility. Track and store department inventory. Move up to 49lbs as well as stand and walk during shifts lasting up to 12 hours, with or without reasonable accommodation.

Basic Qualifications: High school diploma or equivalent. 1+ years of experience in basic preventive/predictive maintenance, troubleshooting skills and repair methods of industrial machines. 1+ years of experience in Mechanical and/or Electrical basic components. 1 + years of experience with compressors and pneumatics.

Preferred Qualifications: 1+ years of experience using power tools to include saws and drills with proper safety precautions. Experience with Microsoft Office suite and OS. Experience with basic metal and wood fabrication, including saws and drills. Basic understanding of a Computerized Maintenance Management System (CMMS).

If you have these skills too, we would love to talk to you: Electomechanics, Electromechanical Assembly, Electrical Schematics, Industrial Electrical Equipment, Wiring, Conveyor Material Handling, Industrial Equipment, Component Repair, Component Troubleshooting, PLC, Mechanical Maintenance, Industrial Maintenance, Rigging, Troubleshooting, Wood Manufacturing, Power Tools, Electricity, Predictive Maintenance, Preventive Maintenance

Job Ref: CWPO21

C&W Services is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.

About: C&W Services

Why Work At This Company: Competitive Pay, Great benefits that start FIRST DAY and Growth opportunities!

About C&W Services

A leader in facilities services with over 65 years of experience. C&W Services is one of the largest facility services companies in the USA & Canada with a 65-year history of helping clients drive down operating expenses, increase facility efficiency and up-time, enable strategic business decisions and create positive experiences for the people who work, shop, learn, live and play in the facilities we maintain. We’re building the best team in the industry – our people are the heart and vitality of C&W Services. In joining C&W Services, you’re joining a firm with a rich history, blue-chip client list, and the backing of sister company Cushman & Wakefield, one of the world’s largest property advisory firms and the reason for our success is simple: talented people.

Our success is due to a supportive and friendly culture that fosters collaboration.

Why C&W Services?

• Weekly Pay

• Comprehensive Benefits that start on day 1

• Advance opportunities

• Training to work in a cutting-edge facility

• A safety first culture

Visit our website at: https://careers.cushmanwakefield.com/cwservices/global/en

Learn why C&W Services is an ideal place for veterans to continue their careers: https://cwservices.com/veterans/

We are an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Mechanical and/or Electrical basic components: 1 year (Preferred)
compressors and pneumatics.: 1 year (Preferred)
basic preventive/predictive maintenance: 1 year (Required)
Education:
High school or equivalent (Required)
Schedule:
12 hour shift
Company's website:
https://careers.cushmanwakefield.com/cwservices/global/en",3.6,"Cushman & Wakefield
3.6","Ogden, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,1917,Company - Public,Real Estate,Real Estate,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
175,Aviation AI/ML Data Scientist,$109k-$186k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why choose between doing meaningful work and having a fulfilling life? At MITRE, you can have both. That's because MITRE people are committed to tackling our nation's toughest challenges—and we're committed to the long-term well-being of our employees. MITRE is different from most technology companies. We are a not-for-profit corporation chartered to work for the public interest, with no commercial conflicts to influence what we do. The R&D centers we operate for the government create lasting impact in fields as diverse as cybersecurity, healthcare, aviation, defense, and enterprise transformation. We're making a difference every day—working for a safer, healthier, and more secure nation and world. Our workplace reflects our values. We offer competitive benefits, exceptional professional development opportunities, and a culture of innovation that embraces diversity, inclusion, flexibility, collaboration, and career growth. If this sounds like the choice you want to make, then choose MITRE—and make a difference with us.

The Aviation Safety & Analysis department is individuals with interest in applying their data science skills to deep and challenging problems in the aviation domain. We have a treasure trove of data including time series, text and sensor data and challenging problems to solve. We are seeking someone with aviation experience and skills in machine learning, deep learning, text mining, big data and software/application development.

If Sklearn, pyTorch, Keras,TensorFlow, LSTM, LDA, anomaly detection, entity extraction, and summarization mean something to you and you’ve applied them to aviation data, we want to talk to you. You are not required to have skills in all of these but should have hands-on skill in at least one area and the ability to dive deep in the data, and learn the necessary skills to get the job done.

The candidate will work with the FAA and international customers, leveraging one of the largest repositories of aviation data to improve the capabilities, safety, and efficiency of the aviation system. The candidate will be responsible for working both individually and with a team of data scientists in the following tasks:
Performing anomaly detection and capability development using a variety of aviation safety data
Leveraging AI/ML techniques and solutions to identify complex patterns for predicting safety hazards
Increasing the efficiency and quality of the vulnerability discovery process by tightly integrating automated processes, AI/ML techniques and human SME/analyst expertise
Develop and prototype AI algorithms and software tools.
Enhance and maintain current analysis tools, including automation of current processes using AI/ML algorithms.
Conduct quantitative data analysis using a variety of datasets, including developing retrieval, processing, fusion, analysis, and visualization of various datasets
Develop techniques that make use of both digital flight data, text-based safety reporting, and a variety of other aviation data sets both in a silo and in a fused environment to identify potential safety vulnerabilities
Basic Qualifications:
Demonstrable aerospace/aviation knowledge or experience, this is a must
Bachelor’s Degree in Aerospace Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Electrical Engineering, Computer Engineering or related fields
Hands-on Software Development Skills (Python-Preferred)
Experience or educational courses/projects in Machine Learning, and/or Text Mining Algorithms.
Ability to work closely with domain experts to develop tools/algorithms needed to answer research questions
Excellent Communication Skills (with the ability to explain tools and ML algorithms to a non-technical audience)
Proven ability to work independently to learn new technologies, techniques, processes, languages, platforms, systems
Strong analytic, inferencing, critical thinking, and creative problem-solving skills
Self-starter with ability to work both independently and with a team
Preferred Qualifications:
5 years of relevant experience
Experience with Deep Learning Frameworks such as Keras, Tensorflow, PyTorch, Mxnet, etc. Ability to apply these frameworks to real problems in the ‘time -series’ domain
Experience with interpretability of deep learning models
Big Data Skills (Azure, Hadoop, Spark, recent deep learning platforms)
Visualizations/Web Development Skills (e.g. Tableau, D3, etc).
Practical experience with statistical analysis
Experience with text mining tools and techniques including in areas of summarization, search (e.g. ELK Stack), entity extraction, training set generation (e.g. Snorkel) and anomaly detection
Expert software development skills lifecycle including developing and maintaining good production quality code
MITRE is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. MITRE recruits, employs, trains, compensates, and promotes regardless of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, gender expression, sexual identity, disability, age, veteran status, and other protected status.

MITRE intends to maintain a website that is fully accessible to all individuals. If you are unable to search or apply for jobs and would like to request a reasonable accommodation for any part of MITRE’s employment process, please contact MITRE’s Recruiting Help Line at 703-983-8226 or email at recruitinghelp@mitre.org.

Copyright © 1997-2020, The MITRE Corporation. All rights reserved. MITRE is a registered trademark of The MITRE Corporation. Material on this site may be copied and distributed with permission only.",3.4,"MITRE
3.4","McLean, VA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Nonprofit Organization,Federal Agencies,Government,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
176,Software Engineer (Machine Learning),$123k-$159k (Glassdoor Est.),"# Who are we?

As a new industry alternative for independent artists, UnitedMasters provides premium music distribution services and facilitates unique partnerships between artists and the world’s biggest brands. We enable artists to maintain full ownership over their master recording rights while introducing them to millions of new fans worldwide through our direct brand partnerships.

The UnitedMasters team is made up of musicians, marketers, engineers and storytellers with backgrounds from YouTube, SoundCloud, Pandora, Facebook, Dropbox, Complex, VICE and more. We work hand in hand with the award-winning creative teams that forge those innovative partnerships at Translation.

# What's the role?
Define and implement the next generation of UnitedMaster’s products to help meet and exceed our business objectives
Apply problem-solving and expert software development skills to a wide range of ML-related coding projects
Adapt machine learning techniques from domains such as Vision and Speech to build intelligent user experiences
Participate in design and code reviews
Interact with other team members to incorporate their innovations and vice versa• Identify and communicate best practices for software engineering

# Qualifications
Degree (Bachelors, Masters, or Ph.D) in Computer Science or a related field
Experience in applying machine learning techniques to computer vision and speech recognition domains.
Experience in C++, Java, Perl, PHP, or Python
Experience in a statistical programming language such as R,
Experience with relational databases and SQL
Experience with web technologies: JavaScript, XHTML, CSS
High levels of creativity and quick problem solving capabilities
B.S., M.S., or Ph.D. degree in Computer Science or related field
3+ Years of experience in applying machine learning techniques to computer vision and speech recognition domains.",2.7,"UnitedMasters
2.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Music Production & Distribution,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
177,Data Scientist/Business Intelligence Engineer,$76k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"Homesite Insurance was founded in 1997 and was one of the first companies to enable customers to purchase home insurance directly online, during a single visit. Since then, we've continued to innovate rapidly to meet the needs of our customers and their changing expectations.

One thing that's stayed the same since our founding: our commitment to our customers, partners and employees.

Join us on our journey as we continue to grow into a powerful contender in the field of insurance.

Homesite Insurance Company is seeking an experienced, passionate and motivated, Data Scientist/ Business Intelligence Engineer, to provide strategic leadership in the areas of Insurance Operations. The ideal candidate must be able to make an immediate impact by working with stakeholders throughout the organization to plan and execute change to impact the bottom line. Their skill set will support the growth of the Commercial line of business by utilizing data to drive decisions that optimize operational results.

This role is part of our Operations Department, which is responsible for managing post sales processing and servicing activities to meet/exceed operational service level agreements in a cost effective manner. This department has business responsibility for policy processing, billing, claims processing, in-sourced and outsourced back office operations, service platform, and business ownership of call center technology platform and operations-based IT initiatives. The Operations Department drives continuous improvement in servicing capabilities through process and IT changes and partner with Underwriting, Finance, Claims, and IT.

The Data Scientist/Business Intelligence Engineer is a highly quantitative problem solver who loves to dig into different kinds of data and can confidently and successfully communicate their findings to stakeholders in different departments. They will act as a strategic change agent to drive the change management and adoption of key initiatives to support the growth of Homesite by leveraging enterprise data to model outcomes and create anomaly detection capabilities. The incumbent will work closely with Customer Service, Billing, Claims, Policy Operations, IT, KTC, Training and external vendors, developing solutions that optimize all areas of operations.

Responsibilities:

-Mine and analyze data from internal and external databases to drive optimization of operations, financial outcomes, customer experience and retention.

-Use statistical and machine learning/deep learning to build supervised, semi-supervised and unsupervised models per business needs.

-Ensure data quality throughout all stages of acquisition and processing, including areas such as data sourcing/collection, ground truth generation, normalization and transformation.

-Communicate proposals and results in a clear manner backed by data and coupled with actionable conclusions to drive business decisions.

-Work with other analysts and team members to translate models into business solutions and collaborate with other departments in the company when necessary.

-Interface with stakeholders and develop innovative approaches to communicate the value add of the models being built.

-Participate in the transfer of knowledge of methodologies and best practices to peers and colleagues through collaboration, mentoring, and formal presentation and consulting.

Required skills:

-Master’s degree or higher in Statistics, Machine Learning, Computer Science, Applied Mathematics, Physics or other quantitative discipline.

-Three to five years business experience in statistical modeling, data mining, machine learning, artificial intelligence, and applying data base queries.

-Proficiency in programming in Python, R and SQL.

-Ability to extract and clean data from a variety of structured and unstructured sources.

-Ability to drive both individual and team projects to completion.

-Demonstrated ability to work with executives, such as CEO, CFO, and CIO on strategic direction setting and decision making.

-Demonstrated ability to build relationships and accomplish goals across a highly matrixed organization.

-Clearly communicate complex findings to colleagues and external customers.

-Monitor the results of statistical models through the use of dashboards and ad hoc analyses.

#LI-TD1",3.2,"Homesite Group
3.2","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
178,Engineer/Service Tech,-1,"Position Type: * Full Time Permanent Employee
Title: * Service Engineer / Robotics division
Location: * Livonia Michigan
About Us: * YUDO Inc. is a subsidiary of YUDO Co., Ltd, a world leader in Hot Runner Systems and Auxiliary systems (for plastic injection molding). At YUDO Inc., we provide professional sales and service to the U.S. and Canada from our office located in Livonia MI, Plain City, OH, and Auburn AL. Visit our website http://www.yudo.com/eng\_group/
Responsibilities: *
Serve as Service Engineer for Auxiliary systems mainly takeout robot, Factory automation
Clearly and professionally interact with customer
Ability to understand and maintain project schedules
Work closely with customers and machines to ensure equipment operates within expected tolerances.
Adaptable to change in a learning environment.
Willing and able to work overtime, weekends, and holidays when necessary.
Perform preventative maintenance on all equipment.
Perform other related duties as assigned.
Skills and Experience Requirements: *
Minimum of College Degree or equitable professional experience required.
Robotics / Factory automation / Injection molding machine service experience is preferred.
Must have computer skills and be able to type efficiently - MS Office. etc.
Ability to respond and support emergency requirements for parts and equipment.
Excellent knowledge of safety practices and procedures around manufacturing equipment.
Green card or US citizenship required.
Comments: * Yudo Inc offers competitive salary, health insurance, 401K benefits and technical training from HQ in Korea.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $52,000.00 - $60,000.00 per year

Work Location:
Multiple locations
Pay Frequency:
Monthly
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
People-oriented -- enjoys interacting with people and working on group projects
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture",4.5,"YUDO INC
4.5",Indiana,-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Electrical & Electronic Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
179,"Data Scientist, Medical Diagnostics",-1,"_*The Company*_
The world is facing a medical crisis, bacteria are increasingly evolving resistance to even our strongest antibiotics. The problem is already very real and immediate; for example, bloodstream infection leading to sepsis is now responsible for more than half of all deaths in hospitals and is the most expensive condition treated in hospitals. Sepsis mortality rate increases >6% every hour without effective antibiotic treatment. Yet, despite the life and death urgency, and healthcare cost impacts, current methodologies require 3 days to determine the correct antibiotic.

Specific Diagnostics has developed a breakthrough solution to rapidly determine the effective antibiotic treatment for bloodstream and other acute infections. Used for bloodstream infection Specific’s solution provides results 2 days sooner than existing methods, saving patients suffering from drug-resistant infection.

We have been funded by nearly $30 M in non-dilutive government sponsored research support and recently $17.5 M in venture capital. This is an opportunity to join us at an inflection point in our commercial growth as we bring our first key product to market and with recognition from major customers fueling an expansion of our staff.
_The Job*_
_*_*This is the job for you if want to be where your ideas to be central to a world-changing and lifesaving product. Data science and analytics are at the core of our company we are seeking an exceptional talent to join our team. You will be a key contributor and critical to the success of the company. The main analysis tasks you are expected to contribute to are:
Analytical methods and statistical analysis for processing high-volume, temporal high-dimensional data streams generated in real-time from our proprietary sensor technology.
The development of data-driven visualization tools for the explorative analysis of high-dimensional data.
The application and development of suitable pre-processing, feature-selection and dimensional reduction techniques to detect, measure and account for data artifacts.
The development and validation of applications for a medical instrument built under the guidance of a senior manager experienced in the application development discipline (so you’ll be learning the valuable skill of integrating your work into applications for medical diagnostic devices).
Algorithm development for decisions and measurements from multi-dimensional data streams.
This is not the job for a numbers only person. We want someone with a passion for and experience in the sciences that will lead you to look deeply into the sources of the data along with the scientists so that the data analysis is influenced by the science of our diagnostic technology and the science is influenced by the analysis.
_You_*
You have a proven track record of successfully developing, validating and deploying data analysis and analytical methods to solve challenging real-world applications. You are deeply familiar with a broad range of analytical models and are at the pulse of developments in the field. Ideally you have proven expertise in the analysis of spatio-temporal data. You have a strong domain knowledge in the field of statistical analysis and signal processing. You should have a track record of success in your education and projects and have these characteristics and skills:
MS degree in computer sciences, biomedical engineering, or related field and at least 5 years of interesting relevant experience.
Expert in R and proficient with C++ and Python.
Expertise in analytical methods and statistical analysis.
Proficiency in SQL as well as NoSQL database technologies a plus.
Full fluency (verbal and written) of the English language is a must.
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
On call
Experience:
relavent: 2 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",2.6,"Specific Diagnostics
2.6","Mountain View, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
180,Data Analytics Engineer,-1,"Our Data Analytics Engineer will engineer elegant and performant analytic code, predominantly in Scala (and Spark), Python and/or R. You will join a growing multi-disciplinary team of Data Scientists, Engineers, and Solutions Experts with deep domain knowledge working to develop new capabilities and workflows to solve real- world client problems.

Your work will include notebook-style ad hoc analytic development (similar to tools such as Beaker, Julia, Zeppelin) within the QOMPLX:OS SaaS platform as well as true server-side analytic development. Projects may include near real-time and batch-oriented data processing for analytics and simulation modeling. As an internal user of the QOMPLX platform, your experience will inform the development of the QOMPLX product suite to improve capability, usability and performance.

Our ideal candidate will have a strong work ethic, fantastic attitude and be comfortable tackling any challenge set before him or her. We provide significant flexibility and autonomy to team members, have high expectations and expect everyone to contribute meaningfully to our broader collective goals.

Responsibilities
Engineer data pipelines that handle collection, parsing, cleansing and enrichment of terabytes/petabytes of data to meet the clients analytics needs
Developing state-of-the-art analytics ranging from ad hoc analysis to production-grade pipelines and workflows
Providing mathematical algorithms and implementations to serve the needs of data analysis workflows in QOMPLXs modular SaaS platform
Build model management frameworks for data analytics that include both statistical and machine learning models
Understanding customer business challenges and sourcing the most appropriate data sets, algorithms, and architectures (using QOMPLX OS) to solve them quickly and cost-effectively
Own the end to end model development lifecycle and establish and adhere to best practices
Working collaboratively to ensure consistent and performant approaches for analytical code that is integrated with our commercial offerings
Interacting directly with Product, Business Analysts and Customer Success teams to support live customer deployments
Qualifications
Reside in the greater Washington D.C. area or able to relocate
Bachelor's Degree or 8 years of relevant work experience
2+ years of data analytics experience that includes data engineering & analytics
Proven expertise in Machine learning algorithms, libraries & technologies including Neural Networks
Expert knowledge of Scala and/or Python
Expert knowledge of SQL and NoSQL technologies
Experience with agile development within commercial projects or elite non-commercial research
Adept at learning and applying new technologies and solving new problems
Hands on expertise in data analytic technologies such as Apache Spark, Apache Flink, MLOps Pipelines and notebooks like Polynote/Jupyter
Experience blending analytic and simulation modeling approaches to problem solving
Effective organizational skills with strong attention to detail
Strong communication skills - both written and verbal
Desirable
Experience with graph databases and cyber security
Advanced mathematical modeling skills
About QOMPLX

QOMPLX applies artificial intelligence to solve complex, real-world problems at scale. Our Human+AI operating system, QOMPLX:OS, blends capabilities ranging from data handling, analytics, and reporting to advanced algorithms, simulations, and machine learning, enabling decisions that are just-in-time, just-in-place, and just-in-context. If this type of environment sounds exciting reach out to us directly via application at https://www.QOMPLX .com/careers with a resume and cover letter.

QOMPLX offers a competitive salary, a full range of benefits, including 401(k) and medical, dental & vision coverage, flexible Personal Time Off (PTO) plan and 10+ paid holiday days per year",3.4,"QOMPLX
3.4","Tysons Corner, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
181,SR. RESEARCH ENGINEER,$59k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are:


Providing design, development, and analysis on components, engines, transmissions, and vehicles, we also support research and modeling for fuel mixing, combustion, filtration, and fluid flow analysis. We are pioneers in measuring engine and vehicle exhaust emissions.


Objectives of this Role:

Serve as project leader and design engineer on in-cylinder flow, turbulence, combustion, and emissions from SI and CI engines.
Lead or facilitate projects involving 3D CFD to model engine after treatment system and battery. Offer technical leadership and direction to team developing new models or techniques to describe phenomena within an engine
Supervise reports and makes presentation summarizing test results to domestic and international clients.Interface with clients to define and coordinate projects, provide updates, and share results.
Manage CFD and other modeling and simulation tests. Prepare bids and promotional efforts as well as proposal presentation in the area of powertrain analysis. Develop long-term goals and projects for clients and internal research teams

Daily and Monthly Responsibilities:


Serve as project leader and design engineer on in-cylinder flow, turbulence, combustion, and emissions from SI and CI engines.
Lead or facilitate projects involving 3D CFD to model engine after treatment system and battery. Offer technical leadership and direction to team developing new models or techniques to describe phenomena within an engine
Supervise reports and makes presentation summarizing test results to domestic and international clients.Interface with clients to define and coordinate projects, provide updates, and share results.
Manage CFD and other modeling and simulation tests. Prepare bids and promotional efforts as well as proposal presentation in the area of powertrain analysis
Develop long-term goals and projects for clients and internal research teams

Requirements:


Requires a Masters or foreign equivalent, in Mechanical Engineering
Must have three years of post-baccalaureate mechanical engineering experience
The three years of experience must include experience with engine systems analysis related to in-cylinders, emissions, and aftertreatment in-cylinder CFD; 3D CFD software
Pro/E; modeling in-cylinder flow, turbulence, and emissions; aftertreatment systems; and modeling and simulation of engine systems
Must travel 10% domestically and internationally


Special Requirements:


Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas


An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.1,"Southwest Research Institute
4.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
182,Data Scientist,$80k-$135k (Glassdoor Est.),"E.W. Scripps is a company rich in media history focused on the future. We are one of the nation's largest independent TV station owners with 60 stations nationwide, and we are working to stay ahead of the ways in which people use technology to find news and information. Our commitment to the future means that discovery is commonplace, the status quo is challenged, iteration and collaboration are the norm and new ideas are welcome. Join a team of top performers and help shape the future of the most strategic and well positioned media company – E. W. Scripps. This position will be located in Cincinnati, OH or Washington, DC.

At Scripps, you’ll:
Have a complete modern data science/analytics software stack at your disposal.
Enjoy a broad scope of responsibility – with projects and questions from every part of the business and new businesses under consideration.
Know that your work will have an impact on key strategic decisions – changing and shaping the way we do business. This is why we are so selective in our hiring process.
Grow your talent with constant learning – with substantial investments in on-site and hands-on training and eLearning formats used to fill in the gaps.
Work on projects that are important and interesting to you – with focus on modern media and marketing strategies
Expand your horizons by attending and giving talks at conferences and professional networking opportunities with senior analytics professionals.
Become a leading expert in applied data science for media.
We are looking for someone who knows how to use the latest data analytics tools, will thrive in our fast-paced innovative environment, will deliver results and has the following experience and credentials.

Primary purpose:

The Data Scientist blends the skills of a business thinker with those of a data analyst: asking questions, turning data into knowledge, forming conclusions, and making recommendations that enable the company to innovate, differentiate itself from its competitors, work smarter, make better decisions, and enhance profitability. This individual will partner with the analytics team, analytics products and services director, business leaders and end users to be a change agent - teasing out the questions that are important to our business, and then use statistical analysis and data mining techniques to inform the answers and communicate conclusions both visually and in writing, along with recommendations and next steps. The Data Scientist will also participate in the creation and measurement of new business processes, tools, and products.

Key responsibilities:
Influence the course of the business as a trusted advisor to business leaders, users and clients, using data and analytics as a basis for better, more informed decision making
Creation of analytics and measurement roadmaps
Identify impactful choices or courses of action that drive value for the organization
Evaluate the big picture and solve business problems in addition to focusing on metrics
Influence the direction of the business by effectively communicating conclusions to cross-functional groups
Create automation applications to replace tasks for critical revenue generating teams decreasing time dedicated to non-revenue generating
Mine large amounts of data and perform data analysis to extract useful business insights for a wide range of topics including product development and performance, market dynamics, consumer and audience knowledge, internal operations, and external research
Initial study design, acquisition of data, prototyping and production roll out
Ongoing tracking, monitoring, and periodic follow-up studies
Support the design and implement of reporting dashboards that track key business metrics and provide actionable insights
Use software and other tools to develop analyses that identify patterns, influences, correlations, relationships, predictive factors, risk factors, and that provide better situational awareness
Creation of models, simulations, and optimization routines
Develop of data flows and acquisition strategies to facilitate the capture and sharing of data and analytics within the organization
Support the development of Scripps analytics products and services by providing input into product roadmaps
Be a positive force to cultivate a culture that is passionate about developing analytics as a business competency
Drive accountability for value recognition and business results
Create and contribute to a quality work environment that motivates team members to perform at their highest levels and positively affects employee and business partner relationships
Be a publicly visible presence, including creating communications and leading training sessions, advocating for the benefits of analytics in Scripps and the products/services of the analytics team
Education / work experience:
Bachelor's required, Masters preferred. Applied statistics, Computer Science, business analytics or a related field.
Minimum 3 years, 5+ years preferred, experience in solving analytical problems using quantitative approaches apply to this requirement.
Experience and demonstrated success presenting complex analyses and final recommendations to business leaders and external clients.
Statistical method experience:
Analysis techniques such as marketing mix modeling, scenario modeling, pattern detection, A/B testing, nearest neighbor, cluster analysis, sentiment analysis, decision trees, optimization, simulation, regression analysis, agent-based modeling, ensemble models, collaborative filtering and other types of analysis
Software Proficiency:
Python, RapidMiner, R
Database skills (Snowflake, MySQL) experience preferred
Tableau
About Scripps:

The E.W. Scripps Company (NASDAQ: SSP) advances understanding of the world through journalism. As the nation’s fourth-largest independent TV station owner, Scripps operates 60 television stations in 42 markets. Scripps empowers the next generation of news consumers with its multiplatform news network Newsy and reaches growing audiences through broadcast networks including Bounce and Court TV. Scripps runs an award-winning investigative reporting newsroom in Washington, D.C., and is the longtime steward of the Scripps National Spelling Bee. Founded in 1878, Scripps has held for decades to the motto, “Give light and the people will find their own way.”

As an equal employment opportunity employer, The E.W. Scripps Company and its affiliates do not discriminate in its employment decisions on the basis on race, sex, sexual orientation, gender, color, religion, age, genetic information, medical condition, disability, marital status, citizenship or national origin, and military membership or veteran status, or on any other basis which would be in violation of any applicable federal, state or local law. Furthermore, the company will make reasonable accommodations for qualified individuals with known disabilities unless doing so would result in an undue hardship for the company.

If interested, please apply at www.scripps.com/careers.

#LI-CH1

#GD-CH1",3.6,"The E.W. Scripps Company
3.6","Cincinnati, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1878,Company - Public,TV Broadcast & Cable Networks,Media,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
183,SR. COMPUTER SCIENTIST - SR. RESEARCH ENGINEER - TRANSPORTATION SYSTEMS,$67k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are:


The Intelligent Systems Division develops automated solutions for commercial and government clients in multiple domains including transportation (traffic management, connected automated vehicle), manufacturing robotics, medical prognostics and communication standards.


Objectives of this Role:

Serve as a software developer and researcher on a team developing software solutions in technology areas such as Intelligent Transportation Systems (ITS), Integrated Corridor Management Systems (ICMS), and Decision Support Systems (DSS)
Initiate advanced research and development programs

Daily and Monthly Responsibilities:


Utilize advanced data analytics techniques and enterprise data infrastructure skills in state-of-the-art software development environments
Perform in all phases of the development lifecycle, including requirements definition, software/systems design, implementation, testing, and integration
Interact with clients and conduct technical presentations.

Requirements:


Requires a Bachelors with a 3.00 GPA in Software Engineering, Computer Engineering or Computer Science or related
7 years of experience with an emphasis on software development and systems engineering and exposure to object-oriented programming (programming languages such as, but not limited to, C++, C#, Java)
Education and/or experience involving one or multiple of the following: .NET, C#, Java, JavaScript, C++, Python, WPF, Git, Microsoft SQL Server, Windows, Linux, Docker, Kubernetes, Redis, Elastic Stack, TypeScript, HTML, CSS, Angular, Kafka, AWS, Azure, GCP
Excellent interpersonal skills and the ability to work well individually and as a member of a project team are required
A valid/clear driver's license is required


Special Requirements:


Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: San Antonio, Texas


For more information about this division, visit the Intelligent Systems home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.1,"Southwest Research Institute
4.1","San Antonio, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
184,DevOps Engineer - TS or TS/SCI Required,-1,"General Duties:
Support the analysis, design, development, integration, verification and validation of a large complex scientific mission system. The primary responsibility will be requirements analysis with mission subject matter experts (SMEs), engineers, and other program stakeholders. Secondary responsibilities include the evaluation of hardware and software components for integration into the system. Both responsibilities (requirements analysis and component evaluations) will require familiarity with the current on-premise solution (physical hardware) and the planned cloud-hosted platform (Amazon Web Services).

Required Experience:
5+ years using Software Development Life Cycle (SDLC) in an Agile Model
5+ years eliciting, refining, explaining and vetting system requirements
5+ years conducting hardware and software component evaluations
5+ years working with Linux-based systems
2+ years supporting programs that leverage Amazon Web Services
2+ years scripting or coding in BASH, Python, Ruby, Perl, or Java
1+ years working with Puppet or Ansible
Must work well in teams
Desired Skills:
Familiarity with Tomcat Web Application deployment
Familiarity with stateless RESTful Architecture
Familiarity with basic AWS Services such as EC2, S3, IAM, RDS and CloudWatch
Familiarity with industry standard commodity hardware for information systems (servers, storage, network devices)
Familiarity with industry standard software products for information systems (e.g. operating systems and databases)
Experience with Terraform
Experience with GIT, Bitbucket and Jenkins
Experience with Agile (Scrum) development processes and tools including Confluence and Jira.
Education/Experience Level:
Bachelors Degree
Certifications Required: None, but AWS certifications are highly desirable
Clearance:
US Citizenship Required - TS or TS/SCI required

BENEFITS OFFERED:


Medical, Dental, Vision Insurance - 100% Company-Paid Premiums
STD, LTD, and Life Insurance - 100% company paid
401K Additional 10% salary contribution immediately vested
Bonus Plan
PTO - 4 weeks/year
Holidays - 10 paid/year
Birthdays off with pay
Upfront and Recurring Referral Bonuses
Education Reimbursement
Paid Parental Leave
ABOUT PHOENIX OPERATIONS GROUP:
Phoenix Operations Group is a high-end engineering services company dedicated to protecting and advancing our national intelligence, defense and scientific interests. As a small start-up operating out of the Baltimore/Washington DC area, we rely on innovation to continually advance our employees' skills and provide game-changing solutions to our customers.

Our technical competencies include Big Data analytics, Cloud Computing infrastructure, Machine Learning, Multi-INT visualization, and enterprise architectures. We believe in open-source initiatives, agile development processes, and arming analysts with amazing capabilities. For more information, visit us at: https://phoenix-opsgroup.com

Phoenix Operations Group is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Phoenix Operations Group does not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, sex, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, non-disqualifying physical or mental disability, national origin, veteran status or any other basis covered by appropriate law. All employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.",5.0,"Phoenix Operations Group
5.0","Charleston, SC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
185,Software Development Engineer,$73k-$111k (Glassdoor Est.),"· 2+ years of non-internship professional software development experience
· Programming experience with at least one modern language such as Java, C++, or C# including object-oriented design
· 1+ years of experience contributing to the architecture and design (architecture, design patterns, reliability and scaling) of new and current systems.
· B.S degree or equivalent experience.
· Experience in any of Java, Perl, Python, Ruby, C/C++.
· Experience with REST, web services and cloud environments.

AWS is revolutionizing technology and business through better cloud engineering, and at the core of that revolution is the way we think about networking at enormous scale. AWS Networking Data Science steers the ship for the fastest growing network in the world, and we rely on scientific judgement supported by modeling, statistical inference, timeseries forecasting, machine learning, and graph algorithms to make every critical decision.

We’re looking for Software Development Engineer with unfettered curiosity and a drive to solve major research challenges at the intersection of business and engineering.

You are skeptical. When someone gives you a data source, you pepper them with questions about sampling biases, accuracy, and coverage. When you’re told a model can make assumptions, you aggressively try to break those assumptions.

You have passion for excellence. The wrong choice of analysis could cost the business dearly. You maintain rigorous statistical standards and take ownership of the outcome your analyses suggest.

You do whatever it takes to add value. You don’t care whether you’re working on machine learning, blazing fast code, forecasting, distributed computing, scraping data, or building complex data visualizations, you care passionately about shareholders and know that as a curator of data insight you can unlock massive cost savings.

You have a limitless curiosity. You constantly ask questions and break apart problems scientifically. You form hypotheses and then eagerly try to break them.

You value relationships and patient explanation. Part of being a trusted advisor is building a strong track record and continually demonstrating to your customers that your analysis will save them money and time. You break down your model assumptions without jargon and help customers understand where your model fails.

· Comfortable working with Linux, or other Unix operating systems.
· Deep understanding of data structures, algorithms and their performance.
· Strong Network and Systems troubleshooting skills
· Experience with capacity planning
· Experience with agile development methodologies and DevOps environments.
· Experience with forecasting
· Meets/exceeds Amazon’s leadership principles requirements for this role
· Meets/exceeds Amazon’s functional/technical depth and complexity for this role

Amazon is an Equal Opportunity Employer – Minority / Women / Disability / Veteran / Gender Identity / Sexual Orientation / Age",3.9,"Amazon Data Services, Inc.
3.9","Seattle, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,1994,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
186,"Software Engineer, Machine Learning",$122k-$202k (Glassdoor Est.),"Grammarly is continuing to grow our team during the COVID-19 pandemic, conducting fully remote hiring and onboarding processes. All Grammarly team members can work remotely until August 2021. Read more about how we're supporting our team and communities.

The opportunity


Grammarly empowers people to thrive and connect, whenever and wherever they communicate. 30 million people around the world use our AI-powered writing assistant every day. All of this begins with our team collaborating in a values-driven and learning-oriented environment.

To achieve our ambitious goals, we're looking for a Software Engineer focused on machine learning to join our team. This individual will be responsible for building end-to-end intelligence systems that solve complex user problems, including applying ML to solve new problems as well as building the infrastructure and systems that will enable this to operate effectively at scale. The role will have the opportunity to provide feedback about the systems and tools in place to facilitate the creation and improvement of a machine learning platform that can increase the efficacy of the engineering team.

Grammarly's engineers and researchers have the freedom to innovate and uncover breakthroughs—and, in turn, influence our product roadmap. The complexity of our technical challenges is growing rapidly as we scale our interfaces, algorithms, and infrastructure. Read more about our stack or hear from our team on our technical blog.

Your impact


The Software Engineer for machine learning will need to stay up-to-date on the quickly evolving field of NLP while also focusing on building production systems. The majority of the problems we're tackling haven't already been solved elsewhere, which provides the opportunity for creativity and innovative problem-solving.

Working on the Machine Learning team requires close partnership with analytical linguists, computational linguists, and research scientists. You will have the chance to deepen your skills in machine learning and deep learning while increasing breadth in related areas to up-level our entire team.

In this role, you will:
Build end-to-end machine learning solutions to solve complex customer problems.
Collaborate with applied researchers to ensure they are well-calibrated on the constraints of the production system, ensuring their research proceeds along practical pathways as they explore novel techniques to tackle previously unsolved problems.
Effectively communicate technical machine learning results in a business context where most people are not machine learning experts.
Build the systems to help applied researchers scale their models in a production environment.
Design experiments, including for offline prototypes in a statistically sound way that will provide actionable data and enable us to make reliable decisions as we iterate on a project.
Promote excellence and best practices across the machine learning team in regards to research, implementation, tooling, and system design.
Work cross-functionally across multiple partner teams to get new features shipped across our many interfaces.
We're looking for someone who
Embodies our EAGER values—is ethical, adaptable, gritty, empathetic, and remarkable.
Understands traditional machine learning algorithms and how to use them effectively in practice.
Is familiar with deep learning and its applications in industry.
Has a strong working knowledge of statistics as it relates to sampling methodologies and designing experiments
Understands data structures and algorithms at a level sufficient to write performant code when working with large datasets or large incoming data streams.
Is aware of NLP techniques to effectively work with very high-dimensional, sparse data.
Has enough experience with academic research to be comfortable reading and implementing papers to reproduce their results.\
Support for you, professionally and personally
Professional growth: We hire people we trust, and we give team members autonomy to do their best work. We also support professional development with training, coaching, and regular feedback.
A connected team: Grammarly builds products that help people connect, and we apply this mindset to our own team. We have a highly collaborative culture supported by our EAGER values. We also take time to celebrate our colleagues and accomplishments with global, local, and team-specific events and programs.
Comprehensive benefits: Grammarly offers all team members competitive pay along with a benefits package that includes superior health care. We also offer ample and defined time off, catered lunches, gym and recreation stipends, admission discounts, and more.
We encourage you to apply


At Grammarly, we value our differences, and we encourage all—especially those whose identities are traditionally underrepresented in tech organizations—to apply. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, gender expression or identity, sexual orientation, national origin, citizenship, age, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or any other characteristic protected by law. Grammarly will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. Grammarly is an equal opportunity employer and participant in the U.S. Federal E-Verify program.",5.0,"Grammarly
5.0","San Francisco, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
187,Data Scientist,$72k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Data Scientist, you will have the unique opportunity to work on a program developing target models and advancing state-of-the-art modeling and prediction capabilities. This program will develop and train machine learning models to detect and discern features in scenes and develop an adversarial patch framework to defeat the trained classifiers.
Our delivery teams are driven to explore new ideas and technology, and care deeply about collaboration, feedback, and iteration. We follow SAFe agile practices, embrace the Ops ethos(DataOps/DevSecOps/MLOps) to “automate-first”, use modern tech stacks, and constantly challenge each other to grow and improve.
If cutting edge data science projects resonate with you and you care deeply about joining a mission-driven company with a strong growth direction and diverse culture, we'd love to learn more about you. Check out the details below, and let’s connect.

Technical members of our solutions teams require little guidance, but love to learn, collaborate, and problem solve. This position requires a mid to senior level of experience, a passion for mission support, and a strong desire to solve our customers’ hardest technical and data challenges.
The Data Scientist will be responsible for the following:
Develop, train and evaluate Machine Learning models
Develop strategies for data augmentation and synthetic data
Utilize models to detect and classify targets within scenes
Develop adversarial attacks to defeat trained classifiers

Requirements:
TS/SCI clearance required
5+ years of related experience
Experience with deep learning frameworks such as PyTorch, Tensorflow or MXNet
Prior experience with the Intelligence Community and methodological experience in some of the following areas
Relationships and discovery (correlating, enriching, and prioritizing target data)
Situational awareness (unifying data into a single context, allowing the current situation to be accurately and quickly understood)
Systems modeling (building a computational analog of real-world-system to understand how it operates, what it is capable of, and how it can be fooled)
We're looking for a motivated Data Scientist eager to advance not only your professional career, but also the missions of our Intelligence and Defense communities. At NT Concepts, you'll be able to:
Meaningfully impact the company's growth, and share in the rewards accordingly
Develop your own career path through our What’s Next program, which emphasizes personal growth through training and certification
Work on programs of importance that directly impact National Security and the world
Work in a fun, “challenging yet rewarding” fast-paced environment
#CJ
#JT",3.6,"NT Concepts
3.6","Chantilly, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1998,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
188,Data Scientist,$97k-$155k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a member of the Data Science team, you will run the development of next-generation platforms for customers micro-segmentation, clusterization, behavior analysis, and prediction as well as building up new improved recommendation systems for the customers.

You will use your expertise to design data science models and frameworks, data processing pipelines, and lead efforts of the ML models productization.

You will use project management skills to manage the deliverables and ensure all stakeholder work is complete on time. You will also manage stakeholder communications and present your project across a wide spectrum of management levels.

Data Scientist is supposed to handle complex problems independently and demonstrate analytical thinking. At this position, you should be able to make judgments and recommendations based on the analysis and interpretation of data.

The position requires excellent communication skills and experience working directly with technical teams as well as with business stakeholders. Being able to present findings in a meaningful and clear way is a must.

Responsibilities:
Design, develop, train, evaluate, tune and support machine learning models for time series analysis, demand forecasting, customer intelligence, recommendation systems, optimization, NLP and image analytics.
Design, implement and support scalable jobs and services for data cleaning, preprocessing, aggregation for model training and model inference data pipelines.
Analyze existing and discover new data sources, perform feature engineering and feature selection
Contribute to the analysis of the business requirements, architecture development and implementation planning
Contribute to the presentation of teams results
Learn & stay current on developments in one or more analytics domains: Optimization, Machine Learning, Deep Learning / AI, Simulation, etc.
Build upon and utilize Amazon Cloud Services and Tools
Requirements:
Good communication and presentation skills
Solid mathematical & computer science background
Relevant software engineering background: VCS(git), CICD, containers (Docker), SQL, agile development practices
Proficiency and practical experience with Python and Python-based ML ecosystem, good coding skills
Proficiency and practical experience with cloud native software architectures, familiarity with AWS ecosystem: Sagemaker, Redshift, Aurora, Redis, EMR, SNS, SQS, DocDB, Cloudwatch, Step Functions, etc...
Strong practical knowledge of classic ML algorithms and experience with modeling tools like scikit-learn, statsmodels, lightgbm, hyperopt
Familiarity with and understanding of time series modeling, response modeling, lift modeling, survival analytics, look-alike modeling, statistical modeling. Ability to quickly ramp up to state-of-the-art in corresponding field.
Nice to Have (Plus):
Familiarity with data engineering and devOps is a plus
Experience with NLP and image analytics is a plus
Experience with recommendation systems (collaborative filtering, content filtering, session-based recommenders is a plus)
Deep learning knowledge and practical experience is a plus (TF, Pytorch, MLPs, RNNs, CNNs, Transformers, etc..)
Experience with retail, online commerce or similar B2C business domain is a plus
Experience in working across different global cultures is a plus

We offer:
Opportunity to work on bleeding-edge projects
Work with a highly motivated and dedicated team
Very competitive salary
Flexible schedule
Medical insurance
Benefits program
Corporate social events
Professional development opportunities
NB:

Placement and Staffing Agencies need not apply. We do not work with C2C at this time. At this moment, we are not able to process H1B transfers. Applicants with CPT and OPT visas are welcome to apply.

About Us:

Grid Dynamics is the engineering services company known for transformative, mission-critical cloud solutions for retail, finance and technology sectors.

We architected some of the busiest e-commerce services on the Internet and have never had an outage during the peak season.

Founded in 2006 and headquartered in San Ramon, California with offices throughout the US and Eastern Europe, we focus on big data analytics, omnichannel services, DevOps, and cloud enablement.",3.9,"Grid Dynamics
3.9","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
189,SENIOR SOFTWARE ENGINEER - Python/Node.js,-1,"SENIOR SOFTWARE ENGINEER - Python/Node.js*
(Top Secret - TS/SCI Clearance Required!)
BigBear, Inc.* is an industry-leading provider of big data computing and analytics solutions. We help people make sense of their data using our cloud-based platform and big data processing algorithms. Each day, we crunch massive volumes of structured and unstructured data into usable and actionable information for our customers. We currently have offices in Reston, VA., Charlottesville, VA., and San Diego, CA.
REQUIRED: *
5+ years of professional software development experience (MINIMUM)*
Solid experience with Python/ Django, Node JS, or Flask.
Solid experience with PostgreSQL.
Solid experience in Linux environment.
Solid experience with data modeling, business logic, and RESTful APIs.
Experience with NGINX and SSL.
US Citizenship and TS/SCI US Security Clearance.*
BS/MS in Computer Science or related field or equivalent military experience.
BONUS SKILLS: *
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum development process.
Experience with deployment automation in Amazon Web Services.
Experience with Django Framework.
Experience with geospatial toolkits including GDAL and PostGIS
Experience with high volume data flow.
Solid experience with Amazon Web Services (EC2, S3, SQS, RDS).
TECHNOLOGY WE USE: *
ElasticSearch
PostgreSQL
Python - Django
Java
AWS
Docker
Git
Angular, React
Jenkins
Our Company: *
BigBear, Inc.* is a software development company with locations in San Diego, Washington DC, Charlottesville, and Reston, VA. Our mission is to enable big data computing and analytics for our customers at a low cost. We leverage capabilities such as machine learning, crowdsourcing, geospatial image processing, and Extract-Transform-Load (ETL) data processing using our on-premise cloud computing technology stack. Our solutions provide a unique offering of products, custom-built software, and services focused within Big Data Analytics, Geospatial Information Systems (GIS), Visualization and Cloud Computing to our Department of Defense, and Commercial customers. We currently have exciting and challenging career opportunities for talented, motivated individuals who want to be part of a fast-growing company.
Our Team: *
We like to play with new toys and technologies. We like to break things to see if we can put them back together again in a better way. Our tails wag when we hear the words Big Data, Geospatial or Machine Learning. Each team member provides a unique set of advanced technical skills and trade that contributes to our overall success.
Perks/Benefits: *
· 100% employer-paid for Medical, Dental, and Vision insurance (PPO)
· A competitive salary based on experience
· Flexible Spending Account (FSA) - optional
· 401(k) with dollar-for-dollar match up to 6%
· A warm, cozy office with actual chairs and tables
· Life and Disability Insurance 100% paid for by the company
· Education Assistance
· 529 College Savings Plan - optional
· Healthy Rewards Program
· Pre-paid Legal & Identity Theft Protection - optional
· Gym Reimbursement
· Pet Insurance - optional
· A shiny magical machine that does wonderful things
· Flexible Hours
· Unlimited Coffee, Drinks and Snacks
· 6 WEEKS of Paid Time Off (PTO) on top of 11 Paid Holidays!
BigBear is an Equal Employment Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled *
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $100,000.00 - $135,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
COVID-19 considerations:
We are mostly working remotely at the moment due to COVID but we will be back to full time onsite at some point in the not too distant future

Experience:
Python: 4 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Reston, VA 20191 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Top Secret (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Relocation Assistance Provided:
No
This Job Is:
A job for which military experienced candidates are encouraged to apply
Company's website:
www.bigbear.io
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"BigBear, Inc.
4.4","Reston, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
190,"RESEARCH ENGINEER - EARTH, OCEANS, & SPACE",$57k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are:


With a focus on engineering and science flight projects, our staff explores new scientific challenges and develops innovative flight instruments to study problems in the areas of earth science, astrophysics, and heliophysics.


Objectives of this Role:

Design and analyze mass efficient structures and electronic packaging for extreme environment situations, materials quality, and mechanical integrity
Support various design reviews throughout product life cycle, including defending design and analytical work to customer, third party, and non-advocate reviewers

Daily and Monthly Responsibilities:


Supervise and coordinate fabrication of payload mechanical systems and subsystems. Develop and supervise environmental screening tests, development tests, and experiments
Produce high quality engineering documentation including drawings, specifications, test plans, procedures, and reports
Perform structural and thermal analyses of flight hardware
Field support may require travel to customer's facilities, NASA field centers, military bases, and overseas.

Requirements:


Requires an Bachelors with a 3.0 GPA in Mechanical Engineering or Aerospace Engineering
2 years of experience using computer aided design (CAD) software and standard office productivity software
Ability to productively interface with team members, suppliers and clients is a must. Experience with CREO (PRO/Engineer), structural analysis (e.g. ANSYS, NASTRAN), thermal analysis (e.g. Thermal Desktop), environmental testing methodology, mechanism design, material selection and characterization, electromechanical design, and/or space mission concept design
Experience with Thermal Analysis
A valid/clear driver's license is required


Special Requirements:


Work assignment is in Durham, New Hampshire. Applicant selected will be subject to a government security investigation and must meet eligibility requirements for access to classified information. Applicant must be a U.S. citizen.

Job Locations: Durham, New Hampshire


For more information about this division, visit the Space Science & Engineering home page.

An Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer
Race/Color/Religion/Sex/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin/Disabled/Veteran
Committed to Diversity in the Workplace
If you need assistance, please Contact Us",4.1,"Southwest Research Institute
4.1","New Durham, NH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1947,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
191,Principal R&D Software Engineer,$77k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"Purpose and Passion • Comprehensive Benefits • Life-Work Integration • Community • Career Growth

At Boston Scientific, you will find a collaborative culture driven by a passion for innovation that keeps us connected on the most essential level. With determination, imagination and a deep caring for human life, we’re solving some of the most important healthcare industry challenges. Together, we’re one global team committed to making a difference in people’s lives around the world. This is a place where you can find a career with meaningful purpose—improving lives through your life’s work.

Headline: Pushing the boundaries of what's possible gives my work purpose.

About the role:

Our Research and Development team is all about building the future of the operating room and office for urology patients and clinicians. As a Principal R&D Software Engineer, you'll be at the heart of that mission, developing best-in-class capital systems and software as part of our comprehensive portfolio of solutions. In return for your unique combination of big-picture perspective, ability to execute rigorously, and strong desire to win in the marketplace you'll be a trusted leader collaborating with some of most dynamic minds in the business. All in an environment that encourages people to take measured risks, learn from mistakes, and push the boundaries of engineering.

Key responsibilities:
Leading software architecture, implementation, integration, and testing for complex, connected electronic medical equipment (“capital”) systems and systems-of-systems.
Establishing best-practices for medical device software development and recruitment within the growing business franchise.
Producing maintainable code and technical documentation.
Collaborating with cross-functional and cross-divisional experts in a wide range of fields to solve complex engineering and business challenges.
Translating highly technical results into easily understood recommendations that will influence senior stakeholders.
Managing third party designers, vendors, and contractors to deliver high quality engineering solutions at an accelerated pace.
What we’re looking for in you
10+ years software development in lead roles, preferably in medical devices or a regulated industry with a proven track record of deployment in commercial products.
B.S. in Computer Science or equivalent with appropriate experience (Computer Engineering, Electrical Engineering, Computer Science, etc.). Masters preferred.
Experience defining and implementing APIs and communication protocols for control and operation of instrumentation.
Multithreaded application development that includes testing and debugging C/C++ on Linux.
Experience working within an Agile software development environment.
Experience in modern Source Code Management (SCM) tools such as git or AccuRev.
Experience in Continuous Integration/Continuous Deployment (CI/CD) software practice in a regulated environment.
Experience working within a quality system, IEC and ISO standards relevant to medical device software lifecycle and risk management (i.e. IEC 62304).
Experience with filesystems, concurrency, multithreading, server architectures, and distributed systems (e.g. AWS, IoT).
Experience with network protocols (TCP, UDP, TLS/SSL, HTTP) and web services (e.g. REST).
Working knowledge of software security and data privacy best practices and risk management.
Passion for understanding and solving problems for end users, with an ability to translate into software requirements, design, and test specifications.
Passion for developing talent, mentoring, and building high-performance teams.
Track record of strong cross-functional collaboration, influence without authority, and project management enabling highly effective project teams.
Proven self-starter who runs towards critical issues, ambiguous requirements, or loosely defined challenges with a demonstrated ability to rally teams to achieve business results.
Comfortable debugging complex integrated systems spanning hardware, embedded and application software in medical devices.
Familiarity with deployment of AI models using platforms such as Amazon Sagemaker, Google Cloud AI Platform, or Azure Machine learning studio a plus.
Familiarity with application of data engineering, data science, and database management a plus.
Familiarity with computer vision toolkits (e.g. OpenCV) a plus.
Experience in algorithm development and deployment using hardware specific hardware platforms such as GPU-accelerated programming, FPGAs, or microcontrollers a plus.
Travel: 10%
About us

As a global medical technology leader for more than 35 years, our mission at Boston Scientific (NYSE: BSX) is to transform lives through innovative medical solutions that improve the health of patients. If you’re looking to truly make a difference to people both around the world and around the corner, there’s no better place to make it happen.

Boston Scientific is an Equal Opportunity Employer – Race, Color, Religion, Sex, Sexual Orientation, Gender Identity, National Origin, Disability, Veteran

Boston Scientific maintains a drug-free workplace. Pursuant to Va. Code § 2.2-4312 (2000), Boston Scientific is providing notification that the unlawful manufacture, sale, distribution, dispensation, possession, or use of a controlled substance or marijuana is prohibited in the workplace and that violations will result in disciplinary action up to and including termination.",4.4,"Boston Scientific
4.4","Marlborough, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1979,Company - Public,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$10+ billion (USD),-1
192,Federal Pre-Sales Engineer,$70k-$201k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position: Federal Proposal Manager *
Position Location: Washington, DC *
Welcome to Planet. We believe in using space to help life on Earth. *
Planet designs, builds, and operates the largest constellation of imaging satellites in history.

This constellation delivers an unprecedented dataset of empirical information via a revolutionary cloud-based platform to decision-makers in commercial, environmental, and humanitarian sectors. We are both a space company and data company all rolled into one.

Customers and users across the globe use Planet's data and machine learning-powered analytics to develop new technologies, drive revenue, power research, and solve our world’s toughest challenges.

As we control every component of hardware design, manufacturing, data processing, and software engineering, our office is a truly inspiring mix of experts from a variety of domains.

We have a people-centric approach toward culture and community and we are iterating in a way that puts our team members first and prepares our company for growth.

Join Planet and be a part of our mission to change the way people see the world.
Position Summary *
The Federal Proposal Manager will lead the development of solicited and unsolicited Federal government proposals in support of the broader Planet Federal Sales and Business

Development Teams. For this role, you can translate your expertise in complex proposal management, writing, and marketing into world class and timely US Government proposal and sales enablement materials. You will collaborate across our sales, business operations, and product teams and work closely with engineering and program management to develop compliant and compelling customer facing documentation. As part of the Business

Operations team, the Proposal Manager will be a problem solver with strong intrapersonal skills, allowing them to navigate the broader customer lifecycle process while maintaining a strong and productive rapport with the Planet Federal Sales and Business Development

team. The Proposal Manager may also supervise and lead additional proposal support personnel as the team grows.
Key Responsibilities *
Managing, writing, editing, and formatting solicited and unsolicited proposals for US

Government customers including IC, DoD, and Federal Civilian. Driving content development, proposal process improvements, and proposal training. Working with Sales and Technical SMEs to articulate Planet product features and benefits to customers.
The Role: *
• Work with Sales, Business Operations, and the Product Team to manage, develop, and drive both solicited and unsolicited proposal generation and customer facing documentation

• Ensure 100% on-time delivery of compliant and compelling proposals on all assigned opportunities

• Collaborate with internal stakeholders (Sales, Product, and Legal) to ensure that all deals align with Planet Federal strategies and guidelines

• Become a go-to resource for Sales with regards to up-to-date sales content

• Work with the Sales, Business Development, Communications, and Marketing teams to create world-class proposals and enablement materials.

• Monitor and support opportunity tracking and bid/no bid process

• Support GSA schedule maintenance and updates

• Create, edit, and manage content for both internal and external audiences

• Build strong relationships with Sales, Product, Marketing, and Engineering teams
Required Professional Experience: *
• Minimum three (3) years experience in Federal government proposal and/or grants generation, project management, technical writing, or business strategy and development

• Experience developing customer facing documentation including: whitepapers, proposals, and presentations

• Comfortable communicating with Executive level decision makers

• Experience supporting complex public sector, academic, and/or enterprise level business proposals, and use cases.

• Flexibility and willingness to step outside of traditional roles as needed in a fast-paced startup environment

• Advanced knowledge in the use of content development tools including Google

Suites, Microsoft Office, and Adobe products

• Familiarity with CRM tracking, reports, and dashboards

• Experience working with highly technical product solutions such as cloud storage, imagery, or with geographical information systems.

• Experience supporting geographically diverse teams and customers

• Must have the ability to multitask and meet short timelines/deadlines; at times have the ability to work non-traditional hours, weekends., and holidays to meet proposal deadlines and support global team

• An active security clearance, or the ability to obtain one, at the Top Secret level or higher.
Preferred Professional Experience: *
• Familiarity with and/or experience supporting geospatial, commercial space, and/or satellite remote sensing customers and products

• Graphic design, desktop publishing, and template development experience

• Large-scale project management experience
Some press about us: *
Our CEO, Will Marshall's T ED Talk

""Tiny Satellites ushering in the New Space Revolution"" Bloomberg Businessweek

""The All-Seeing Eye in the Sky video"" Bloomberg Businessweek video

""Planet And Rocket Lab Create Mission Patch To Honor Women In Aerospace"" —Planet Blog
Join Us: *
Planet Federal is headquartered in Washington D.C. If you are feeling inspired, check out our website h ttps: //planetfederal.applytojob.com/apply and apply. Be sure to include a cover

letter to let us know why you think you’d be a good fit and feel free to mention anyone you have previously worked with at Planet.
_We are committed to building a diverse team and encourage applications from people _*
_of all backgrounds._*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $91,000.00 - $121,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Commission pay
Experience:
remote sensing or GIS: 3 years (Required)
customer-facing role: 3 years (Required)
GIS tools (i.e. ArcGIS, QGIS, etc): 3 years (Required)
Location:
Washington, DC 20005 (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Paid Training:
Yes
Management:
Key Leader
Company's website:
www.planet.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.1,"Planet Federal
4.1","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
193,Data Scientist,$112k-$133k (Glassdoor Est.),"Entefy’s Senior Data Scientist is a highly visible position both internally and externally. Join the intelligence revolution, where we can push the state-of-the-art boundaries of data science. This is where deep experience and multi-dimensional insights intersect with an amazing opportunity to shape the future of productivity for people everywhere.

Skills and Experience:

We’re not looking for “good.” Entefy is on a mission to find exceptional talent. The success of our mission depends on our team’s ability to be creatively analytical, insatiably curious, and absolutely fearless in tackling big challenges.
Requirements
Master's degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, or a compatible field. PhD is preferred.
3+ years of applicable work experience.
Demonstrable proficiency in Python, Scala, SQL, or R.
Strong data visualization and reporting skills.
Proven track record delivering high-value, advanced analytics.
Experience leading the work of other data scientists or analysts is preferred.
World-class ability to extract and communicate insights from real-world datasets.
Startup agility and versatility.
Visit www.entefy.com and www.blog.entefy.com.",4.3,"Entefy
4.3","Palo Alto, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
194,Multi Skilled Maintenance Engineer,$43k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Employment Type: * Full-Time
Job location: *Linden, NJ
Job Description: *
C&W Services are looking for talented Service Technicians - level I, II, and III. As one of our specialists you will learn new skills as you support the Operations Maintenance team in repairing and maintaining material handling equipment and pneumatic systems, and have the opportunity to install, maintain and repair automated packaging and distribution equipment. At C&W we are committed to improvement, and you will be encouraged to participate in on-going development opportunities to progress and enhance your career.
Benefits: *
Whether you’re a Service Technician I, II, or III, we offer a great range of benefits from day 1:

• Healthcare

• Weekly pay

• 401K Plan

• Paid Time off; 10 Vacation days per year, national holidays, and up to 48 PTO hours per year

• Career advancement opportunities

• On-going training in a cutting-edge facility

• Safety first culture
Essential Experience & Qualifications: *
• High school diploma or equivalent.

• 1+ years of experience in basic preventive/predictive maintenance, troubleshooting skills and repair methods of industrial machines.

• 1+ years of experience in Mechanical and/or Electrical basic components.

• 1 + years of experience with compressors and pneumatics.
Preferred Qualifications: *
• 1+ years of experience using power tools to include saws and drills with proper safety precautions.

• Experience with Microsoft Office suite and OS.

• Experience with basic metal and wood fabrication, including saws and drills.

• Basic understanding of a Computerized Maintenance Management System (CMMS).
Physical Requirements: *
• Vision (Near, Distance)

• Lift and move totes up to 49 pounds each

• Regular bending, lifting, stretching and reaching both below the waist and above the head

• Occasionally push and pull wheeled dollies loaded with products up to 100 pounds during site visits

• Engage in full manual dexterity in both hands and wrists

• Walking in the FC and around area with great frequency; facilities are over a quarter mile in length

• Ability to climb ladders and gangways safely and without limitation

• Ability to work in construction /distribution environments that may be noisy, unlit, unheated, not air-conditioned

• Continual standing and/or walking an average of 5 miles daily

• Able to access all areas of building (ascending and descending ladders, stairs, etc.)
Day to day responsibilities of these roles include, but are not limited to: *
· Promoting a safe working environment by following all safety procedures.

· Completing preventative maintenance routines with proper documentation.

· Provide feedback on tasks in the Preventive Maintenance programs (level II only)
Develop Preventive Maintenance programs (level III only)
· Use of appropriate tooling to troubleshoot simple AC/DC circuits

· Troubleshooting of material handling equipment (MHE), and repairs to miscellaneous Operational equipment as needed.

· Maintaining positive working relationships across all of the Operations facility.

· Tracking and storing department inventory.

· Train and mentor Service Technicians (level II and III only)
About C&W Services: *
A leader in facilities services with over 65 years of experience. C&W Services is one of the largest facility services companies in the USA & Canada with a 65-year history of helping clients drive down operating expenses, increase facility efficiency and up-time, enable strategic business decisions and create positive experiences for the people who work, shop, learn, live and play in the facilities we maintain. We’re building the best team in the industry – our people are the heart and vitality of C&W Services. In joining C&W Services, you’re joining a firm with a rich history, blue-chip client list, and the backing of sister company Cushman & Wakefield, one of the world’s largest property advisory firms and the reason for our success is simple: talented people.

Our success is due to a supportive and friendly culture that fosters collaboration. Find out more today: https://careers.cushmanwakefield.com/cwservices/global/en

Learn why C&W Services is an ideal place for veterans to continue their careers: https://cwservices.com/veterans/

C&W Services is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.

Electromechanics, Electromechanical Assembly, Electrical Schematics, Industrial Electrical Equipment, Wiring, Conveyor Material Handling, Industrial Equipment, Component Repair, Component Troubleshooting, PLC, Mechanical Maintenance, Industrial Maintenance, Rigging, Troubleshooting, Wood Manufacturing, Power Tools, Electricity, Predictive Maintenance, Preventive Maintenance

ID: C&WPArans/

Job Type: Full-time",3.6,"Cushman & Wakefield
3.6","Linden, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1917,Company - Public,Real Estate,Real Estate,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
195,Data Scientist,-1,"About Us

Mindoula is a next-generation behavioral health management company that delivers tech-enabled, team-based 24/7/365 behavioral health support across the continuum of care. We are building the best population health management and analytics platform by using the latest technologies in big data and data science. Also, we are developing a comprehensive platform to address the needs of pre and post hospital care for large populations.

We are currently seeking to fill in multiple roles in technology and data to help build great technology helping Mindoula to grow faster.

About You

We are looking for a talented data scientist who has a great passion for solving business problems by providing data insights through data modeling and analysis. You will work with senior leadership and data/technology teams to understand and solve complex business problems by developing data models and various techniques to analyze the health populations.

Responsibilities:
Derive insights from data analysis and modeling using multiple datasets, derived from the company platform, data provided by our customers etc.
Develop a comprehensive profile of the patient/member using the data available.
Apply statistical techniques to understand health data and analyze outcomes.
Apply data science algorithms and techniques to understand the member profile and prepare the data such that these insights help the care management team in addressing needs of our customers and members.
Be part of the data team, collaborate with product and engineering teams in developing the data required to support the functionality and new features of our platforms.
Must be self-driven and a quick learner.
Requires strong problem-solving, analytical and communication skills.
Healthcare data experience (claims, groupers) is a plus.
Technologies:
Data science: Analysis/Machine learning/AI algorithms and modeling.
Data Platforms: Spark, Python/Scala.
Strong SQL experience.
Databases: Postgres, Microsoft SQL Server
Hosting: Microsoft Azure
Tools: Github, CircleCI, CodeClimate
Requirements:
Minimum 3 years of experience in position
Healthcare experience with managing claims data
Compensation:
Competitive salary.
Generous benefits
This position is open to both as an employee or as a contractor/consultant.",3.8,"Mindoula Health Inc
3.8",Maryland,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
196,Sr. Software Engineer - Open Source Tools,$82k-$159k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Alteryx


Alteryx develops software for data preparation and analysis, including a number of server solutions for model deployment, collaborative work on data, and scheduling of automatic data processing. We're revolutionizing data analytics by providing a complete end to end, self-service platform that allows users to get from business questions to business answers at incredible speeds. Why work for just any analytics company?

At Alteryx, we are explorers, dreamers and innovators. We're on a journey to build the best analytics platform in the world, but we can't do it without people like you leading the way. We want Alteryx to be recognized as much for our dynamic work culture as for our products.

About Alteryx Innovation Labs


The Innovation Labs office, Alteryx's first office presence in Boston, was started earlier this year by the acquisition of MIT-spinout Feature Labs. This rapidly growing team combines the excitement of being part of a fast-paced, innovative startup with the resources, market penetration, and wisdom of a data analytics market leader. Our goal is to turbo-charge machine learning and data science efforts on the Alteryx platform, and to enable anyone to solve impactful problems. We are working on high-impact, high-visibility projects, and we’re looking for collaborative and knowledge-hungry teammates who want to join us as we work to democratize machine learning.


Overview


As a Senior Software Engineer, you will help the Open Source Tools team create and maintain innovative, open source tools for machine learning. Responsibilities you will encounter in this role include:
Working with other team members to design and implement new features for our tools
Create new open source libraries to complement our existing ones
Identifying the source of an issue a user is having with one of our libraries and implement a fix
Assisting community members in contributing changes of their own to our projects
Building integrations with other popular open source libraries such as pandas, scitkit-learn, or dask
Writing documentation and creating demos that communicate how to user our tool and the challenge it is trying to solve
Presenting our tools and technology at industry conferences such as PyCon and PyData
Performing peer code review
***The company will not provide sponsorship for work visas or other employment authorization for this position***
Requirements
BS or higher in Computer Science or equivalent
Extensive experience with Python development
Experience with data-related Python tools like numpy, scipy, pandas, scikit-learn, and dask
Work in our Boston office near Copley Square
Bonus
Contributed to or maintain open source libraries
Experience with performance testing machine learning systems
Experience with API design
Benefits and Perks
100% company-paid medical, dental, and vision for associates
Company matched 401(k)
Associate stock purchase plan
Paid time off: 3 weeks’ vacation, 5 sick days, 9 holidays, 3 floating holidays, and 20 hours volunteer time
100% paid parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Wellness programs with up to $300 fitness reimbursement annually
Collaborative offices stocked with healthy snacks and drinks
Office events, catered lunches, and happy hours
#LI-JE1",3.6,"Alteryx
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
197,Senior Software Engineer,-1,"Senior Software Engineer

We are seeking a highly motivated, talented Senior Engineer to join our product development team. We expect that all engineers can work full stack to some degree, but most engineers at Narrative Science have a primary focus. For this role, we’re looking for an engineer who has experience with and a passion for analytics, statistics, or machine learning.

You are someone who is comfortable owning and leading new projects end to end, working closely with product teams, and have a strong focus on improving the overall customer experience. You enjoy helping and mentoring people and believe that a great product comes from great team collaboration. You take delight in debugging unfamiliar problems and push yourself and others to grow as engineers.

Our Team


This role will be on our Depth Team, which primarily focuses on taking user provided data and writing a comprehensive story about it. We do this by determining what questions Lexio can answer based on the data, determining which answers are most relevant to the user, how the story should be structured with our NLG platform, and finally, how we want to present that story to our users in an interactive and intuitive way.

As a Senior Engineer on the Depth Team you will be focused on how we present our story and what content we choose to surface to the user within the story. You will have direct ownership over a large part of our code base and will be working hand in hand with our product and development teams to improve the analysis and content in our stories. In this role, you will have a solid mix of greenfield projects and platform improvements, along with plenty of opportunities to prototype and build lasting features and enhancements.

Qualifications:
4+ years of professional software development experience
Proven expertise of Python or equivalent
Demonstrated ability to write clean, helpfully-commented and readable code
A drive to learn constantly with an analytical and problem-solving mindset
A desire to grow as both an software and data engineer
Experience with Data Science Stack such as Sklearn, TensorFlow, Keras, etc
Experience with developing with statistical computing languages, such as Python or R
Bonus:
Experience with Unix / Linux systems (e.g. Ubuntu, CentOS, RedHat, etc.)
Familiarity with cloud computing, particularly AWS
About the Engineering Team @ Narrative Science

The Engineering team at Narrative Science specializes in delivering high-value cloud-based solutions to customers. Specifically, we are responsible for building and innovating on an insightful and personalized data storytelling platform. We work a lot with data pipelines, analytics, natural language generation (NLG), continuous deployment tooling, and cloud architecture.

Culture @ Narrative Science

Narrative Science believes that data storytelling can empower everyone to understand and take action from their data. Our mission is to build software that leverages artificial intelligence to automatically turn data into easy-to-understand reports, transforms statistics into stories, and converts numbers into knowledge.

Our core virtues (mission-driven, impactful, team first, innovative) are ingrained in everything we do, from how we develop our technology to how we interact with customers to how we hire people. Since 2020, we have embraced a remote approach and are on a journey to ingrain that in our culture. All while being immersed in our culture of learning, collaboration, innovation, and customer impact.

At Narrative Science, we embrace the diverse backgrounds, experiences, and perspectives of our future employees, colleagues, customers, partners, and other stakeholders. We provide equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, age, disability, marital status, citizenship, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.1,"Narrative Science
4.1",United States,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
198,Data Scientist,$111k-$175k (Glassdoor Est.),"C3.ai is a leading enterprise AI software provider for accelerating digital transformation. The comprehensive and proven C3 AI Suite uses a model-driven abstraction layer to enable organizations to develop, deploy, and operate enterprise scale AI applications 40x to 100x faster than alternative approaches. www.c3.ai

As a Data Scientist, you will participate in the definition of new analytics capabilities able to provide our customers with the information they need to make proper decisions to support our customers in operating the internet of things (IoT). In addition, you will help find the appropriate machine learning / data mining algorithms to answer these questions. Finally, you will be responsible for implementing this into the product and making it available to our customers.

Qualified candidates will have an in-depth knowledge of most common machine learning techniques and their application. You will also understand the limitations of these algorithms and how to tweak them or derive from them to achieve similar results at large-scale.

Your Responsibilities:
Driving adoption of Deep Learning systems into next-generation of C3.ai products.
Designing and deploying Machine Learning algorithms for industrial applications such as fraud detection and predictive maintenance.
Collaborating with data and subject matter experts from C3.ai and its customer teams to seek, understand, validate, interpret, and correctly use new data elements.
Requirements:
MS or PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering, Statistics, or equivalent fields.
Applied Machine Learning experience (regression and classification, supervised, and unsupervised learning).
Strong mathematical background (linear algebra, calculus, probability and statistics).
Experience with scalable ML (MapReduce, streaming).
Ability to drive a project and work both independently and in a team.
Smart, motivated, can do attitude, and seeks to make a difference.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Preferred
Experience with JavaScript and prototyping languages such as Python and R. Experience with Java and Scala is a plus.
Knowledge in electrical engineering and cyber-physical systems is a plus.
A portfolio of projects (GitHub, papers, etc.) is a plus.
C3.ai provides a competitive compensation package and excellent benefits including:
Competitive salary, generous stock options, 401K, medical, dental, and vision benefits. At the office, we offer a fully stocked kitchen with catered breakfast and lunch, table tennis and pool table, free membership at our on-site gym, Friday evening social hours with food, drink and music and a fun team of great people.
C3.ai is proud to be an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. We do not discriminate on the basis of any legally protected characteristics, including disabled and veteran status.",4.5,"C3.ai
4.5","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
199,Computational Science Engineer (CSE),-1,"As part of the team at Q you will work alongside a highly skilled group of scientists on cutting edge technology in the measurement, modeling, and analysis of complex processes that take place in human physiology.

Q draws upon engineering, computer science, biology, physics, and applied mathematics to develop multi-scale models of human physiology, in order to create innovative algorithms and tools that allows us to better characterize and understand human health and its pathologies. We offer the opportunity to learn and develop new skills in a dynamic, multidisciplinary environment, in order to build a world where each generation is healthier than the last.

Key Responsibilities

- Build and maintain a high performance optimization framework for systems with 100's of millions of variables

- Develop novel numerical modeling algorithms for multi-physics simulations

- Contribute to the development of intellectual property

- Maintain substantial knowledge of state-of-the-art principles and theories in the space of optimization and machine learning
Required Qualifications
PhD in Computer Science, Electrical Engineering or Applied Math
Hands on experience implementing advanced computational methods for electromagnetics, fluid dynamics, or mechanics
Strong background in numerical linear algebra
Strong background in electrodynamics
Experience working in C/C++ and Python
Excellent written and verbal communication skills
Relentless, self-motivated creative problem solver
Able to work effectively in high-pressure, fast-moving team environment
Bonus Qualifications
Experience in electromagnetic integral equation methods
Mathematical optimization (large scale convex / non-convex optimization, stochastic optimization, etc.)
Experience developing applications with MPI/OpenMP
CUDA programming experience
Benefits
Competitive salary and equity in a well-funded, early stage startup
Healthcare, vision, and dental coverage for you and your dependents
Hands-on experience with cutting edge biotech tools, techniques and data including Genomics, Transcriptomics, Epigenetics, Proteomics, Metabolomics, Microbiomics, Radiomics
We have Superconducting Magnets!
We are an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.",4.4,"Q Bio
4.4","Redwood City, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
